Contribution of clinical tests to the diagnosis of rotator cuff disease: a systematic literature review.To evaluate the diagnostic performance of clinical tests for degenerative rotator cuff disease, based on a systematic literature review.We searched Medline, Embase, and Pascal Biomed until the first half of 2006 inclusive for articles that reported at least the sensitivity and specificity of clinical tests for rotator cuff disease. Predictive values and accuracy were recorded where available. The results were discussed and validated.We selected nine studies, of which three investigated tests for subacromial impingement syndrome and seven tests for rotator cuff tendinopathy. The Neer and Hawkins tests had good sensitivity but low specificity for subacromial impingement syndrome. For diagnosing tears of the supraspinatus or infraspinatus, the Jobe sign and the full can test showed similar performance characteristics to the Patte test and resisted external rotation with the elbow at the side flexed at 90 degrees . For diagnosing tendinopathies with or without tears, active unresisted external rotation for the infraspinatus and the lift off test for the subscapularis were specific but lacked sensitivity. In one study, limitation of the range of active unresisted internal rotation was sensitive and specific for subscapularis tendon disease. The palm up test performed poorly for diagnosing long head of biceps disease.Data on the diagnostic performance of clinical tests for rotator cuff tendon disease are fragmentary. However objective data exist to support the usefulness of some of these tests. Further studies are needed.Incidence of os acromiale in patients with shoulder pain.A prospective case series was undertaken to determine the incidence of os acromiale in patients presenting to an orthopedic clinic with shoulder pain during a 6-month period. Ninety-three shoulders in 88 consecutive patients were evaluated by history, physical examination, and radiographs. Radiographs included anteroposterior, scapular Y, and axillary views in all patients. Based on history and physical examination, no patient was given a primary diagnosis of os acromiale. However, when the plain films were specifically reviewed for this entity, it was present in 6 (6.82%) of the 88 patients. It was seen on the axillary view in each case. Five (83.3%) of the 6 patients had been given a diagnosis of either impingement or rotator cuff tear based on physical examination. Os acromiale is an infrequent but not rare entity that must be kept in mind when evaluating patients with shoulder pain, as failure to recognize an os acromiale may negatively influence treatment results. An axillary view should be obtained when evaluating patients with shoulder pain.Evaluation of apparent and absolute supraspinatus strength in patients with shoulder injury using the scapular retraction test.Physical examination of patients with shoulder injury not involving actual rotator cuff tears frequently demonstrates decreased rotator cuff strength on manual muscle testing. This decrease has been attributed to supraspinatus muscle weakness, but it may be owing to alterations in scapular position.The position of stabilized scapular retraction, by minimizing proximal kinetic chain factors and providing a stable base of muscle origin, positively influences demonstrated supraspinatus strength.Controlled laboratory study.Supraspinatus strength was tested in 20 injured patients and 10 healthy controls in both the empty-can arm position and a position of scapular retraction using a handheld dynamometer. Pain in both maneuvers was measured by use of a visual analog scale.Paired t tests indicated the scapular retraction position resulted in statistically significantly (P = .001) higher supraspinatus strength values within both groups. There was no significant difference between the 2 positions in visual analog scale scores.This study shows that demonstrated apparent supraspinatus weakness on clinical examination in symptomatic patients may be dependent on scapular position. The weakness may be owing to other factors besides supraspinatus muscle weakness, such as a lack of a stable base in the kinetic chain or scapula.The clinical examination that addresses scapular posture and includes scapular retraction will allow more accurate determination of absolute supraspinatus muscle strength and allow efficacious rehabilitation protocols to address the source of the demonstrated weakness.Rotator cuff tendinopathy/subacromial impingement syndrome: is it time for a new method of assessment?Disorders of the shoulder are extremely common, with reports of prevalence ranging from 30% of people experiencing shoulder pain at some stage of their lives up to 50% of the population experiencing at least one episode of shoulder pain annually. In addition to the high incidence, shoulder dysfunction is often persistent and recurrent, with 54% of sufferers reporting ongoing symptoms after 3 years. To a large extent the substantial morbidity reflects (i) a current lack of understanding of the pathoaetiology, (ii) a lack of diagnostic accuracy in the assessment process, and (iii) inadequacies in current intervention techniques. Pathology of the rotator cuff and subacromial bursa is considered to be the principal cause of pain and symptoms arising from the shoulder. Generally these diagnostic labels relate more to a clinical hypothesis as to the underlying cause of the symptoms than to definitive evidence of the histological basis for the diagnosis or the correlation between structural failure and symptoms. Diagnosing rotator cuff tendinopathy or subacromial impingement syndrome currently involves performing a structured assessment that includes taking the patient's history in conjunction with performing clinical assessment procedures that generally involve tests used to implicate an isolated structure. Based on the response to the clinical tests, a diagnosis of rotator cuff tendinopathy or subacromial impingement syndrome is achieved. The clinical diagnosis is strengthened with the findings from supporting investigations such as blood tests, radiographs, ultrasound, magnetic resonance imaging (MRI), computed axial tomography (CT), radionucleotide isotope scan, single photon emission computed tomography, electromyography, nerve conduction and diagnostic analgesic injection. This process eventually results in the formation of a clinical hypothesis, and then, in conjunction with the patient, a management plan is decided upon and implemented. This paper focuses on the dilemmas associated with the current process, and an alternative method for the clinical examination of the shoulder for this group of patients is proposed.Current concepts in the recognition and treatment of superior labral (SLAP) lesions.Pathology of the superior aspect of the glenoid labrum (SLAP lesion) poses a significant challenge to the rehabilitation specialist due to the complex nature and wide variety of etiological factors associated with these lesions. A thorough clinical evaluation and proper identification of the extent of labral injury is important to determine the most appropriate nonoperative and/or surgical management. Postoperative rehabilitation is based on the specific surgical procedure as well as the extent, location, and mechanism of labral pathology and associated lesions. Emphasis is placed on protecting the healing labrum, while gradually restoring range of motion, strength, and dynamic stability of the glenohumeral joint. The purpose of this paper is to provide an overview of the anatomy and pathomechanics of SLAP lesions and review specific clinical examination techniques used to identify these lesions, including 3 newly described tests. Furthermore, a review of the current surgical management and postoperative rehabilitation guidelines is provided.Correlation between clinical diagnosis and arthroscopic findings of the shoulder.To assess the accuracy of clinical examination by non-specialist orthopaedic surgeons of patients presenting to a diagnostic and treatment centre (DTC) for arthroscopic shoulder surgery.A retrospective review of notes of 130 consecutive shoulder arthroscopies performed at a DTC over a 10 month period. Preoperative clinical diagnosis was compared with operative arthroscopic findings. Additional information from preoperative imaging was compared with clinical examination and arthroscopic findings. Preoperative clinical examinations and consent were undertaken by clinical fellows, (SpR level) and non-upper limb consultant orthopaedic surgeons. Consultants specialising in upper limb surgery performed the operations.Six main groups were identified on the basis of clinical examination: impingement 76 cases (58%), instability 22 cases (17%), frozen shoulder 11 cases (8%), rotator cuff tear four cases (3%), non-specific pain eight cases (6%), and normal clinical examination nine cases (7%). Impingement and instability diagnosed clinically strongly correlated with the arthroscopic findings. Clinical diagnosis of frozen shoulder and rotator cuff tears had a weaker correlation with the arthroscopic findings. Of the nine cases of normal clinical examination, abnormality was found at arthroscopy in all cases.There have been very few studies comparing clinical examination of the shoulder with arthroscopic findings. This study emphasises the importance of good clinical examination skills in diagnosing common shoulder abnormalities. The addition of imaging, particularly ultrasound and magnetic resonance imaging further increases the likelihood of an accurate diagnosis. Shoulder examination should be taught with as much emphasis at both undergraduate and postgraduate level as other orthopaedic clinical examinations.Interobserver variation in sonography of the painful shoulder.This study was conducted as a prospective assessment of interobserver variability in the sonographic evaluation of the rotator cuff.Three musculoskeletal radiologists who had different levels of scanning experience each performed shoulder sonography on 24 consecutive patients during 1 patient visit. The diagnostic criteria full-thickness rotator cuff tear, tendon calcification, tendinosis of the supraspinatus, subacromial fluid, subacromial synovial/bursal thickening, dynamic signs of impingement, and abnormality in the long head of biceps tendon were scored, with independent observers recording the data. Statistical analysis was performed using Cohen's kappa test, with significance assessed at p values of less than 0.05.There was good agreement (kappa >0.60, p <0.01) between the experienced operators for full-thickness rotator cuff tear, tendon calcification, dynamic signs of impingement, and abnormality of the long head of biceps tendon. There was no significant agreement between the experienced operators and the less experienced operator in several categories, including (and importantly) full-thickness rotator cuff tears (kappa=0.18-0.21).In experienced hands sonography of the rotator cuff is a reproducible diagnostic test, but agreement is poor when there is marked disparity between the operators' experience levels. Our findings suggest a need for a more clearly defined training curriculum for sonography of the shoulder in radiology training programs.The validity and accuracy of clinical tests used to detect labral pathology of the shoulder--a systematic review.Labral tears frequently require repair [Kim S, Ha K, Han K. Biceps Load test: a clinical test for superior labrum anterior and posterior lesions in shoulders with recurrent anterior dislocations. The American Journal of Sports Medicine 1999;27(3):300-3]. Physiotherapists need confidence in clinical tests used to detect labral pathology to accurately identify this condition. This review systematically evaluates the evidence for the accuracy of these tests with reference to study quality and key biases. Cochrane, Medline, Cinahl, AMED, DARE and HTA databases were searched to identify 15 studies evaluating 15 clinical tests for labral pathology against Magnetic Resonance Imaging MRI or surgery. Two independent reviewers assessed methodological quality using Quality Assessment of Diagnostic Accuracy Studies (QUADAS). Meta Disc calculated likelihood ratios (positive LR>10, providing convincing diagnostic evidence of ruling a condition in; negative LR<0.2 providing large to moderate evidence of ruling the condition out) and true positive rates (TPRs) against false positive rates (FPRs) in receiver operator characteristic (ROC) plots and summary receiver operator curves (SROCs). Probable overestimation of accuracy was caused by use of case control design, verification bias and use of a lesser reference standard. Six accurate tests; Biceps Load I (+LR: 29.09; -LR: 0.09) Biceps Load II (+LR: 26.32; -LR: 0.11), Internal Rotation Resistance (IRRT) (+LR: 24.77; -LR: 0.12), Crank (+LR: 13.59 and 6.46; -LR: 0.1 and 0.22), Kim (+LR: 12.62; -LR:0.21) and Jerk (+LR: 34.71; -LR: 0.27) tests were identified from high quality single studies in selected populations. Subgroup analysis identified varying results of accuracy in the Crank test and the Active Compression (AC) test when evaluated in more than one study. Further evaluation is needed before these tests can be used with confidence.Accuracy of physical examination in subacromial impingement syndrome.Shoulder pain is a common complaint, frequently caused by subacromial impingement syndrome (SIS). There are a number of physical examination (PE) manoeuvres that explore the subacromial space. MRI provides an accurate anatomic image of the subacromial space, being the current gold standard in the diagnosis of SIS. The aim of this study is to evaluate the accuracy of the PE in the diagnosis of SIS and/or subacromial-subdeltoid bursitis (SSB) confirmed by MRI.Consecutive outpatients with an episode of shoulder pain were prospectively included in the study. They were examined by a rheumatologist and, within 3 days, an MRI was done. Sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, and accuracy of PE manoeuvres were calculated using a 2 x 2 table.Fourteen males and 16 females were included. All the tests exhibited acceptable sensitivity. As a result Yocum manoeuvre was considered the most sensitive and most accurate for SIS. With regard to SSB, the Gerber test was the most sensitive. The majority of the PE manoeuvres showed low specificity.Most PE manoeuvres identify reasonably well subacromial impingement of the shoulder, although, in general, they have low specificity. The Yocum test has the best sensitivity and precision. Our data suggest that imaging techniques should be recommended to better define shoulder lesions.Shoulder impingement syndrome.Subacromial impingement syndrome is a common cause of shoulder pain. The purpose of this article is to review the clinical presentation, physical examination findings, and differential diagnosis of impingement syndrome. Using an evidence-based approach, we propose an algorithm for the management of subacromial impingement syndrome including indications for nonoperative management, advanced imaging, and operative management.The rotator cuff functional index.Despite improvements in the clinical assessment of rotator cuff injuries, shortcomings exist in diagnosing rotator cuff tears.To formulate a clinical rotator cuff functional index for predicting rotator cuff tears based on handheld dynamometer measurements for shoulder strength testing and to assess its ability to diagnose a rotator cuff tear.Cohort study (diagnosis); Level of evidence, 2.Preoperative handheld dynamometer measurements, including supraspinatus, external rotation, internal rotation, adduction, and lift-off force, were compared in 100 patients with full-thickness rotator cuff tears (> 1.0 cm) and 100 patients with no rotator cuff injury (confirmed by arthroscopy). Using multiple logistic regression analysis, the rotator cuff functional index and index for rotator cuff tear size were formulated in which 100 represented excellent rotator cuff function and less than 0 indicated a full-thickness supraspinatus tear. Each patient's index was calculated to determine its clinical value in predicting a rotator cuff tear; the Pearson correlation coefficient was established for the rotator cuff functional index for rotator cuff size.Two handheld dynamometer measurements predicted a rotator cuff tear (P < .001, r = 0.53), with rotator cuff functional index = 1.27 * supraspinatus (N) - 0.72 * adduction (N) - 11.6, but not tear size (r = 0.38). In predicting a rotator cuff tear (rotator cuff functional index < 0 = rotator cuff tear; rotator cuff functional index > 0 = no tear), the rotator cuff functional index had 83% sensitivity, 79% specificity, 80% positive predictive value, 82% negative predictive value, likelihood ratio of 4.0 for a positive test result and 0.2 for a negative test result and an accuracy of 81%.The 2 most useful tests for determining a rotator cuff tear with a handheld dynamometer were supraspinatus force and adduction force (as negative control). A functional index based on these measurements was able to rule out a rotator cuff tear and predict the presence but not the size of the tear.Ultrasonographic findings of the shoulder in patients with rheumatoid arthritis and comparison with physical examination.The objectives of this study were: 1) to identify the ultrasonographic (US) abnormalities and 2) to compare the findings of physical examination with US findings in rheumatoid arthritis (RA) patients with shoulder pain. We studied 30 RA patients. Physical examination was performed systemically as follows: 1) area of tenderness; 2) range of passive and active shoulder motion; 3) impingement tests; 4) maneuvers for determining the location of the tendon lesions. US investigations included the biceps, the supraspinatus, infraspinatus, and subscapularis tendons; the subacromial-subdeltoid bursa; and the glenohumeral and acromioclavicular joints. Thirty RA patients with 35 painful and 25 non-painful shoulders were examined. The range of motion affected the most by shoulder pain was abduction. The most frequent US finding of shoulder joint was effusion in the long head of the biceps tendon. Among the rotator cuff tendons, subscapularis was the most frequently involved. Tendon tear was also common among non-painful shoulders. Physical examination used for the diagnosis of shoulder pain had low sensitivity and specificity for detecting abnormalities in the rheumatoid shoulder joint. In conclusion, US abnormalities showed frequent tendon tears in our RA patients. Physical examination had low sensitivity and specificity for detecting rotator cuff tear in the rheumatoid shoulder joint.Subacromial impingement syndrome: the effect of changing posture on shoulder range of movement.Random allocation of subjects into a placebo-controlled, crossover study.To investigate the effect of changing thoracic and scapular posture on shoulder flexion and scapular plane abduction range of motion in asymptomatic subjects, and in subjects with subacromial impingement syndrome.Changes in upper body posture and concomitant imbalance of the muscle system have been proposed as one of the etiological mechanisms leading to subacromial impingement syndrome. Although clinicians commonly assess posture and devise rehabilitation programs to correct posture, there is little evidence to support this practice.Selected postural, range of movement, and pain measurements were investigated in 60 asymptomatic subjects and 60 subjects with subacromial impingement syndrome, prior to and following thoracic and scapular taping intended to change their posture.Changing posture had an effect on all components of posture measured (P<.001) and these changes were associated with a significant increase (P<.001) in the range of motion in shoulder flexion and abduction in the plane of the scapula. Changing posture was not found to have a significant effect on the intensity of pain experienced by the symptomatic subjects, although the point in the range of shoulder elevation at which they experienced their pain was significantly higher (P<.001).The findings of this investigation suggest that changing 1 or more of the components of posture may have a positive effect on shoulder range of movement and the point at which pain is experienced.Lack of uniformity in diagnostic labeling of shoulder pain: time for a different approach.Diagnostic labels for shoulder pain (e.g., frozen shoulder, impingement syndrome) are widely used in international research and clinical practice. However, about 10 years ago it was shown that the criteria to define those labels were not uniform. Since an ongoing lack of uniformity seriously hampers communication and does not serve patients, we decided to evaluate the uniformity in definitions. Therefore, we compared the selection criteria of different randomised controlled trials (RCTs). This comparison revealed some corresponding criteria, but no uniform definition could be derived for any of the diagnostic labels. Besides the lack of uniformity, the currently used labels have only a fair to moderate interobserver reproducibility and in systematic reviews none of the separate trials using a diagnostic label show a large benefit of treatment. This, altogether, seems sufficient reason to reconsider their use. Therefore, we strongly suggest to abolish the use of these labels and direct future research towards undivided populations with "general" shoulder pain. Possible subgroups with a better prognosis and/or treatment result, based on common characteristics that are easily and validly reproducible, can then be identified within these populations.Clinical assessment of superior glenoid labral lesions: a systematic review.Superior labral anterior posterior (SLAP) lesions of the glenoid have proven difficult to diagnose clinically. SLAP-lesion-specific physical examination tests have been developed to improve clinical acumen. Initial reported performance of these tests has not been reproduced by independent investigation. We hypothesized SLAP-specific physical examination tests could not provide a definitive diagnosis of a SLAP lesion. We further intended to elucidate factors responsible for the variable performance of SLAP-specific tests. A review of the literature through Medline and Embase database searches was conducted. All studies with level of evidence of III or better involved in the reporting of diagnostic accuracy of SLAP-specific physical examination tests were included and reviewed. Each instance of independent evaluation of a SLAP-specific examination showed poorer examination performance than in the originating study. Considerable variability existed between independent evaluations of a given SLAP-specific examination as well. We concluded SLAP-specific physical examination results cannot be used as the sole basis of a diagnosis of a SLAP lesion. Differences in patient populations between studies and the accompanying differences in SLAP lesion prevalence and comorbid conditions played the greatest role in test result variance.Scapular involvement in impingement: signs and symptoms.Normal scapular motion is closely integrated with arm motion to provide efficient scapulohumeral rhythm in shoulder function. This rhythm is often disrupted in patients with symptoms and signs of shoulder impingement. A large percentage of patients with shoulder impingement have scapular dyskinesis and alterations in the normal resting position of the scapula or in dynamic scapular motion. Scapular dyskinesis usually manifests as a loss of control in the motions of scapular external rotation and the translation of scapular retraction. This loss of control results in alteration in timing and magnitude of acromial upward rotation, excessive antetilting of the glenoid, and loss of maximal rotator cuff muscle activation capability. These pathophysiologic and pathomechanical alterations cause or increase the dysfunction associated with impingement. Scapular dyskinesis may have proximal or distal causative factors. Proximal factors are mainly associated with muscle factors, and can usually be treated with rehabilitation. Distal factors are mainly caused by internal derangements of joints and frequently require surgical treatment followed by appropriate rehabilitation. Physical examination techniques that specifically evaluate scapular dyskinesis can identify the causative factors and guide treatment and rehabilitation strategies.Physical examination tests of the shoulder: a systematic review with meta-analysis of individual tests.To compile and critique research on the diagnostic accuracy of individual orthopaedic physical examination tests in a manner that would allow clinicians to judge whether these tests are valuable to their practice.A computer-assisted literature search of MEDLINE, CINAHL, and SPORTDiscus databases (1966 to October 2006) using keywords related to diagnostic accuracy of physical examination tests of the shoulder. The Quality Assessment of Diagnostic Accuracy Studies (QUADAS) tool was used to critique the quality of each paper. Meta-analysis through meta-regression of the diagnostic odds ratio (DOR) was performed on the Neer test for impingement, the Hawkins-Kennedy test for impingement, and the Speed test for superior labral pathology.Forty-five studies were critiqued with only half demonstrating acceptable high quality and only two having adequate sample size. For impingement, the meta-analysis revealed that the pooled sensitivity and specificity for the Neer test was 79% and 53%, respectively, and for the Hawkins-Kennedy test was 79% and 59%, respectively. For superior labral (SLAP) tears, the summary sensitivity and specificity of the Speed test was 32% and 61%, respectively. Regarding orthopaedic special tests (OSTs) where meta-analysis was not possible either due to lack of sufficient studies or heterogeneity between studies, the list that demonstrates both high sensitivity and high specificity is short: hornblowers's sign and the external rotation lag sign for tears of the rotator cuff, biceps load II for superior labral anterior to posterior (SLAP) lesions, and apprehension, relocation and anterior release for anterior instability. Even these tests have been under-studied or are from lower quality studies or both. No tests for impingement or acromioclavicular (AC) joint pathology demonstrated significant diagnostic accuracy.Based on pooled data, the diagnostic accuracy of the Neer test for impingement, the Hawkins-Kennedy test for impingement and the Speed test for labral pathology is limited. There is a great need for large, prospective, well-designed studies that examine the diagnostic accuracy of the numerous physical examination tests of the shoulder. Currently, almost without exception, there is a lack of clarity with regard to whether common OSTs used in clinical examination are useful in differentially diagnosing pathologies of the shoulder.The Kim test: a novel test for posteroinferior labral lesion of the shoulder--a comparison to the jerk test.Detection of a posteroinferior labral lesion by physical examination is often difficult.To introduce a novel diagnostic test for detecting a posteroinferior labral lesion of the shoulder.The Kim test can detect a posteroinferior labral lesion of the shoulder.Cohort study (diagnosis); Level of evidence, 1.In 172 painful shoulders, the Kim test was compared with the jerk test and was verified by arthroscopic examination. A sudden onset of posterior shoulder pain and click with or without clunk indicated a positive test result.Thirty-three shoulders had a positive Kim test result, in which 24 had a posteroinferior labral lesion and 9 had a normal posteroinferior labrum. Of 139 shoulders with a negative Kim test result, 6 had a posteroinferior labral tear and 133 had a normal posteroinferior labrum. The sensitivity of the Kim test was 80%, specificity was 94%, positive predictive value was 0.73, and negative predictive value was 0.96. The interexaminer reliability between 2 examiners was 0.91. The accuracy of the jerk test in detecting a posteroinferior labral lesion was the following: sensitivity, 73%; specificity, 98%; positive predictive value, 0.88; and negative predictive value, 0.95. The location of the posterior labral lesion was predominantly posterior in 19 shoulders and predominantly inferior in 11 shoulders. The Kim test was more sensitive in detecting a predominantly inferior labral lesion, whereas the jerk test was more sensitive in detecting a predominantly posterior labral lesion. The sensitivity in detecting a posteroinferior labral lesion increased to 97% when the 2 tests were combined.The Kim test is a reliable diagnostic test for detection of a posteroinferior labral lesion.The belly-off sign: a new clinical diagnostic sign for subscapularis lesions.We describe a new clinical sign for subscapularis lesions that we call the belly-off sign and compare its diagnostic value with standard subscapularis tests (the lift-off test, internal rotation lag sign, and belly-press test/Napoleon sign) in cases of different types of subscapularis lesions. The belly-off sign represents the inability of the patient to maintain the palm of the hand attached to the abdomen with the arm passively brought into flexion and internal rotation.Case series.This descriptive and explorative study included 60 patients (mean age, 55.3 years) with clinical, surgical, and/or magnetic resonance imaging-confirmed evidence of isolated or combined lesions of the subscapularis musculotendinous unit. In all patients, a complete physical shoulder examination was performed and the results were compared with the intraoperative and magnetic resonance imaging findings.The belly-off sign appeared to be more reliable than any other diagnostic test or sign in detecting isolated partial tears of the subscapularis tendon (group I), combined partial subscapularis and complete supraspinatus tendon tears (group II), and postoperative subscapularis insufficiency with mild atrophy of the upper aspect of the subscapularis muscle (group VII). In cases of complete/near complete subscapularis tears with or without supraspinatus and infraspinatus tendon tears (groups IV, V, and VI), the belly-off sign appeared to be as reliable as the belly-press test, internal rotation lag sign, and lift-off test. For assessing partial subscapularis tendon tears and insufficient external rotators (group III), the belly-off sign was less reliable than any other diagnostic test or sign.The belly-off sign represents a promising new clinical diagnostic sign for subscapularis lesions. In particular, subtle lesions of the upper subscapularis tendon and postoperative subscapularis insufficiencies can be detected by the belly-off sign in cases of intact external rotators. In cases of an advanced lack of external rotators, the belly-off sign becomes negative and loses its diagnostic value. We therefore conclude that the belly-off sign is attributable to an unbalanced transverse force couple with overwhelming of the external rotators of the shoulder.Level IV, case series with no, or historical, control group.Reliability of function-related tests in patients with shoulder pathologies.Nonexperimental.To investigate the intertester and intratester reliability of a battery of function-related tests in patients with shoulder pathologies and associated reduced range of motion.A battery of function-related tests has the potential to complement assessment of functional limitation in patients who have shoulder pathologies.Three function-related tests (hand to neck, hand to scapula, and hand to opposite scapula) were conducted on 46 patients with shoulder pathologies, and 46 age- and gender-matched control subjects. The tests were performed by 2 independent physiotherapists to test intertester reliability. Intratester reliability was examined by investigating the reproducibility of the tests performed twice, with 3 to 5 days between tests, by the same physiotherapist. Comparison of the scores on the function-related tests between patients and controls was evaluated. A correlation matrix was calculated to test the level of association among the tests.Intratester and intertester reliability on the 3 tests (weighted K) varied from 0.83 to 0.90. The patient's test performances were decreased in comparison to the control group. The correlation matrix demonstrated a level of associations among the 3 tests varying from r = 0.64 to r = 0.66.The results of this study indicate that function-related tests are reliable and could be used in clinical practice to document reduced function of the shoulder. The level of association among the tests indicates that each test measured different aspects of shoulder function.Most clinical tests cannot accurately diagnose rotator cuff pathology: a systematic review.Do clinical tests accurately diagnose rotator cuff pathology?A systematic review of investigations into the diagnostic accuracy of clinical tests for rotator cuff pathology.People with shoulder pain who underwent clinical testing in order to diagnose rotator cuff pathology.The diagnostic accuracy of clinical tests was determined using likelihood ratios.Thirteen studies met the inclusion criteria. The 13 studies evaluated 14 clinical tests in 89 separate evaluations of diagnostic accuracy. Only one evaluation, palpation for supraspinatus ruptures, resulted in significant positive and negative likelihood ratios. Eight of the 89 evaluations resulted in either significant positive or negative likelihood ratios. However, none of these eight positive or negative likelihood ratios were found in other studies. Of the 89 evaluations of clinical tests 71 (80%) did not result in either significant positive or negative likelihood ratio evaluations across different studies.Overall, most tests for rotator cuff pathology were inaccurate and cannot be recommended for clinical use. At best, suspicion of a rotator cuff tear may be heightened by a positive palpation, combined Hawkins/painful arc/infraspinatus test, Napoleon test, lift-off test, belly-press test, or drop-arm test, and it may be reduced by a negative palpation, empty can test or Hawkins-Kennedy test.Shoulder strength in asymptomatic individuals with intact compared with torn rotator cuffs.Normative data are essential to the evaluation of shoulder function. The purposes of this study were to establish a normative database of isometric shoulder strength measured in asymptomatic individuals verified to have intact rotator cuffs and to determine the effect of asymptomatic rotator cuff tears on shoulder strength.Two hundred and thirty-seven volunteers with no shoulder pain or history of shoulder injury were screened with ultrasonography bilaterally for rotator cuff tears and then underwent isometric strength measurements for abduction in the scapular plane and external rotation. Statistical analysis was performed to evaluate the effect of age, body habitus, hand dominance, and the presence of a rotator cuff tear on shoulder strength.Of the 237 volunteers, forty-one were found to have a torn rotator cuff in at least one shoulder. The prevalence of rotator cuff tears was 0% for the subjects between forty and forty-nine years old; 10%, between fifty and fifty-nine years old; 20%, between sixty and sixty-nine years old; and 40.7% for those seventy years old or older. Both abduction strength and external rotation strength in the male subjects showed an age-dependent decrease, whereas only abduction strength showed an age-dependent decrease in the female subjects. In multiple regression analysis, age and weight were the most important predictors of abduction strength and external rotation strength, respectively. In the shoulders with a large-to-massive full-thickness rotator cuff tear, abduction strength was significantly decreased (p = 0.007). Additionally, the ratio of abduction strength to external rotation strength was significantly decreased in the shoulders with a large-to-massive full-thickness tear compared with the shoulders with an intact rotator cuff (p < 0.001).There is a high prevalence of rotator cuff tears in elderly asymptomatic individuals. Asymptomatic shoulders with a large-to-massive full-thickness rotator cuff tear have significantly decreased abduction strength. When there is a substantial decrease in abduction strength in relation to external rotation strength, the presence of an asymptomatic full-thickness tear should be suspected in that shoulder. Previous studies establishing normative values for isometric shoulder strength may have been skewed by the presence of asymptomatic rotator cuff tears in elderly subgroups.Diagnostic accuracy of clinical tests for superior labral anterior posterior lesions: a systematic review.Systematic literature review.To conduct a systematic review of case series and clinical trials that investigate the diagnostic accuracy of clinical tests for superior labral anterior posterior (SLAP) lesions.Primary contact practitioners are often presented with shoulder problems and use a battery of clinical tests to reach a diagnosis. Early detection of SLAP pathology may lead to more optimal interventions and better outcomes for patients.The OVID search interface was utilized with MEDLINE, AHMED, CINAHL, and SPORTDiscus databases searched from 1996-2006. Studies were retrieved that included patients with shoulder pain who underwent at least 1 clinical shoulder test for SLAP lesions. For an article to be included in this review, the results of the clinical tests needed to be compared with findings on arthroscopy. Quality of the manuscripts included in this review were rated using the QUADAS appraisal tool, so comparisons could be made across studies.Seventeen published manuscripts fit the inclusion/exclusion criteria and were used for this review. Eight studies were found to be of high quality. Within these 8 studies, 1 group of authors reported high diagnostic accuracy values for the crank test: sensitivity, 91% (95% confidence interval [CI], 76%-97%); specificity, 93% (95% CI, 79%-88%); positive likelihood ratio, 13.6 (95% CI, 3.6-52.1); and negative likelihood ratio, 0.1 (95% CI, 0.0-0.3). One study on the resisted supination external rotation test also scored high on the QUADAS and reported diagnostic accuracy values of 83% (95% CI, 66-92), 82% (95% CI, 52-95), 4.6 (95% CI, 1.3-16.1), and 0.20 (95% CI, 0.1-0.5), respectively. Of significance is the fact that the majority of papers reporting highly accurate clinical diagnostic tests were of low quality with the results not supported by other authors.It appears that no single test is sensitive or specific enough to determine the presence of a SLAP lesion accurately. Further research is required to determine whether subgrouping of patients by mechanism of injury or the type of SLAP lesion may improve diagnostic accuracy. Determining the diagnostic accuracy of a combination of 2 or more tests is also needed.The effect of rotator cuff tear size on shoulder strength and range of motion.Prospective cohort study.To determine the effect of rotator cuff tear size on shoulder strength and range of motion.Patients with rotator cuff pathology typically present with weakness and motion loss in various motions. The extent to which the presence of a rotator cuff tear and the size of the tear affect strength and range of motion is not well understood.Sixty-one patients scheduled for surgery, with a diagnosis of a rotator cuff tear and/or subacromial impingement, underwent examination for shoulder pain, function, range of motion, and strength. The extent of rotator cuff pathology was documented during subsequent surgery (presence of tear, tear size, tear thickness).There were 10 massive tears, 15 large tears, 13 medium tears, 12 small tears, and 11 rotator cuffs without a tear. Patients had marked weakness in abduction strength at 90 degrees and 10 degrees of abduction, in external rotation strength at 90 degrees, and in the "full can test" (all, P<.0001). Marked range of motion losses in shoulder flexion and external rotation at 0 degrees and 90 degrees abduction (all, P<.001) were also observed. Abduction strength deficit at 10 degrees was affected by rotator cuff tear size (P<.0001). Twenty of 25 patients with large or massive tears had deficits greater than 50%, compared with only 1 of 11 patients with no tear, 2 of 12 patients with a small tear, and 5 of 13 patients with a medium tear (P<.0001). Other strength and range of motion deficits or indices of pain and function were unaffected by tear size.Weakness of greater than 50% relative to the contralateral side in shoulder abduction at 10 degrees of abduction was indicative of a large or massive rotator cuff tear.Indications for rotator cuff repair: a systematic review.Despite the popularity of surgical repair of rotator cuff tears, literature regarding the indications for and timing of surgery are sparse. We performed a systematic review of the literature to investigate factors influencing the decision to surgically repair symptomatic, full-thickness rotator cuff tears. Specifically, how do demographic variables, duration of symptoms, timing of surgery, physical examination findings, and size of tear affect treatment outcome and indications for surgery? We reviewed the best available evidence, which offers some guidelines for surgical decision making. Variables suggest earlier surgical intervention may be needed in the setting of weakness and substantial functional disability. With regard to demographic variables, the evidence is unclear regarding their association with treatment outcome. However, older chronological age does not seem to portend a worse outcome. Pending worker's compensation claims does seem to negatively affect treatment results. Further research is required to define the indications for surgery for full thickness rotator cuff tears. However, the design and conduct of an ethical study to obtain Level I evidence on this issue will be a major challenge.Clinical inquiries. What is the best way to diagnose a suspected rotator cuff tear?The evaluation of a suspected rotator cuff tear should start with a history and a clinical exam of the shoulder (strength of recommendation [SOR]: B, based on a systematic review of cohort studies). Three clinical test results in particular--supraspinatus weakness, weakness of external rotation, and impingement--or 2 positive tests for a patient older than 60 years were highly predictive of rotator cuff tear (SOR: B, based on individual prospective study). Either magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) or ultrasound can confirm a possible full-thickness tear (SOR: B, based on a systematic review of cohort studies). If a patient has an implantable device prohibiting MRI imaging, conventional arthrography is an alternative (SOR: A, individual randomized controlled trial). Suspected partial-thickness tears are best verified with an ultrasound (SOR: B, based on a systematic review of cohort studies).Internal impingement of the shoulder.Internal impingement of the shoulder is a pathologic condition characterized by excessive or repetitive contact of the greater tuberosity of the humeral head with the posterosuperior aspect of the glenoid when the arm is abducted and externally rotated. This arm positioning leads to rotator cuff and glenoid labrum impingement by the bony structures of the glenohumeral joint. Although some degree of contact between these structures occurs under normal conditions, to date most of the orthopaedic literature has focused on internal impingement as a disease state that affects overhead athletes and is characterized by the development of articular-sided rotator cuff tears and posterosuperior labral lesions. The precise cause of these impingement lesions remains unclear. However, it is believed that varying degrees of glenohumeral instability, posterior capsular contracture, and scapular dyskinesis may play a role in the development of symptomatic internal impingement. The purpose of this article is to review the pathomechanics, clinical complaints, physical examination findings, and imaging findings that are associated with internal impingement. The results of treatment will be reviewed, and a diagnostic and therapeutic algorithm for the management of internal impingement is presented.Shoulder: what the orthopaedic doctor needs to know.Diagnosing shoulder pathology accurately requires both clinical expertise and the ability to interpret and correlate radiographic studies. Variational anatomy of the shoulder combined with the complexity of physical examination makes this difficult. Physical examination of the shoulder often leaves the surgeon with more than one working diagnosis. Imaging studies of the shoulder are more valuable if used to confirm a working diagnosis as opposed to reading the study in a vacuum. Clinical correlation should also be considered for any and all findings on an imaging study. Collaboration of the surgeon and the radiologist is essential in reducing the number of over-reported findings that are clinically insignificant. The surgeon should directly communicate with the radiologist as to his or her working diagnosis and the goal of the study. In this way the surgeon and radiologist become superior diagnosticians.Intra- and interexaminer reliability of four manual shoulder maneuvers used to identify subacromial pain.Shoulder pain is a diagnostic challenge and the physical clinical examination of the shoulder is crucial. It is important that the diagnostic tests used are valid as well as reliable. The objective of the study was to assess intra- and interexaminer reliability for four manual shoulder maneuvers; the Neer impingement sign, the Hawkins-Kennedy impingement test, the Patte maneuver, the Jobe supraspinatus test. These maneuvers are frequently used in clinical practice to examine patients with shoulder complaints in which subacromial pain is highly suspected. Thirty-three participants with shoulder pain were included consecutively. Within a week from inclusion, the four maneuvers were performed by a physiotherapist. The procedure was standardized in order to increase reproducibility. After a week, the maneuvers were performed again by the same physical therapist (test-retest) and by another physical therapist (test for interexaminer reliability). All four maneuvers have an almost perfect agreement (Kappa coefficients 0.91-1.00), if performed with suggested standardizations. Neer impingement sign, Hawkins-Kennedy impingement test, Patte maneuver as well as Jobe supraspinatus test, are highly reproducible and therefore reliable to use in clinical practice to identify patients with subacromial pain with an impingement phenomenon, but the maneuvers are limited as structural discriminators.Temporal variations in a modified Neer impingement test can confound clinical interpretation.High variability in the time required for patients to have substantial pain relief after Neer-type subacromial impingement tests might help explain conflicting data regarding their effectiveness in guiding treatment and predicting surgical outcomes. To focus on quantifying temporal variability associated with a modified (local anesthetic and corticosteroid) impingement test, we hypothesized that substantial pain relief (greater than 75% reduction) can occur beyond the 10-minute interval many clinicians use for determining results of this test. Fourteen females and 12 males (mean age, 55.6 years) who received subacromial injections for Stage II impingement completed 10-cm visual analog scales for pain at 5, 10, 20, 30, and 40 minutes postinjection. There were 11 patients (42%) who attained at least 75% relief by 10 minutes compared with nine (35%) additional patients who subsequently attained 75% relief after 10 minutes. On average, 75% reduction in pain did not occur until after 30 minutes postinjection. Data analysis also revealed two groups: (1) rapid responders with greater than 50% pain relief by 10 minutes; and (2) delayed responders with greater than 50% pain relief after 10 minutes. Assessing pain at 10 minutes for a Neer-type impingement test can fail to accurately determine a positive test in a substantial percentage of patients.A new SLAP test: the supine flexion resistance test.This study describes a new test to detect SLAP lesions. The sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values with respect to the diagnosis of a SLAP lesion were determined in comparison to Speed's test and the O'Brien test.One hundred fifty patients presenting for arthroscopic surgery with persisting pain or functional disability of the shoulder underwent a complete shoulder examination. All patients underwent Speed's test, the O'Brien test, and the new supine flexion resistance test. The clinical results of the tests were correlated with the presence of a SLAP lesion by direct arthroscopic visualization.The supine flexion resistance test had a sensitivity of 80% and a specificity of 69%, whereas Speed's test and the O'Brien test had sensitivities of 60% and 94%, respectively, and specificities of 38% and 28%, respectively. Regarding isolated SLAP lesions, the supine flexion resistance test was highly sensitive, with a sensitivity of 92% (58% for Speed's test and 75% for the O'Brien test). For isolated tears of the supraspinatus, the specificity of the supine flexion resistance test was 75% (14% for Speed's test and 17% for the O'Brien test).Compared with the O'Brien test and Speed's test, the supine flexion resistance test proves to be more specific, with a specificity of 69% for the whole study population (28% for the O'Brien test and 38% for Speed's test) and with a specificity of 75% for the group of patients with isolated supraspinatus lesions (17% for the O'Brien test and 14% for Speed's test). The new test is a useful and effective test for detecting type II SLAP lesions. The high specificity enables the elimination of false-positive results of other clinical tests that are more sensitive but not specific.Level II, development of diagnostic criteria with consecutive patients and universally applied gold standard.Interobserver reliability of physical examination of shoulder girdle.The object of this study was to assess interobserver reliability in 23 tests concerning physical examination of the shoulder girdle. A physical therapist and a physical therapist/manual therapist independently performed a physical examination of the shoulder girdle in 91 patients with shoulder complaints of varying severity and duration. The observers assessed 23 items in total: active and passive abductions, passive external rotation, hand in neck (HIN) test, hand in back (HIB) test, impingement test according to Neer, springing test of the first rib and joint play test of the acromioclavicular joint. The interobserver reliability was evaluated by means of a Cohen's Kappa, the weighted Kappa and the intraclass correlation (ICC). Criteria for acceptable reliability were: Kappa value>or=0.60, ICC>or=0.75 or an absolute agreement>or=80%. The results showed that Kappa values varied from 0.09 (springing test first rib, stiffness) to 0.66 (springing test first rib, pain), weighted Kappa varied from 0.35 (pain during HIB) to 0.73 (range of motion HIB) and ICC varied from 0.54 (abduction passive starting point painful arc) to 0.96 (active and passive ranges of motion in abduction). In total 11 (48%) items fulfilled the criteria of acceptable reliability. In conclusion, there appears to be a great deal of variation in the reliability of the tests used in the physical examination of the shoulder girdle. Over 50% of the tests did not meet the statistical criteria for acceptable reliability.Special physical examination tests for superior labrum anterior posterior shoulder tears are clinically limited and invalid: a diagnostic systematic review.The diagnosis of a superior labrum anterior posterior (SLAP) lesion through physical examination has been widely reported in the literature. Most of these studies report high sensitivities and specificities, and claim to be accurate, valid, and reliable. The purpose of this study was to critically evaluate these studies to determine if there was sufficient evidence to support the use of the SLAP physical examination tests as valid and reliable diagnostic test procedures.Strict epidemiologic methodology was used to obtain and collate all relevant articles. Sackett's guidelines were applied to all articles. Confidence intervals and likelihood ratios were determined.Fifteen of 29 relevant studies met the criteria for inclusion. Only one article met all of Sackett's critical appraisal criteria. Confidence intervals for both the positive and negative likelihood ratios contained the value 1.The current literature being used as a resource for teaching in medical schools and continuing education lacks the validity necessary to be useful. There are no good physical examination tests that exist for effectively diagnosing a SLAP lesion.Anterior and posterior instability of the long head of the biceps tendon in rotator cuff tears: a new classification based on arthroscopic observations.The purpose of this study was to evaluate arthroscopically the frequency and type of instability of the long head of the biceps (LHB) tendon in patients undergoing rotator cuff repair.In 200 consecutive patients undergoing arthroscopic rotator cuff repair, LHB instability was assessed statically and dynamically in the anteroposterior direction. In addition, macroscopic lesions of the LHB, as well as lesions of the adjacent rotator cuff tendons, were documented.LHB instability (subluxation or dislocation) was found in 45% of patients, with isolated anterior instability in 16%, isolated posterior instability in 19%, and combined anteroposterior instability in 10%. Whereas LHB subluxations were observed in both directions, dislocations were only seen in anterior LHB instability. Anterior instability was more associated with a subscapularis lesion, whereas posterior instability was more associated with a supraspinatus tear. Lesions of the LHB tendon were strongly associated with LHB instability and the size of the rotator cuff tear.In 200 patients with rotator cuff tears LHB instability could be observed arthroscopically in 45%, with 16% being anterior, 19% being posterior, and 10% being anteroposterior. LHB instability was associated with LHB lesions, with 15% of the LHB tendons showing a normal appearance when unstable versus 70% when stable. Preoperative O'Brien and Speed tests did not correlate with intraoperative observed LHB pathology. The size of the rotator cuff tear could be correlated with the grade of LHB lesion, becoming more significant with augmenting tear size. On the basis of these observations, we created a new arthroscopic classification of LHB instability with respect to the direction and extent of LHB instability, lesions of the LHB, and status of the adjacent rotator cuff tendons.Level IV, diagnostic study with poor reference standard.Partial-thickness rotator cuff tears.Partial-thickness tears of the rotator cuff have been diagnosed with increased frequency because of a heightened awareness of the condition by clinicians and improved diagnostic methods. Research into the causes, natural history, and optimal treatment of this condition lags behind that of full-thickness tears. However, despite the limitations in the existing literature, there has emerged a consensus among shoulder experts that partial-thickness rotator cuff tears should be aggressively treated in the active athlete because of the unfavorable natural history of these lesions and success of accepted surgical algorithms. This review will provide an overview of the theories regarding the origins of partial-thickness rotator cuff tears, discuss the relative accuracy of accepted diagnostic techniques, and summarize the indications and methods of operative repair with an emphasis on the results of various treatment approaches.Physical examination and magnetic resonance imaging in the diagnosis of superior labrum anterior-posterior lesions of the shoulder: a sensitivity analysis.The overall purpose of our study was to examine the sensitivity of physical examination, magnetic resonance imaging (MRI), and magnetic resonance (MR) arthrogram for the identification of arthroscopically confirmed SLAP lesions of the shoulder.An analysis of 51 consecutive patients with arthroscopically confirmed SLAP lesions and no history of shoulder dislocation was performed. Before undergoing surgery, all patients underwent a standardized physical examination and had either an MRI and/or MR arthrogram performed. Sensitivity analysis was then performed on the results of both the physical examination maneuvers and the radiologic imaging compared to the arthroscopic findings at surgery.The sensitivity of O'Brien's (active compression) test was 90%, whereas the Mayo (dynamic) shear was 80% and Jobe's relocation test was 76%. The sensitivity of a physical examination with any 1 of these 3 SLAP provocative tests being positive was 100%. Neer's sign (41%) and Hawkin's impingement tests (31%) each had low sensitivity for SLAP lesions. The sensitivity of MRI for SLAP lesions was 67% when interpreted by the performing surgeon, 53% when read by a radiologist. When the MR arthrograms were analyzed alone, the sensitivity was 72% (surgeon) and 50% (radiologist), respectively.All 3 physical examination maneuvers traditionally considered provocative for SLAP pathology (O'Brien's, Mayo shear, and Jobe's relocation) were sensitive for the diagnosis of SLAP lesions. MRI and MR arthrogram imaging had lower sensitivity than these physical examination tests in diagnosing SLAP lesions. Patient history, demographics, and the surgeon's physical examination should remain central to the diagnosis of SLAP lesions.Level II, development of diagnostic criteria on basis of consecutive patients with universally applied gold standard.Screening the athlete's shoulder for impingement symptoms: a clinical reasoning algorithm for early detection of shoulder pathology.Chronic shoulder pain and dysfunction are common complaints among overhead athletes seeking care from physical medicine and rehabilitation. Impingement is a frequently described pathological condition in the overhead athlete. Impingement symptoms may be the result of rotator cuff pathology, shoulder instability, scapular dyskinesis or muscle dysfunction, biceps pathology, SLAP lesions and chronic stiffness of the posterior capsule. At present, numerous different shoulder tests have been described in literature and discussed with respect to their individual diagnostic accuracy. However, in view of the number of shoulder tests, it is often a challenge for the clinician to select the appropriate tests for diagnosing the underlying pathology. The purpose of this paper is to present and discuss a clinical algorithm which may be used in the early detection of the underlying causes of impingement symptoms. In this algorithm, a specific chronology and selection of diagnostic tests may offer the clinician a guideline in his physical examination of the athlete with shoulder pain.Shoulder impingement syndrome: relationships between clinical, functional, and radiologic findings.Although there has been much research about imaging methods for shoulder impingement syndrome, the clinical information and upper limb level of disability have been generally ignored. The purpose of this study was to detect the relationships between clinical, functional, and radiologic variables in patients with shoulder impingement syndrome.A cross-sectional, clinical, and radiologic study was planned and 59 shoulders of 58 consecutive patients waiting for physical therapy because of a clinically suspected shoulder impingement syndrome were included into this study. Comprehensive clinical examination, radiography, shoulder ultrasonography, and magnetic resonance imaging were performed in the same month.Despite the high sensitivities of ultrasonography for diagnosing rotator cuff tears (98.1%) and biceps pathologies (100%), magnetic resonance imaging was superior to ultrasonography in many important shoulder structures such as a glenoid labral tear and subacromial bursal effusion/hypertrophy (P < 0.01). These structures were the determinants of the shoulder's disability measured by disabilities of the arm, shoulder, and hand questionnaire.Ultrasonography and magnetic resonance imaging had comparable high accuracy for identifying the biceps pathologies and rotator cuff tears. The basic clinical tests had modest accuracy in both disorders. The choice of which imaging test to perform should be based on the patient's clinical information (regarding lesion of glenoid labrum, joint capsule, muscle, and bone), cost, and imaging experience of the radiology department.Tears of the subscapularis tendon in athletes--diagnosis and repair techniques.Isolated injury to the subscapularis tendon is an uncommon - but potentially debilitating - injury among athletes. The most frequent injury pattern seen in younger athletes is an acute, traumatic tendon avulsion. In the older athletic population, chronic degenerative tearing of the tendon may precede sports-related rupture, particularly following shoulder dislocation. This article reviews how to diagnose this injury in athletes, and describes both conservative and operative treatment options and their outcomes.Shoulder pain: diagnosis and management in primary care.Unstable isolated SLAP lesion: clinical presentation and outcome of arthroscopic fixation.The purpose of this study was to describe the clinical presentation and sensitivity of testing of unstable isolated SLAP (superior labrum anterior posterior) lesions and to evaluate the efficacy of arthroscopic treatment.Case series.A retrospective review was made of 44 unstable SLAP lesions in 41 patients (40 male, 1 female) who did not have other pathologic shoulder findings. The mean follow-up period was 33 months (range, 25 to 67 months) and the mean age at the time of surgery was 24 years (range, 17 to 43 years). Twenty-six patients had an injury on the dominant shoulder and 3 had bilateral shoulder involvement. Arthroscopic fixation was performed with the use of a biodegradable tack (Suretac; Acufex, Mansfield, MA) in 14 cases, and with a screw-type metallic suture anchor (mini-Revo; Linvatec, Largo, FL) in 30 cases.Pain (100%) and clicking (57%) were the most common symptoms. The compression-rotation test was positive in 84% of the patients before surgery. The average UCLA score at the last follow-up was 32.3 points; 22 cases were graded excellent, 16 good, and 6 poor. Based on the postoperative performance data collected from 33 athletes, 25 of them (76%) were able to return to their athletic activities. Among them, throwing athletes showed statistically better performance than did nonthrowing athletes (P = .011).Pain, followed by clicking, was the most common symptom, and the most common sign was a positive compression rotation test. Arthroscopic treatment of unstable isolated SLAP lesions resulted in good or excellent UCLA scores in 86% of the patients. Throwing athletes showed more satisfactory results than nonthrowing athletes.Type IV, case series with no, or historical, control group.Superior labral lesions anterior to posterior-evaluation and arthroscopic management.Lesions of the superior labrum are complex and difficult to both diagnose and treat effectively. The clinical diagnosis is challenging due to the nonspecific history and physical examination. MRI has substantially improved our ability to detect SLAP tears, although experience is necessary to distinguish pathologic findings from normal anatomic variants. Treatment is determined by patient age, functional demands, and the type of lesion identified.Effect of the Scapula Reposition Test on shoulder impingement symptoms and elevation strength in overhead athletes.Two group, repeated measures design.To determine whether manually repositioning the scapula using the Scapula Reposition Test (SRT) reduces pain and increases shoulder elevation strength in athletes with and without positive signs of shoulder impingement.Symptom alteration tests may be useful in determining a subset of those with shoulder pathology who may benefit from interventions aimed at improving scapular motion abnormalities.One hundred forty-two college athletes underwent testing for clinical signs of shoulder impingement. Tests provoking symptoms were repeated with the scapula manually repositioned into greater retraction and posterior tilt. A numeric rating scale was used to measure symptom intensity under both conditions. Isometric shoulder elevation strength was measured using a mounted dynamometer with the scapula in its natural position and with manual repositioning. A paired t test was used to compare the strength between positions. The frequency of a significant increase in strength with scapular repositioning, defined as the minimal detectable change (90% confidence interval), was also assessed.Of the 98 athletes with a positive impingement test, 46 had reduced pain with scapular repositioning. Although repositioning produced an increase in strength in both the impingement (P=.001) and non-impingement groups (P=.012), a significant increase in strength was found with repositioning in only 26% of athletes with, and 29% of athletes without positive signs for shoulder impingement.The SRT is a simple clinical test that may potentially be useful in an impairment based classification approach to shoulder problems.A 'one-stop clinic' for the diagnosis and management of rotator cuff pathology: Getting the right diagnosis first time.We have introduced a one-stop clinic for the diagnosis and management of rotator cuff tears (RCTs). The aim of the study was to determine the effect of the one-stop clinic on the interval and delay in management for patients with suspected rotator cuff pathology.Seventy-four patients were reviewed retrospectively; 39 had an ultrasound of the shoulder before (group 1), and 35 patients after (group 2) the new protocol was introduced. Patients in group 2 had a shoulder ultrasound scan (USS) on the day of their clinic appointment or beforehand based upon the General Practitioners (GP) letter. Indications included patients over the age of 30, or patients with a history of trauma or a painful shoulder.Twenty-four patients were diagnosed with RCTs on USS with an overall sensitivity of 93.75%, specificity 100% and accuracy of 91% for full thickness tears. Clinical detection alone had an overall sensitivity of 80%, a specificity of 91% and accuracy of 87%. Mean time from GP referral to definitive management plan was 6.49 months (SD 2.74) in group 1, compared with 4.63 months (SD 1.43) in group 2 with an overall reduction in half the number of clinic appointments. This was statistically significant (p < 0.001).Ultrasound scan of the shoulder is an accurate and reliable method of detecting full thickness RCTs. The one-stop clinic significantly shortened the interval between GP referral and definitive management.Reliability and diagnostic accuracy of history and physical examination for diagnosing glenoid labral tears.Glenoid labral tears provide a diagnostic challenge.Combinations of items in the patient history and physical examination will provide stronger diagnostic accuracy to suggest the presence or absence of glenoid labral tear than will individual items.Cohort study (diagnosis); Level of evidence, 1.History and examination findings in patients with shoulder pain (N = 55) were compared with arthroscopic findings to determine diagnostic accuracy and intertester reliability.The intertester reliability of the crank, anterior slide, and active compression tests was 0.20 to 0.24. A combined history of popping or catching and positive crank or anterior slide results yielded specificities of 0.91 and 1.00 and positive likelihood ratios of 3.0 and infinity, respectively. A positive anterior slide result combined with either a positive active compression or crank result yielded specificities of 0.91 and positive likelihood ratio of 2.75 and 3.75, respectively. Requiring only a single positive finding in the combination of popping or catching and the anterior slide or crank yielded sensitivities of 0.82 and 0.89 and negative likelihood ratios of 0.31 and 0.33, respectively.The diagnostic accuracy of individual tests in previous studies is quite variable, which may be explained in part by the modest reliability of these tests. The combination of popping or catching with a positive crank or anterior slide result or a positive anterior slide result with a positive active compression or crank test result suggests the presence of a labral tear. The combined absence of popping or catching and a negative anterior slide or crank result suggests the absence of a labral tear.Partial-thickness rotator cuff tears.Partial-thickness rotator cuff tears are not a single entity; rather, they represent a spectrum of disease states. Although often asymptomatic, they can be significantly disabling. Overhead throwing athletes with partial-thickness rotator cuff tears differ with respect to etiology, goals, and treatment from older, nonathlete patients with degenerative tears. Pathogenesis of degenerative partial-thickness tears is multifactorial, with evidence of intrinsic and extrinsic factors playing key roles. Diagnosis of partial-thickness rotator cuff tears should be based on the patient's symptoms together with magnetic resonance imaging studies. Conservative treatment is successful in most patients. Surgery generally is considered for patients with symptoms of sufficient duration and intensity. The role of acromioplasty has not been clearly delineated, but it should be considered when there is evidence of extrinsic causation for the partial-thickness rotator cuff tear.Diagnostic accuracy of shoulder ultrasound performed by a single operator.Both diagnostic ultrasound and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) are used for investigation of the presence and severity of rotator cuff lesions. There is no consensus as to which is the more accurate and cost-effective study. We sought to examine the sensitivity of ultrasound, when used by one experienced radiologist with modern equipment. We compared the ultrasound and surgical results obtained from 68 patients. Ultrasound showed a sensitivity of 89% and specificity of 100% (Positive Predictive Value 100%) for full-thickness tears, and a sensitivity of 79% and specificity of 94% (Positive Predictive Value 87%) for partial-thickness tears. We found that shoulder ultrasound, in the hands of an experienced radiologist with the use of modern high-resolution equipment, is highly sensitive in differentiating complete tears and partial-thickness tears. Our results are similar to the best published results for MRI and given that ultrasound is significantly cheaper and more available, ultrasound by an experienced radiologist should be considered as a primary diagnostic tool for imaging the rotator cuff.The resisted supination external rotation test: a new test for the diagnosis of superior labral anterior posterior lesions.To evaluate a new clinical test, the resisted supination external rotation test, for the diagnosis of superior labral anterior posterior lesions of the shoulder.Cohort study (diagnosis); Level of evidence, 2.Forty athletes (average age, 23.9 years) with activity-related shoulder pain were enrolled in the study. The patients underwent 3 different tests designed specifically to detect superior labral anterior posterior lesions (the resisted supination external rotation test, the crank test, and the active compression test); the tests were performed in a random order on the affected shoulder. The results of the tests were compared with arthroscopic findings.Out of 40 athletes, 29 (72.5%) had superior labral anterior posterior tears. The resisted supination external rotation test had the highest sensitivity (82.8%), specificity (81.8%), positive predictive value (92.3%), negative predictive value (64.3%), and diagnostic accuracy (82.5%) of all tests performed.By re-creating the peel-back mechanism, the resisted supination external rotation test is more accurate than 2 other commonly used physical examination tests designed to diagnose superior labral anterior posterior tears in overhead-throwing athletes. By using this test in the context of a thorough clinical history and physical examination, lesions of the superior labrum can be more reliably diagnosed.MR shoulder arthrography in patients younger than 40 years of age: frequency of rotator cuff tear versus labroligamentous pathology.The purpose of this study was to compare the frequency of rotator cuff pathology versus labroligamentous pathology in patients younger than 40 years and to determine whether routine MR arthrography is justified in all patients in this age group, regardless of the clinical symptoms. The MR arthrography was carried out on 332 patients 40 years of age and younger. Two hundred and forty-three patients had clinical history of instability and possible labroligamentous pathology. Eighty-nine patients had no history or physical signs of instability and were referred for reasons other than instability, such as assessment for rotator cuff tear. In the 243 patients younger than 40 years with clinical history of potential labral pathology, 39% (95/243) showed a labral tear and 2.1% (5/243) had a full-thickness rotator cuff tendon tear. In the 89 patients with no history suggesting labral pathology, 19% (17/89) showed an unsuspected labral tear and 4.5% (4/89) had a full-thickness rotator cuff tear. These findings suggest that, regardless of the clinical indication for referral, patients aged 40 and less referred for shoulder MRI should be imaged using MR arthrography because of the significant risk that symptoms are related to unsuspected labral pathology.Subscapularis tendon tears.Pathology of the subscapularis tendon is both infrequently identified and not commonly considered as a major source of shoulder pain and dysfunction. Subscapularis tendon pathology can present as isolated tears; partial-thickness tears; anterosuperior tears, also involving the supraspinatus tendon; complete rotator cuff avulsion; and rotator interval lesions, in which instability of the long head of the biceps tendon may dominate the clinical presentation. Although an accurate physical examination is paramount, modalities such as arthroscopy, magnetic resonance imaging, and ultrasound have advanced knowledge of the spectrum of abnormalities involving the subscapularis tendon. Nonsurgical management may be effective for most partial tears. Surgically, open repair is more frequent than use of arthroscopic techniques. Tears of the subscapularis tendon portend a different prognosis than do supraspinatus tendon tears, especially when the injury is acute and diagnosis is delayed.Identifying SLAP lesions: a meta-analysis of clinical tests and exercise in clinical reasoning.To identify all published accounts of diagnostic accuracy for clinical tests of Superior Labral Antero-Posterior (SLAP) lesion of the shoulder, and provide an estimate of the pooled likelihood ratio for those tests that have been evaluated at least three times. A clinical reasoning exercise is presented to illustrate clinical useability of the findings.Systematic review and meta-analysis.An extensive review of international electronic databases was performed to identify all published works of diagnostic accuracy of any test proposed to be diagnostic for SLAP lesions of the shoulder. Statistical pooling of likelihood ratios was performed using a random-effects model to provide an estimate of the pooled positive likelihood ratio (PLR) for each test with at least three data points available.Twelve studies describing 14 tests were identified. Five tests had been evaluated at least 3 times in the published literature. Methodologic quality scoring was performed and data were extracted. The pooled PLR revealed that of the five tests studies, only Yergason's test demonstrates consistent evidence of significant diagnostic accuracy (PLR 2.29). Heterogeneity of effect sizes was present for the Crank test. The heterogeneity was substantially improved through removal of the effect from the study in which the test was initially described and validated. The fail-safe N statistic suggests that the findings for Yergason's test are robust to publication bias. None of the tests reviewed are very strong.Among the clinical tests for SLAP lesions that have been published to date, Yergason's test is the only one that shows a significant ability to influence clinical decision making, based on the results of the current analysis. Methodologic inadequacies in the reporting of the publications are common, and caution must be exercised when drawing inferences from the results of these studies.Special physical examination tests for superior labrum anterior posterior shoulder tears are clinically limited and invalid: a diagnostic systematic review.The diagnosis of a superior labrum anterior posterior (SLAP) lesion through physical examination has been widely reported in the literature. Most of these studies report high sensitivities and specificities, and claim to be accurate, valid, and reliable. The purpose of this study was to critically evaluate these studies to determine if there was sufficient evidence to support the use of the SLAP physical examination tests as valid and reliable diagnostic test procedures.Strict epidemiologic methodology was used to obtain and collate all relevant articles. Sackett's guidelines were applied to all articles. Confidence intervals and likelihood ratios were determined.Fifteen of 29 relevant studies met the criteria for inclusion. Only one article met all of Sackett's critical appraisal criteria. Confidence intervals for both the positive and negative likelihood ratios contained the value 1.The current literature being used as a resource for teaching in medical schools and continuing education lacks the validity necessary to be useful. There are no good physical examination tests that exist for effectively diagnosing a SLAP lesion.Shoulder strength in asymptomatic individuals with intact compared with torn rotator cuffs.Normative data are essential to the evaluation of shoulder function. The purposes of this study were to establish a normative database of isometric shoulder strength measured in asymptomatic individuals verified to have intact rotator cuffs and to determine the effect of asymptomatic rotator cuff tears on shoulder strength.Two hundred and thirty-seven volunteers with no shoulder pain or history of shoulder injury were screened with ultrasonography bilaterally for rotator cuff tears and then underwent isometric strength measurements for abduction in the scapular plane and external rotation. Statistical analysis was performed to evaluate the effect of age, body habitus, hand dominance, and the presence of a rotator cuff tear on shoulder strength.Of the 237 volunteers, forty-one were found to have a torn rotator cuff in at least one shoulder. The prevalence of rotator cuff tears was 0% for the subjects between forty and forty-nine years old; 10%, between fifty and fifty-nine years old; 20%, between sixty and sixty-nine years old; and 40.7% for those seventy years old or older. Both abduction strength and external rotation strength in the male subjects showed an age-dependent decrease, whereas only abduction strength showed an age-dependent decrease in the female subjects. In multiple regression analysis, age and weight were the most important predictors of abduction strength and external rotation strength, respectively. In the shoulders with a large-to-massive full-thickness rotator cuff tear, abduction strength was significantly decreased (p = 0.007). Additionally, the ratio of abduction strength to external rotation strength was significantly decreased in the shoulders with a large-to-massive full-thickness tear compared with the shoulders with an intact rotator cuff (p < 0.001).There is a high prevalence of rotator cuff tears in elderly asymptomatic individuals. Asymptomatic shoulders with a large-to-massive full-thickness rotator cuff tear have significantly decreased abduction strength. When there is a substantial decrease in abduction strength in relation to external rotation strength, the presence of an asymptomatic full-thickness tear should be suspected in that shoulder. Previous studies establishing normative values for isometric shoulder strength may have been skewed by the presence of asymptomatic rotator cuff tears in elderly subgroups.Internal impingement of the shoulder.Internal impingement of the shoulder is a pathologic condition characterized by excessive or repetitive contact of the greater tuberosity of the humeral head with the posterosuperior aspect of the glenoid when the arm is abducted and externally rotated. This arm positioning leads to rotator cuff and glenoid labrum impingement by the bony structures of the glenohumeral joint. Although some degree of contact between these structures occurs under normal conditions, to date most of the orthopaedic literature has focused on internal impingement as a disease state that affects overhead athletes and is characterized by the development of articular-sided rotator cuff tears and posterosuperior labral lesions. The precise cause of these impingement lesions remains unclear. However, it is believed that varying degrees of glenohumeral instability, posterior capsular contracture, and scapular dyskinesis may play a role in the development of symptomatic internal impingement. The purpose of this article is to review the pathomechanics, clinical complaints, physical examination findings, and imaging findings that are associated with internal impingement. The results of treatment will be reviewed, and a diagnostic and therapeutic algorithm for the management of internal impingement is presented.Contribution of clinical tests to the diagnosis of rotator cuff disease: a systematic literature review.To evaluate the diagnostic performance of clinical tests for degenerative rotator cuff disease, based on a systematic literature review.We searched Medline, Embase, and Pascal Biomed until the first half of 2006 inclusive for articles that reported at least the sensitivity and specificity of clinical tests for rotator cuff disease. Predictive values and accuracy were recorded where available. The results were discussed and validated.We selected nine studies, of which three investigated tests for subacromial impingement syndrome and seven tests for rotator cuff tendinopathy. The Neer and Hawkins tests had good sensitivity but low specificity for subacromial impingement syndrome. For diagnosing tears of the supraspinatus or infraspinatus, the Jobe sign and the full can test showed similar performance characteristics to the Patte test and resisted external rotation with the elbow at the side flexed at 90 degrees . For diagnosing tendinopathies with or without tears, active unresisted external rotation for the infraspinatus and the lift off test for the subscapularis were specific but lacked sensitivity. In one study, limitation of the range of active unresisted internal rotation was sensitive and specific for subscapularis tendon disease. The palm up test performed poorly for diagnosing long head of biceps disease.Data on the diagnostic performance of clinical tests for rotator cuff tendon disease are fragmentary. However objective data exist to support the usefulness of some of these tests. Further studies are needed.The validity and accuracy of clinical tests used to detect labral pathology of the shoulder--a systematic review.Labral tears frequently require repair [Kim S, Ha K, Han K. Biceps Load test: a clinical test for superior labrum anterior and posterior lesions in shoulders with recurrent anterior dislocations. The American Journal of Sports Medicine 1999;27(3):300-3]. Physiotherapists need confidence in clinical tests used to detect labral pathology to accurately identify this condition. This review systematically evaluates the evidence for the accuracy of these tests with reference to study quality and key biases. Cochrane, Medline, Cinahl, AMED, DARE and HTA databases were searched to identify 15 studies evaluating 15 clinical tests for labral pathology against Magnetic Resonance Imaging MRI or surgery. Two independent reviewers assessed methodological quality using Quality Assessment of Diagnostic Accuracy Studies (QUADAS). Meta Disc calculated likelihood ratios (positive LR>10, providing convincing diagnostic evidence of ruling a condition in; negative LR<0.2 providing large to moderate evidence of ruling the condition out) and true positive rates (TPRs) against false positive rates (FPRs) in receiver operator characteristic (ROC) plots and summary receiver operator curves (SROCs). Probable overestimation of accuracy was caused by use of case control design, verification bias and use of a lesser reference standard. Six accurate tests; Biceps Load I (+LR: 29.09; -LR: 0.09) Biceps Load II (+LR: 26.32; -LR: 0.11), Internal Rotation Resistance (IRRT) (+LR: 24.77; -LR: 0.12), Crank (+LR: 13.59 and 6.46; -LR: 0.1 and 0.22), Kim (+LR: 12.62; -LR:0.21) and Jerk (+LR: 34.71; -LR: 0.27) tests were identified from high quality single studies in selected populations. Subgroup analysis identified varying results of accuracy in the Crank test and the Active Compression (AC) test when evaluated in more than one study. Further evaluation is needed before these tests can be used with confidence.Rotator cuff tendinopathy/subacromial impingement syndrome: is it time for a new method of assessment?Disorders of the shoulder are extremely common, with reports of prevalence ranging from 30% of people experiencing shoulder pain at some stage of their lives up to 50% of the population experiencing at least one episode of shoulder pain annually. In addition to the high incidence, shoulder dysfunction is often persistent and recurrent, with 54% of sufferers reporting ongoing symptoms after 3 years. To a large extent the substantial morbidity reflects (i) a current lack of understanding of the pathoaetiology, (ii) a lack of diagnostic accuracy in the assessment process, and (iii) inadequacies in current intervention techniques. Pathology of the rotator cuff and subacromial bursa is considered to be the principal cause of pain and symptoms arising from the shoulder. Generally these diagnostic labels relate more to a clinical hypothesis as to the underlying cause of the symptoms than to definitive evidence of the histological basis for the diagnosis or the correlation between structural failure and symptoms. Diagnosing rotator cuff tendinopathy or subacromial impingement syndrome currently involves performing a structured assessment that includes taking the patient's history in conjunction with performing clinical assessment procedures that generally involve tests used to implicate an isolated structure. Based on the response to the clinical tests, a diagnosis of rotator cuff tendinopathy or subacromial impingement syndrome is achieved. The clinical diagnosis is strengthened with the findings from supporting investigations such as blood tests, radiographs, ultrasound, magnetic resonance imaging (MRI), computed axial tomography (CT), radionucleotide isotope scan, single photon emission computed tomography, electromyography, nerve conduction and diagnostic analgesic injection. This process eventually results in the formation of a clinical hypothesis, and then, in conjunction with the patient, a management plan is decided upon and implemented. This paper focuses on the dilemmas associated with the current process, and an alternative method for the clinical examination of the shoulder for this group of patients is proposed.Intra- and interexaminer reliability of four manual shoulder maneuvers used to identify subacromial pain.Shoulder pain is a diagnostic challenge and the physical clinical examination of the shoulder is crucial. It is important that the diagnostic tests used are valid as well as reliable. The objective of the study was to assess intra- and interexaminer reliability for four manual shoulder maneuvers; the Neer impingement sign, the Hawkins-Kennedy impingement test, the Patte maneuver, the Jobe supraspinatus test. These maneuvers are frequently used in clinical practice to examine patients with shoulder complaints in which subacromial pain is highly suspected. Thirty-three participants with shoulder pain were included consecutively. Within a week from inclusion, the four maneuvers were performed by a physiotherapist. The procedure was standardized in order to increase reproducibility. After a week, the maneuvers were performed again by the same physical therapist (test-retest) and by another physical therapist (test for interexaminer reliability). All four maneuvers have an almost perfect agreement (Kappa coefficients 0.91-1.00), if performed with suggested standardizations. Neer impingement sign, Hawkins-Kennedy impingement test, Patte maneuver as well as Jobe supraspinatus test, are highly reproducible and therefore reliable to use in clinical practice to identify patients with subacromial pain with an impingement phenomenon, but the maneuvers are limited as structural discriminators.Interobserver reliability of physical examination of shoulder girdle.The object of this study was to assess interobserver reliability in 23 tests concerning physical examination of the shoulder girdle. A physical therapist and a physical therapist/manual therapist independently performed a physical examination of the shoulder girdle in 91 patients with shoulder complaints of varying severity and duration. The observers assessed 23 items in total: active and passive abductions, passive external rotation, hand in neck (HIN) test, hand in back (HIB) test, impingement test according to Neer, springing test of the first rib and joint play test of the acromioclavicular joint. The interobserver reliability was evaluated by means of a Cohen's Kappa, the weighted Kappa and the intraclass correlation (ICC). Criteria for acceptable reliability were: Kappa value>or=0.60, ICC>or=0.75 or an absolute agreement>or=80%. The results showed that Kappa values varied from 0.09 (springing test first rib, stiffness) to 0.66 (springing test first rib, pain), weighted Kappa varied from 0.35 (pain during HIB) to 0.73 (range of motion HIB) and ICC varied from 0.54 (abduction passive starting point painful arc) to 0.96 (active and passive ranges of motion in abduction). In total 11 (48%) items fulfilled the criteria of acceptable reliability. In conclusion, there appears to be a great deal of variation in the reliability of the tests used in the physical examination of the shoulder girdle. Over 50% of the tests did not meet the statistical criteria for acceptable reliability.Identifying SLAP lesions: a meta-analysis of clinical tests and exercise in clinical reasoning.To identify all published accounts of diagnostic accuracy for clinical tests of Superior Labral Antero-Posterior (SLAP) lesion of the shoulder, and provide an estimate of the pooled likelihood ratio for those tests that have been evaluated at least three times. A clinical reasoning exercise is presented to illustrate clinical useability of the findings.Systematic review and meta-analysis.An extensive review of international electronic databases was performed to identify all published works of diagnostic accuracy of any test proposed to be diagnostic for SLAP lesions of the shoulder. Statistical pooling of likelihood ratios was performed using a random-effects model to provide an estimate of the pooled positive likelihood ratio (PLR) for each test with at least three data points available.Twelve studies describing 14 tests were identified. Five tests had been evaluated at least 3 times in the published literature. Methodologic quality scoring was performed and data were extracted. The pooled PLR revealed that of the five tests studies, only Yergason's test demonstrates consistent evidence of significant diagnostic accuracy (PLR 2.29). Heterogeneity of effect sizes was present for the Crank test. The heterogeneity was substantially improved through removal of the effect from the study in which the test was initially described and validated. The fail-safe N statistic suggests that the findings for Yergason's test are robust to publication bias. None of the tests reviewed are very strong.Among the clinical tests for SLAP lesions that have been published to date, Yergason's test is the only one that shows a significant ability to influence clinical decision making, based on the results of the current analysis. Methodologic inadequacies in the reporting of the publications are common, and caution must be exercised when drawing inferences from the results of these studies.Tears of the subscapularis tendon in athletes--diagnosis and repair techniques.Isolated injury to the subscapularis tendon is an uncommon - but potentially debilitating - injury among athletes. The most frequent injury pattern seen in younger athletes is an acute, traumatic tendon avulsion. In the older athletic population, chronic degenerative tearing of the tendon may precede sports-related rupture, particularly following shoulder dislocation. This article reviews how to diagnose this injury in athletes, and describes both conservative and operative treatment options and their outcomes.Superior labral lesions anterior to posterior-evaluation and arthroscopic management.Lesions of the superior labrum are complex and difficult to both diagnose and treat effectively. The clinical diagnosis is challenging due to the nonspecific history and physical examination. MRI has substantially improved our ability to detect SLAP tears, although experience is necessary to distinguish pathologic findings from normal anatomic variants. Treatment is determined by patient age, functional demands, and the type of lesion identified.Most clinical tests cannot accurately diagnose rotator cuff pathology: a systematic review.Do clinical tests accurately diagnose rotator cuff pathology?A systematic review of investigations into the diagnostic accuracy of clinical tests for rotator cuff pathology.People with shoulder pain who underwent clinical testing in order to diagnose rotator cuff pathology.The diagnostic accuracy of clinical tests was determined using likelihood ratios.Thirteen studies met the inclusion criteria. The 13 studies evaluated 14 clinical tests in 89 separate evaluations of diagnostic accuracy. Only one evaluation, palpation for supraspinatus ruptures, resulted in significant positive and negative likelihood ratios. Eight of the 89 evaluations resulted in either significant positive or negative likelihood ratios. However, none of these eight positive or negative likelihood ratios were found in other studies. Of the 89 evaluations of clinical tests 71 (80%) did not result in either significant positive or negative likelihood ratio evaluations across different studies.Overall, most tests for rotator cuff pathology were inaccurate and cannot be recommended for clinical use. At best, suspicion of a rotator cuff tear may be heightened by a positive palpation, combined Hawkins/painful arc/infraspinatus test, Napoleon test, lift-off test, belly-press test, or drop-arm test, and it may be reduced by a negative palpation, empty can test or Hawkins-Kennedy test.Lack of uniformity in diagnostic labeling of shoulder pain: time for a different approach.Diagnostic labels for shoulder pain (e.g., frozen shoulder, impingement syndrome) are widely used in international research and clinical practice. However, about 10 years ago it was shown that the criteria to define those labels were not uniform. Since an ongoing lack of uniformity seriously hampers communication and does not serve patients, we decided to evaluate the uniformity in definitions. Therefore, we compared the selection criteria of different randomised controlled trials (RCTs). This comparison revealed some corresponding criteria, but no uniform definition could be derived for any of the diagnostic labels. Besides the lack of uniformity, the currently used labels have only a fair to moderate interobserver reproducibility and in systematic reviews none of the separate trials using a diagnostic label show a large benefit of treatment. This, altogether, seems sufficient reason to reconsider their use. Therefore, we strongly suggest to abolish the use of these labels and direct future research towards undivided populations with "general" shoulder pain. Possible subgroups with a better prognosis and/or treatment result, based on common characteristics that are easily and validly reproducible, can then be identified within these populations.Screening the athlete's shoulder for impingement symptoms: a clinical reasoning algorithm for early detection of shoulder pathology.Chronic shoulder pain and dysfunction are common complaints among overhead athletes seeking care from physical medicine and rehabilitation. Impingement is a frequently described pathological condition in the overhead athlete. Impingement symptoms may be the result of rotator cuff pathology, shoulder instability, scapular dyskinesis or muscle dysfunction, biceps pathology, SLAP lesions and chronic stiffness of the posterior capsule. At present, numerous different shoulder tests have been described in literature and discussed with respect to their individual diagnostic accuracy. However, in view of the number of shoulder tests, it is often a challenge for the clinician to select the appropriate tests for diagnosing the underlying pathology. The purpose of this paper is to present and discuss a clinical algorithm which may be used in the early detection of the underlying causes of impingement symptoms. In this algorithm, a specific chronology and selection of diagnostic tests may offer the clinician a guideline in his physical examination of the athlete with shoulder pain.Diagnostic accuracy of clinical tests for superior labral anterior posterior lesions: a systematic review.Systematic literature review.To conduct a systematic review of case series and clinical trials that investigate the diagnostic accuracy of clinical tests for superior labral anterior posterior (SLAP) lesions.Primary contact practitioners are often presented with shoulder problems and use a battery of clinical tests to reach a diagnosis. Early detection of SLAP pathology may lead to more optimal interventions and better outcomes for patients.The OVID search interface was utilized with MEDLINE, AHMED, CINAHL, and SPORTDiscus databases searched from 1996-2006. Studies were retrieved that included patients with shoulder pain who underwent at least 1 clinical shoulder test for SLAP lesions. For an article to be included in this review, the results of the clinical tests needed to be compared with findings on arthroscopy. Quality of the manuscripts included in this review were rated using the QUADAS appraisal tool, so comparisons could be made across studies.Seventeen published manuscripts fit the inclusion/exclusion criteria and were used for this review. Eight studies were found to be of high quality. Within these 8 studies, 1 group of authors reported high diagnostic accuracy values for the crank test: sensitivity, 91% (95% confidence interval [CI], 76%-97%); specificity, 93% (95% CI, 79%-88%); positive likelihood ratio, 13.6 (95% CI, 3.6-52.1); and negative likelihood ratio, 0.1 (95% CI, 0.0-0.3). One study on the resisted supination external rotation test also scored high on the QUADAS and reported diagnostic accuracy values of 83% (95% CI, 66-92), 82% (95% CI, 52-95), 4.6 (95% CI, 1.3-16.1), and 0.20 (95% CI, 0.1-0.5), respectively. Of significance is the fact that the majority of papers reporting highly accurate clinical diagnostic tests were of low quality with the results not supported by other authors.It appears that no single test is sensitive or specific enough to determine the presence of a SLAP lesion accurately. Further research is required to determine whether subgrouping of patients by mechanism of injury or the type of SLAP lesion may improve diagnostic accuracy. Determining the diagnostic accuracy of a combination of 2 or more tests is also needed.The validity of the lag signs in diagnosing full-thickness tears of the rotator cuff: a preliminary investigation.To investigate whether the lag signs were valid tools in diagnosing full-thickness tears of the rotator cuff.A same-subject, correlation, double-blinded design was used. The results of the external rotation lag sign, drop sign, and internal rotation lag sign were compared with the criterion standard of diagnostic ultrasound to establish their accuracy.A regional orthopedic hospital.Consecutive subjects (N=37), 21 women and 16 men, with shoulder pain referred to a consultant orthopedic surgeon specializing in shoulder conditions were recruited for this investigation.Not applicable.Sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative likelihood ratios of the lag signs when using ultrasound as the reference test.The specificities of the drop sign and internal rotation lag sign were 77% and 84%, respectively, which, together with low positive likelihood ratios 3.2 (95% confidence interval [CI], 1.5-6.7) and 6.2 (95% CI, 1.9-12.0), indicate that a positive result was poor at recognizing the presence of full-thickness tears. The drop sign had a sensitivity of 73% with a negative likelihood ratio of .34 (95% CI, 0.2-0.8), suggesting that a negative test was fair at ruling out the presence of full-thickness tears. The sensitivity of the internal rotation lag sign (100%) supported by the negative likelihood ratio of 0 (95% CI, 0.0-2.5) suggests that a negative test will effectively rule out the presence of full-thickness tears of the subscapularis. A positive external rotation lag sign is the clinical test most likely to indicate that full-thickness tears of the supraspinatus and infraspinatus are present (specificity, 94%). However, the external rotation lag sign did demonstrate a low sensitivity score of 46% and negative likelihood ratio of .57 (95% CI, 0.4-0.9), which means that a negative test will not rule out the presence of full-thickness tears.The findings of this investigation suggest that a clinical diagnosis of a full-thickness tear of the rotator cuff cannot be conclusively reached using one or more of the lag signs.A new SLAP test: the supine flexion resistance test.This study describes a new test to detect SLAP lesions. The sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values with respect to the diagnosis of a SLAP lesion were determined in comparison to Speed's test and the O'Brien test.One hundred fifty patients presenting for arthroscopic surgery with persisting pain or functional disability of the shoulder underwent a complete shoulder examination. All patients underwent Speed's test, the O'Brien test, and the new supine flexion resistance test. The clinical results of the tests were correlated with the presence of a SLAP lesion by direct arthroscopic visualization.The supine flexion resistance test had a sensitivity of 80% and a specificity of 69%, whereas Speed's test and the O'Brien test had sensitivities of 60% and 94%, respectively, and specificities of 38% and 28%, respectively. Regarding isolated SLAP lesions, the supine flexion resistance test was highly sensitive, with a sensitivity of 92% (58% for Speed's test and 75% for the O'Brien test). For isolated tears of the supraspinatus, the specificity of the supine flexion resistance test was 75% (14% for Speed's test and 17% for the O'Brien test).Compared with the O'Brien test and Speed's test, the supine flexion resistance test proves to be more specific, with a specificity of 69% for the whole study population (28% for the O'Brien test and 38% for Speed's test) and with a specificity of 75% for the group of patients with isolated supraspinatus lesions (17% for the O'Brien test and 14% for Speed's test). The new test is a useful and effective test for detecting type II SLAP lesions. The high specificity enables the elimination of false-positive results of other clinical tests that are more sensitive but not specific.Level II, development of diagnostic criteria with consecutive patients and universally applied gold standard.A 'one-stop clinic' for the diagnosis and management of rotator cuff pathology: Getting the right diagnosis first time.We have introduced a one-stop clinic for the diagnosis and management of rotator cuff tears (RCTs). The aim of the study was to determine the effect of the one-stop clinic on the interval and delay in management for patients with suspected rotator cuff pathology.Seventy-four patients were reviewed retrospectively; 39 had an ultrasound of the shoulder before (group 1), and 35 patients after (group 2) the new protocol was introduced. Patients in group 2 had a shoulder ultrasound scan (USS) on the day of their clinic appointment or beforehand based upon the General Practitioners (GP) letter. Indications included patients over the age of 30, or patients with a history of trauma or a painful shoulder.Twenty-four patients were diagnosed with RCTs on USS with an overall sensitivity of 93.75%, specificity 100% and accuracy of 91% for full thickness tears. Clinical detection alone had an overall sensitivity of 80%, a specificity of 91% and accuracy of 87%. Mean time from GP referral to definitive management plan was 6.49 months (SD 2.74) in group 1, compared with 4.63 months (SD 1.43) in group 2 with an overall reduction in half the number of clinic appointments. This was statistically significant (p < 0.001).Ultrasound scan of the shoulder is an accurate and reliable method of detecting full thickness RCTs. The one-stop clinic significantly shortened the interval between GP referral and definitive management.Accuracy of physical examination in subacromial impingement syndrome.Shoulder pain is a common complaint, frequently caused by subacromial impingement syndrome (SIS). There are a number of physical examination (PE) manoeuvres that explore the subacromial space. MRI provides an accurate anatomic image of the subacromial space, being the current gold standard in the diagnosis of SIS. The aim of this study is to evaluate the accuracy of the PE in the diagnosis of SIS and/or subacromial-subdeltoid bursitis (SSB) confirmed by MRI.Consecutive outpatients with an episode of shoulder pain were prospectively included in the study. They were examined by a rheumatologist and, within 3 days, an MRI was done. Sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, and accuracy of PE manoeuvres were calculated using a 2 x 2 table.Fourteen males and 16 females were included. All the tests exhibited acceptable sensitivity. As a result Yocum manoeuvre was considered the most sensitive and most accurate for SIS. With regard to SSB, the Gerber test was the most sensitive. The majority of the PE manoeuvres showed low specificity.Most PE manoeuvres identify reasonably well subacromial impingement of the shoulder, although, in general, they have low specificity. The Yocum test has the best sensitivity and precision. Our data suggest that imaging techniques should be recommended to better define shoulder lesions.Effect of the Scapula Reposition Test on shoulder impingement symptoms and elevation strength in overhead athletes.Two group, repeated measures design.To determine whether manually repositioning the scapula using the Scapula Reposition Test (SRT) reduces pain and increases shoulder elevation strength in athletes with and without positive signs of shoulder impingement.Symptom alteration tests may be useful in determining a subset of those with shoulder pathology who may benefit from interventions aimed at improving scapular motion abnormalities.One hundred forty-two college athletes underwent testing for clinical signs of shoulder impingement. Tests provoking symptoms were repeated with the scapula manually repositioned into greater retraction and posterior tilt. A numeric rating scale was used to measure symptom intensity under both conditions. Isometric shoulder elevation strength was measured using a mounted dynamometer with the scapula in its natural position and with manual repositioning. A paired t test was used to compare the strength between positions. The frequency of a significant increase in strength with scapular repositioning, defined as the minimal detectable change (90% confidence interval), was also assessed.Of the 98 athletes with a positive impingement test, 46 had reduced pain with scapular repositioning. Although repositioning produced an increase in strength in both the impingement (P=.001) and non-impingement groups (P=.012), a significant increase in strength was found with repositioning in only 26% of athletes with, and 29% of athletes without positive signs for shoulder impingement.The SRT is a simple clinical test that may potentially be useful in an impairment based classification approach to shoulder problems.A new test of resistance in the diagnosis of postero-superior rotator cuff tears.The aim of this study was to assess the diagnostic accuracy of a new clinical test for the diagnosis of subacromial impingement and full thickness postero-superior rotator cuff tears. One hundred and twenty patients who underwent arthroscopic treatment for acromioplasty or cuff repair were previously submitted to a new test of resistance. The test is performed in the standing position with the involved arm in 90 degrees abduction, 20 degrees -30 degrees anteposition and in external rotation (as for full-can test). Thus, the patient was invited to follow the way of a spiral drawn on a drawing sheet for 20 turns; 1 turn = from the centre to the end of the spiral and vice versa (spiral width = 20 cm). The test was considered positive when the patient was not able to conclude it due to strength decrease or to shoulder pain. Sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values as well as diagnostic accuracy were calculated for our test of resistance. The test resulted scarcely reliable as detector of subacromial impingement and not very reliable as detector of small tear. When the test is positive there is a high probability that a subacromial disease exists; instead, when it is negative there is a high probability that the patient has not a large or massive cuff tear. The resistance test (Gum-Turn test) adds to our armamentarium of physical examination signs in patients with painful shoulder and furnishes further information on possible dimensions of tendinous tear.Physical examination and magnetic resonance imaging in the diagnosis of superior labrum anterior-posterior lesions of the shoulder: a sensitivity analysis.The overall purpose of our study was to examine the sensitivity of physical examination, magnetic resonance imaging (MRI), and magnetic resonance (MR) arthrogram for the identification of arthroscopically confirmed SLAP lesions of the shoulder.An analysis of 51 consecutive patients with arthroscopically confirmed SLAP lesions and no history of shoulder dislocation was performed. Before undergoing surgery, all patients underwent a standardized physical examination and had either an MRI and/or MR arthrogram performed. Sensitivity analysis was then performed on the results of both the physical examination maneuvers and the radiologic imaging compared to the arthroscopic findings at surgery.The sensitivity of O'Brien's (active compression) test was 90%, whereas the Mayo (dynamic) shear was 80% and Jobe's relocation test was 76%. The sensitivity of a physical examination with any 1 of these 3 SLAP provocative tests being positive was 100%. Neer's sign (41%) and Hawkin's impingement tests (31%) each had low sensitivity for SLAP lesions. The sensitivity of MRI for SLAP lesions was 67% when interpreted by the performing surgeon, 53% when read by a radiologist. When the MR arthrograms were analyzed alone, the sensitivity was 72% (surgeon) and 50% (radiologist), respectively.All 3 physical examination maneuvers traditionally considered provocative for SLAP pathology (O'Brien's, Mayo shear, and Jobe's relocation) were sensitive for the diagnosis of SLAP lesions. MRI and MR arthrogram imaging had lower sensitivity than these physical examination tests in diagnosing SLAP lesions. Patient history, demographics, and the surgeon's physical examination should remain central to the diagnosis of SLAP lesions.Level II, development of diagnostic criteria on basis of consecutive patients with universally applied gold standard.The evaluation of various physical examinations for the diagnosis of type II superior labrum anterior and posterior lesion.Many types of physical examinations have been used to diagnose superior labrum anterior and posterior lesions; no decisive clinical test is available for confirming the diagnosis.A selection from 10 well-established physical tests, alone or in combination, can be used to differentiate lesions with biceps anchor detachment from those with an intact biceps anchor with arthroscopic correlation.Case control study (diagnosis); Level of evidence, 3.Among 297 patients who underwent shoulder arthroscopy between January 2004 and July 2005, 146 patients were enrolled in the study as a type II superior labrum anterior and posterior lesion group and an age-matched control group. Sensitivity, specificity, and predictive values of each test and all possible combinations of 2 and 3 tests were analyzed. The same procedures were repeated in patients younger than and older than 40 years.The sensitivities of the Whipple, O'Brien, apprehension, and compression-rotation tests and the specificities of the Yergason, biceps load II, and Kibler tests were relatively high. No single physical examination was found to be simultaneously highly sensitive and specific for the diagnosis of a type II superior labrum anterior and posterior lesion. When 2 of the 3 relatively sensitive tests (O'Brien, apprehension, or compression-rotation test) were combined with 1 of the 3 relatively specific tests (Speed, Yergason, or biceps load II test), sensitivity and specificity reached approximately 70% and 95%, respectively. Similar trends were noted in the younger and older patient groups and in the isolated type II superior labrum anterior and posterior lesion group.The data suggest that some combinations of 2 relatively sensitive clinical tests and 1 relatively specific clinical test increase the diagnostic efficacy of superior labrum anterior and posterior lesions. Requiring 1 of the 3 chosen tests to be positive will result in a sensitivity of about 75%, whereas requiring all 3 to be positive will result in a specificity of about 90%.Reliability and diagnostic accuracy of history and physical examination for diagnosing glenoid labral tears.Glenoid labral tears provide a diagnostic challenge.Combinations of items in the patient history and physical examination will provide stronger diagnostic accuracy to suggest the presence or absence of glenoid labral tear than will individual items.Cohort study (diagnosis); Level of evidence, 1.History and examination findings in patients with shoulder pain (N = 55) were compared with arthroscopic findings to determine diagnostic accuracy and intertester reliability.The intertester reliability of the crank, anterior slide, and active compression tests was 0.20 to 0.24. A combined history of popping or catching and positive crank or anterior slide results yielded specificities of 0.91 and 1.00 and positive likelihood ratios of 3.0 and infinity, respectively. A positive anterior slide result combined with either a positive active compression or crank result yielded specificities of 0.91 and positive likelihood ratio of 2.75 and 3.75, respectively. Requiring only a single positive finding in the combination of popping or catching and the anterior slide or crank yielded sensitivities of 0.82 and 0.89 and negative likelihood ratios of 0.31 and 0.33, respectively.The diagnostic accuracy of individual tests in previous studies is quite variable, which may be explained in part by the modest reliability of these tests. The combination of popping or catching with a positive crank or anterior slide result or a positive anterior slide result with a positive active compression or crank test result suggests the presence of a labral tear. The combined absence of popping or catching and a negative anterior slide or crank result suggests the absence of a labral tear.Physical examination tests of the shoulder: a systematic review with meta-analysis of individual tests.To compile and critique research on the diagnostic accuracy of individual orthopaedic physical examination tests in a manner that would allow clinicians to judge whether these tests are valuable to their practice.A computer-assisted literature search of MEDLINE, CINAHL, and SPORTDiscus databases (1966 to October 2006) using keywords related to diagnostic accuracy of physical examination tests of the shoulder. The Quality Assessment of Diagnostic Accuracy Studies (QUADAS) tool was used to critique the quality of each paper. Meta-analysis through meta-regression of the diagnostic odds ratio (DOR) was performed on the Neer test for impingement, the Hawkins-Kennedy test for impingement, and the Speed test for superior labral pathology.Forty-five studies were critiqued with only half demonstrating acceptable high quality and only two having adequate sample size. For impingement, the meta-analysis revealed that the pooled sensitivity and specificity for the Neer test was 79% and 53%, respectively, and for the Hawkins-Kennedy test was 79% and 59%, respectively. For superior labral (SLAP) tears, the summary sensitivity and specificity of the Speed test was 32% and 61%, respectively. Regarding orthopaedic special tests (OSTs) where meta-analysis was not possible either due to lack of sufficient studies or heterogeneity between studies, the list that demonstrates both high sensitivity and high specificity is short: hornblowers's sign and the external rotation lag sign for tears of the rotator cuff, biceps load II for superior labral anterior to posterior (SLAP) lesions, and apprehension, relocation and anterior release for anterior instability. Even these tests have been under-studied or are from lower quality studies or both. No tests for impingement or acromioclavicular (AC) joint pathology demonstrated significant diagnostic accuracy.Based on pooled data, the diagnostic accuracy of the Neer test for impingement, the Hawkins-Kennedy test for impingement and the Speed test for labral pathology is limited. There is a great need for large, prospective, well-designed studies that examine the diagnostic accuracy of the numerous physical examination tests of the shoulder. Currently, almost without exception, there is a lack of clarity with regard to whether common OSTs used in clinical examination are useful in differentially diagnosing pathologies of the shoulder.Ultrasonographic findings of the shoulder in patients with rheumatoid arthritis and comparison with physical examination.The objectives of this study were: 1) to identify the ultrasonographic (US) abnormalities and 2) to compare the findings of physical examination with US findings in rheumatoid arthritis (RA) patients with shoulder pain. We studied 30 RA patients. Physical examination was performed systemically as follows: 1) area of tenderness; 2) range of passive and active shoulder motion; 3) impingement tests; 4) maneuvers for determining the location of the tendon lesions. US investigations included the biceps, the supraspinatus, infraspinatus, and subscapularis tendons; the subacromial-subdeltoid bursa; and the glenohumeral and acromioclavicular joints. Thirty RA patients with 35 painful and 25 non-painful shoulders were examined. The range of motion affected the most by shoulder pain was abduction. The most frequent US finding of shoulder joint was effusion in the long head of the biceps tendon. Among the rotator cuff tendons, subscapularis was the most frequently involved. Tendon tear was also common among non-painful shoulders. Physical examination used for the diagnosis of shoulder pain had low sensitivity and specificity for detecting abnormalities in the rheumatoid shoulder joint. In conclusion, US abnormalities showed frequent tendon tears in our RA patients. Physical examination had low sensitivity and specificity for detecting rotator cuff tear in the rheumatoid shoulder joint.Shoulder: what the orthopaedic doctor needs to know.Diagnosing shoulder pathology accurately requires both clinical expertise and the ability to interpret and correlate radiographic studies. Variational anatomy of the shoulder combined with the complexity of physical examination makes this difficult. Physical examination of the shoulder often leaves the surgeon with more than one working diagnosis. Imaging studies of the shoulder are more valuable if used to confirm a working diagnosis as opposed to reading the study in a vacuum. Clinical correlation should also be considered for any and all findings on an imaging study. Collaboration of the surgeon and the radiologist is essential in reducing the number of over-reported findings that are clinically insignificant. The surgeon should directly communicate with the radiologist as to his or her working diagnosis and the goal of the study. In this way the surgeon and radiologist become superior diagnosticians.Temporal variations in a modified Neer impingement test can confound clinical interpretation.High variability in the time required for patients to have substantial pain relief after Neer-type subacromial impingement tests might help explain conflicting data regarding their effectiveness in guiding treatment and predicting surgical outcomes. To focus on quantifying temporal variability associated with a modified (local anesthetic and corticosteroid) impingement test, we hypothesized that substantial pain relief (greater than 75% reduction) can occur beyond the 10-minute interval many clinicians use for determining results of this test. Fourteen females and 12 males (mean age, 55.6 years) who received subacromial injections for Stage II impingement completed 10-cm visual analog scales for pain at 5, 10, 20, 30, and 40 minutes postinjection. There were 11 patients (42%) who attained at least 75% relief by 10 minutes compared with nine (35%) additional patients who subsequently attained 75% relief after 10 minutes. On average, 75% reduction in pain did not occur until after 30 minutes postinjection. Data analysis also revealed two groups: (1) rapid responders with greater than 50% pain relief by 10 minutes; and (2) delayed responders with greater than 50% pain relief after 10 minutes. Assessing pain at 10 minutes for a Neer-type impingement test can fail to accurately determine a positive test in a substantial percentage of patients.MR shoulder arthrography in patients younger than 40 years of age: frequency of rotator cuff tear versus labroligamentous pathology.The purpose of this study was to compare the frequency of rotator cuff pathology versus labroligamentous pathology in patients younger than 40 years and to determine whether routine MR arthrography is justified in all patients in this age group, regardless of the clinical symptoms. The MR arthrography was carried out on 332 patients 40 years of age and younger. Two hundred and forty-three patients had clinical history of instability and possible labroligamentous pathology. Eighty-nine patients had no history or physical signs of instability and were referred for reasons other than instability, such as assessment for rotator cuff tear. In the 243 patients younger than 40 years with clinical history of potential labral pathology, 39% (95/243) showed a labral tear and 2.1% (5/243) had a full-thickness rotator cuff tendon tear. In the 89 patients with no history suggesting labral pathology, 19% (17/89) showed an unsuspected labral tear and 4.5% (4/89) had a full-thickness rotator cuff tear. These findings suggest that, regardless of the clinical indication for referral, patients aged 40 and less referred for shoulder MRI should be imaged using MR arthrography because of the significant risk that symptoms are related to unsuspected labral pathology.Diagnostic accuracy of shoulder ultrasound performed by a single operator.Both diagnostic ultrasound and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) are used for investigation of the presence and severity of rotator cuff lesions. There is no consensus as to which is the more accurate and cost-effective study. We sought to examine the sensitivity of ultrasound, when used by one experienced radiologist with modern equipment. We compared the ultrasound and surgical results obtained from 68 patients. Ultrasound showed a sensitivity of 89% and specificity of 100% (Positive Predictive Value 100%) for full-thickness tears, and a sensitivity of 79% and specificity of 94% (Positive Predictive Value 87%) for partial-thickness tears. We found that shoulder ultrasound, in the hands of an experienced radiologist with the use of modern high-resolution equipment, is highly sensitive in differentiating complete tears and partial-thickness tears. Our results are similar to the best published results for MRI and given that ultrasound is significantly cheaper and more available, ultrasound by an experienced radiologist should be considered as a primary diagnostic tool for imaging the rotator cuff.The passive compression test: a new clinical test for superior labral tears of the shoulder.Even though there are several physical tests available for superior labrum anterior posterior lesions, there have been very few reports on their accuracy, and none can be regarded as completely predictive for the presence of a superior labrum anterior posterior lesion in the shoulder joint.This new clinical test is a useful and accurate technique for detecting superior labral tears in the shoulder joint.Cohort study (diagnosis); Level of evidence, 2.This test was conducted independently by 2 physicians before any other diagnostic evaluation. In all cases, the glenohumeral joint was investigated first, and the appropriate treatments were performed on the lesion. A protocol was established to evaluate the sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values of this new clinical test. The reproducibility of this test was evaluated with a kappa coefficient.Sixty-one patients (61 shoulders) were examined with the passive compression test, and all underwent arthroscopic surgery. In 31 patients with a positive passive compression test result, 27 had a superior labrum anterior posterior lesion, and in 30 patients with a negative passive compression test result, 6 had a superior labrum anterior posterior lesion. The sensitivity of the test was 81.8%, and the specificity was 85.7%. The positive predictive value was 87.1%, and the negative predictive value was 80.0%. The kappa coefficient was 0.771 between the 2 independent examiners (P< .01).The passive compression test is a useful and accurate technique for predicting superior labral tears of the shoulder joint.Incidence of os acromiale in patients with shoulder pain.A prospective case series was undertaken to determine the incidence of os acromiale in patients presenting to an orthopedic clinic with shoulder pain during a 6-month period. Ninety-three shoulders in 88 consecutive patients were evaluated by history, physical examination, and radiographs. Radiographs included anteroposterior, scapular Y, and axillary views in all patients. Based on history and physical examination, no patient was given a primary diagnosis of os acromiale. However, when the plain films were specifically reviewed for this entity, it was present in 6 (6.82%) of the 88 patients. It was seen on the axillary view in each case. Five (83.3%) of the 6 patients had been given a diagnosis of either impingement or rotator cuff tear based on physical examination. Os acromiale is an infrequent but not rare entity that must be kept in mind when evaluating patients with shoulder pain, as failure to recognize an os acromiale may negatively influence treatment results. An axillary view should be obtained when evaluating patients with shoulder pain.Clinical assessment of superior glenoid labral lesions: a systematic review.Superior labral anterior posterior (SLAP) lesions of the glenoid have proven difficult to diagnose clinically. SLAP-lesion-specific physical examination tests have been developed to improve clinical acumen. Initial reported performance of these tests has not been reproduced by independent investigation. We hypothesized SLAP-specific physical examination tests could not provide a definitive diagnosis of a SLAP lesion. We further intended to elucidate factors responsible for the variable performance of SLAP-specific tests. A review of the literature through Medline and Embase database searches was conducted. All studies with level of evidence of III or better involved in the reporting of diagnostic accuracy of SLAP-specific physical examination tests were included and reviewed. Each instance of independent evaluation of a SLAP-specific examination showed poorer examination performance than in the originating study. Considerable variability existed between independent evaluations of a given SLAP-specific examination as well. We concluded SLAP-specific physical examination results cannot be used as the sole basis of a diagnosis of a SLAP lesion. Differences in patient populations between studies and the accompanying differences in SLAP lesion prevalence and comorbid conditions played the greatest role in test result variance.Anterior and posterior instability of the long head of the biceps tendon in rotator cuff tears: a new classification based on arthroscopic observations.The purpose of this study was to evaluate arthroscopically the frequency and type of instability of the long head of the biceps (LHB) tendon in patients undergoing rotator cuff repair.In 200 consecutive patients undergoing arthroscopic rotator cuff repair, LHB instability was assessed statically and dynamically in the anteroposterior direction. In addition, macroscopic lesions of the LHB, as well as lesions of the adjacent rotator cuff tendons, were documented.LHB instability (subluxation or dislocation) was found in 45% of patients, with isolated anterior instability in 16%, isolated posterior instability in 19%, and combined anteroposterior instability in 10%. Whereas LHB subluxations were observed in both directions, dislocations were only seen in anterior LHB instability. Anterior instability was more associated with a subscapularis lesion, whereas posterior instability was more associated with a supraspinatus tear. Lesions of the LHB tendon were strongly associated with LHB instability and the size of the rotator cuff tear.In 200 patients with rotator cuff tears LHB instability could be observed arthroscopically in 45%, with 16% being anterior, 19% being posterior, and 10% being anteroposterior. LHB instability was associated with LHB lesions, with 15% of the LHB tendons showing a normal appearance when unstable versus 70% when stable. Preoperative O'Brien and Speed tests did not correlate with intraoperative observed LHB pathology. The size of the rotator cuff tear could be correlated with the grade of LHB lesion, becoming more significant with augmenting tear size. On the basis of these observations, we created a new arthroscopic classification of LHB instability with respect to the direction and extent of LHB instability, lesions of the LHB, and status of the adjacent rotator cuff tendons.Level IV, diagnostic study with poor reference standard.Indications for rotator cuff repair: a systematic review.Despite the popularity of surgical repair of rotator cuff tears, literature regarding the indications for and timing of surgery are sparse. We performed a systematic review of the literature to investigate factors influencing the decision to surgically repair symptomatic, full-thickness rotator cuff tears. Specifically, how do demographic variables, duration of symptoms, timing of surgery, physical examination findings, and size of tear affect treatment outcome and indications for surgery? We reviewed the best available evidence, which offers some guidelines for surgical decision making. Variables suggest earlier surgical intervention may be needed in the setting of weakness and substantial functional disability. With regard to demographic variables, the evidence is unclear regarding their association with treatment outcome. However, older chronological age does not seem to portend a worse outcome. Pending worker's compensation claims does seem to negatively affect treatment results. Further research is required to define the indications for surgery for full thickness rotator cuff tears. However, the design and conduct of an ethical study to obtain Level I evidence on this issue will be a major challenge.Partial-thickness rotator cuff tears.Partial-thickness rotator cuff tears are not a single entity; rather, they represent a spectrum of disease states. Although often asymptomatic, they can be significantly disabling. Overhead throwing athletes with partial-thickness rotator cuff tears differ with respect to etiology, goals, and treatment from older, nonathlete patients with degenerative tears. Pathogenesis of degenerative partial-thickness tears is multifactorial, with evidence of intrinsic and extrinsic factors playing key roles. Diagnosis of partial-thickness rotator cuff tears should be based on the patient's symptoms together with magnetic resonance imaging studies. Conservative treatment is successful in most patients. Surgery generally is considered for patients with symptoms of sufficient duration and intensity. The role of acromioplasty has not been clearly delineated, but it should be considered when there is evidence of extrinsic causation for the partial-thickness rotator cuff tear.The bear-hug test: a new and sensitive test for diagnosing a subscapularis tear.It was our intent to devise a new clinical test that would more accurately diagnose subscapularis tears than the current clinical tests. This new test is called the bear-hug test. The purpose of this study was to assess the bear-hug test and compare it with the current tests of subscapularis function (lift-off, belly-press, and Napoleon tests).Between January 2004 and March 2004, 68 consecutive patients scheduled for an arthroscopic procedure were evaluated preoperatively; the preoperative clinical examination findings were then correlated with arthroscopic findings. Lift-off, belly-press, Napoleon, and bear-hug tests were included in the examination. Furthermore, for the belly-press and bear-hug tests, the strength was precisely quantified by means of an electronic digital tensiometer (Kern HBC). Diagnostic arthroscopy was the reference that determined the actual pathologic lesions.Subscapularis tears occurred with a prevalence rate of 29.4%. Of the subscapularis tears, 40% were not predicted by preoperative assessment by use of all of the tests. The bear-hug test was found to be the most sensitive test (60%) of all of those studied (belly-press test, 40%; Napoleon test, 25%; and lift-off test, 17.6%). In contrast, all 4 tests had a high specificity (lift-off test, 100%; Napoleon test, 97.9%; belly-press test, 97.9%; and bear-hug test, 91.7%). No statistically significant difference was found between the area under the receiver operating characteristic curve of the bear-hug test and that of the belly-press test in diagnosing a torn subscapularis. However, the areas under the receiver operating characteristic curve for both the bear-hug test and the belly-press test were significantly greater than those for the lift-off and Napoleon tests (P < .05). Positive bear-hug and belly-press tests suggest a tear of at least 30% of the subscapularis, whereas a positive Napoleon test indicates that greater than 50% of the subscapularis is torn. Furthermore, a positive lift-off test is not found until at least 75% of the subscapularis is torn.The bear-hug test optimizes the chance of detecting a tear of the upper part of the subscapularis tendon. Moreover, because the bear-hug test represents the most sensitive test, it can be considered to be the most likely clinical test to alert the surgeon to a possible subscapularis tear. Performing all of the subscapularis tests is useful in predicting the size of the tear.Level I, diagnostic study: testing of previously developed criteria in a series of consecutive patients with arthroscopy used as the criterion standard.Scapular involvement in impingement: signs and symptoms.Normal scapular motion is closely integrated with arm motion to provide efficient scapulohumeral rhythm in shoulder function. This rhythm is often disrupted in patients with symptoms and signs of shoulder impingement. A large percentage of patients with shoulder impingement have scapular dyskinesis and alterations in the normal resting position of the scapula or in dynamic scapular motion. Scapular dyskinesis usually manifests as a loss of control in the motions of scapular external rotation and the translation of scapular retraction. This loss of control results in alteration in timing and magnitude of acromial upward rotation, excessive antetilting of the glenoid, and loss of maximal rotator cuff muscle activation capability. These pathophysiologic and pathomechanical alterations cause or increase the dysfunction associated with impingement. Scapular dyskinesis may have proximal or distal causative factors. Proximal factors are mainly associated with muscle factors, and can usually be treated with rehabilitation. Distal factors are mainly caused by internal derangements of joints and frequently require surgical treatment followed by appropriate rehabilitation. Physical examination techniques that specifically evaluate scapular dyskinesis can identify the causative factors and guide treatment and rehabilitation strategies.Interpreting positive signs of the supraspinatus test in screening for torn rotator cuff.The purpose of this study was to investigate the validity of the supraspinatus test as a screening test for detecting torn rotator cuff and to determine what its valuable positive signs were. Both the empty-can test and full-can test were performed on 200 shoulders diagnosed by magnetic resonance imaging (MRI)-and in some cases, surgical findings-to have full-thickness or partial-thickness torn rotator cuff s, or no tear in the rotator cuff . During the maneuver, the presence of pain or weakness or both pain and weakness were recorded as positive signs, and the distribution of these signs were analyzed according to the degree of tear. The predictive values were calculated in 2 ways by considering (1) only full-thickness tears as tears and (2) both full- and partial-thickness tears as tears. The 2 tests and the 2 ways of considering partial-thickness tears were compared. Pain and weakness were severity-dependent, and the empty-can test had a higher incidence of pain. The sensitivities of the 2 supraspinatus tests in all positive signs were higher when including partial-thickness tears in the tear group ; however, their specificities were higher when excluding partial-thickness tears. Both pain and weakness were interpretive for the supraspinatus test, and both tests were sensitive to full- and partial- thickness tears and specific for full-thickness tears.Reliability of function-related tests in patients with shoulder pathologies.Nonexperimental.To investigate the intertester and intratester reliability of a battery of function-related tests in patients with shoulder pathologies and associated reduced range of motion.A battery of function-related tests has the potential to complement assessment of functional limitation in patients who have shoulder pathologies.Three function-related tests (hand to neck, hand to scapula, and hand to opposite scapula) were conducted on 46 patients with shoulder pathologies, and 46 age- and gender-matched control subjects. The tests were performed by 2 independent physiotherapists to test intertester reliability. Intratester reliability was examined by investigating the reproducibility of the tests performed twice, with 3 to 5 days between tests, by the same physiotherapist. Comparison of the scores on the function-related tests between patients and controls was evaluated. A correlation matrix was calculated to test the level of association among the tests.Intratester and intertester reliability on the 3 tests (weighted K) varied from 0.83 to 0.90. The patient's test performances were decreased in comparison to the control group. The correlation matrix demonstrated a level of associations among the 3 tests varying from r = 0.64 to r = 0.66.The results of this study indicate that function-related tests are reliable and could be used in clinical practice to document reduced function of the shoulder. The level of association among the tests indicates that each test measured different aspects of shoulder function.Clinical inquiries. What is the best way to diagnose a suspected rotator cuff tear?The evaluation of a suspected rotator cuff tear should start with a history and a clinical exam of the shoulder (strength of recommendation [SOR]: B, based on a systematic review of cohort studies). Three clinical test results in particular--supraspinatus weakness, weakness of external rotation, and impingement--or 2 positive tests for a patient older than 60 years were highly predictive of rotator cuff tear (SOR: B, based on individual prospective study). Either magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) or ultrasound can confirm a possible full-thickness tear (SOR: B, based on a systematic review of cohort studies). If a patient has an implantable device prohibiting MRI imaging, conventional arthrography is an alternative (SOR: A, individual randomized controlled trial). Suspected partial-thickness tears are best verified with an ultrasound (SOR: B, based on a systematic review of cohort studies).Evaluation of apparent and absolute supraspinatus strength in patients with shoulder injury using the scapular retraction test.Physical examination of patients with shoulder injury not involving actual rotator cuff tears frequently demonstrates decreased rotator cuff strength on manual muscle testing. This decrease has been attributed to supraspinatus muscle weakness, but it may be owing to alterations in scapular position.The position of stabilized scapular retraction, by minimizing proximal kinetic chain factors and providing a stable base of muscle origin, positively influences demonstrated supraspinatus strength.Controlled laboratory study.Supraspinatus strength was tested in 20 injured patients and 10 healthy controls in both the empty-can arm position and a position of scapular retraction using a handheld dynamometer. Pain in both maneuvers was measured by use of a visual analog scale.Paired t tests indicated the scapular retraction position resulted in statistically significantly (P = .001) higher supraspinatus strength values within both groups. There was no significant difference between the 2 positions in visual analog scale scores.This study shows that demonstrated apparent supraspinatus weakness on clinical examination in symptomatic patients may be dependent on scapular position. The weakness may be owing to other factors besides supraspinatus muscle weakness, such as a lack of a stable base in the kinetic chain or scapula.The clinical examination that addresses scapular posture and includes scapular retraction will allow more accurate determination of absolute supraspinatus muscle strength and allow efficacious rehabilitation protocols to address the source of the demonstrated weakness.The rotator cuff functional index.Despite improvements in the clinical assessment of rotator cuff injuries, shortcomings exist in diagnosing rotator cuff tears.To formulate a clinical rotator cuff functional index for predicting rotator cuff tears based on handheld dynamometer measurements for shoulder strength testing and to assess its ability to diagnose a rotator cuff tear.Cohort study (diagnosis); Level of evidence, 2.Preoperative handheld dynamometer measurements, including supraspinatus, external rotation, internal rotation, adduction, and lift-off force, were compared in 100 patients with full-thickness rotator cuff tears (> 1.0 cm) and 100 patients with no rotator cuff injury (confirmed by arthroscopy). Using multiple logistic regression analysis, the rotator cuff functional index and index for rotator cuff tear size were formulated in which 100 represented excellent rotator cuff function and less than 0 indicated a full-thickness supraspinatus tear. Each patient's index was calculated to determine its clinical value in predicting a rotator cuff tear; the Pearson correlation coefficient was established for the rotator cuff functional index for rotator cuff size.Two handheld dynamometer measurements predicted a rotator cuff tear (P < .001, r = 0.53), with rotator cuff functional index = 1.27 * supraspinatus (N) - 0.72 * adduction (N) - 11.6, but not tear size (r = 0.38). In predicting a rotator cuff tear (rotator cuff functional index < 0 = rotator cuff tear; rotator cuff functional index > 0 = no tear), the rotator cuff functional index had 83% sensitivity, 79% specificity, 80% positive predictive value, 82% negative predictive value, likelihood ratio of 4.0 for a positive test result and 0.2 for a negative test result and an accuracy of 81%.The 2 most useful tests for determining a rotator cuff tear with a handheld dynamometer were supraspinatus force and adduction force (as negative control). A functional index based on these measurements was able to rule out a rotator cuff tear and predict the presence but not the size of the tear.Shoulder impingement syndrome: relationships between clinical, functional, and radiologic findings.Although there has been much research about imaging methods for shoulder impingement syndrome, the clinical information and upper limb level of disability have been generally ignored. The purpose of this study was to detect the relationships between clinical, functional, and radiologic variables in patients with shoulder impingement syndrome.A cross-sectional, clinical, and radiologic study was planned and 59 shoulders of 58 consecutive patients waiting for physical therapy because of a clinically suspected shoulder impingement syndrome were included into this study. Comprehensive clinical examination, radiography, shoulder ultrasonography, and magnetic resonance imaging were performed in the same month.Despite the high sensitivities of ultrasonography for diagnosing rotator cuff tears (98.1%) and biceps pathologies (100%), magnetic resonance imaging was superior to ultrasonography in many important shoulder structures such as a glenoid labral tear and subacromial bursal effusion/hypertrophy (P < 0.01). These structures were the determinants of the shoulder's disability measured by disabilities of the arm, shoulder, and hand questionnaire.Ultrasonography and magnetic resonance imaging had comparable high accuracy for identifying the biceps pathologies and rotator cuff tears. The basic clinical tests had modest accuracy in both disorders. The choice of which imaging test to perform should be based on the patient's clinical information (regarding lesion of glenoid labrum, joint capsule, muscle, and bone), cost, and imaging experience of the radiology department.An evaluation of the provocative tests for superior labral anterior posterior lesions.Although our understanding of superior labral anterior posterior lesions has grown, the physical diagnosis remains imperfect.Cohort study (diagnostic); Level of evidence, 2.To determine the most effective provocative maneuver with which to diagnose superior labral anterior posterior lesions.A series of 132 consecutive patients scheduled to undergo diagnostic shoulder arthroscopy were examined preoperatively over a 6-month period, and the final diagnosis in each case was made arthroscopically. The following assessments were included: active compression (O'Brien), anterior slide, pain provocation, crank, Jobe relocation, Hawkins, Neer, Speed, and Yergason tests.The most sensitive diagnostic tools for type II superior labral lesions were the active compression, Hawkins, Speed, Neer, and Jobe relocation tests. When type I and type II lesions were combined, the results were similar. However, none of the sensitive tests were specific for either type I or type II lesions.The authors' results contradict the current literature regarding provocative testing for both stable and unstable superior labral lesions. There is no single maneuver that can accurately diagnose superior labral anterior posterior lesions; arthroscopy remains the standard by which to diagnose such lesions.Are pain location and physical examinations useful in locating a tear site of the rotator cuff?Pain is the most common symptom of patients with rotator cuff tendinopathy, but little is known about the relationship between the site of pain and the site of cuff pathologic lesions. Also, accuracies of physical examinations used to locate a tear by assessing the muscle strength seem to be affected by the threshold for muscle weakness, but no studies have been reported regarding the efficacies of physical examinations in reference to their threshold.Pain location is useful in locating a tear site. Efficacies of physical examinations to evaluate the function of the cuff muscles depend on the threshold for muscle weakness.Case series; Level of evidence, 4.The authors retrospectively reviewed the clinical charts of 160 shoulders of 149 patients (mean age, 53 years) with either rotator cuff tears (140 shoulders) or cuff tendinitis (20 shoulders). The location of pain was recorded on a standardized form with 6 different areas. The diagnostic accuracies of the following tests were assessed with various thresholds for muscle weakness: supraspinatus test, the external rotation strength test, and the lift-off test.Lateral and anterior portions of the shoulder were the most common sites of pain regardless of existence of tear or tear location. The supraspinatus test was most accurate when it was assessed to have positive results with the muscle strength less than manual muscle testing grade 5, whereas the lift-off test was most accurate with a threshold less than grade 3. The external rotation strength test was most accurate with a threshold of less than grade 4+.The authors conclude that pain location is not useful in locating the site of a tear, whereas the physical examinations aiming to locate the tear site are clinically useful when assessed to have positive results with appropriate threshold for muscle weakness.Shoulder pain: diagnosis and management in primary care.The belly-off sign: a new clinical diagnostic sign for subscapularis lesions.We describe a new clinical sign for subscapularis lesions that we call the belly-off sign and compare its diagnostic value with standard subscapularis tests (the lift-off test, internal rotation lag sign, and belly-press test/Napoleon sign) in cases of different types of subscapularis lesions. The belly-off sign represents the inability of the patient to maintain the palm of the hand attached to the abdomen with the arm passively brought into flexion and internal rotation.Case series.This descriptive and explorative study included 60 patients (mean age, 55.3 years) with clinical, surgical, and/or magnetic resonance imaging-confirmed evidence of isolated or combined lesions of the subscapularis musculotendinous unit. In all patients, a complete physical shoulder examination was performed and the results were compared with the intraoperative and magnetic resonance imaging findings.The belly-off sign appeared to be more reliable than any other diagnostic test or sign in detecting isolated partial tears of the subscapularis tendon (group I), combined partial subscapularis and complete supraspinatus tendon tears (group II), and postoperative subscapularis insufficiency with mild atrophy of the upper aspect of the subscapularis muscle (group VII). In cases of complete/near complete subscapularis tears with or without supraspinatus and infraspinatus tendon tears (groups IV, V, and VI), the belly-off sign appeared to be as reliable as the belly-press test, internal rotation lag sign, and lift-off test. For assessing partial subscapularis tendon tears and insufficient external rotators (group III), the belly-off sign was less reliable than any other diagnostic test or sign.The belly-off sign represents a promising new clinical diagnostic sign for subscapularis lesions. In particular, subtle lesions of the upper subscapularis tendon and postoperative subscapularis insufficiencies can be detected by the belly-off sign in cases of intact external rotators. In cases of an advanced lack of external rotators, the belly-off sign becomes negative and loses its diagnostic value. We therefore conclude that the belly-off sign is attributable to an unbalanced transverse force couple with overwhelming of the external rotators of the shoulder.Level IV, case series with no, or historical, control group.Correlation between clinical diagnosis and arthroscopic findings of the shoulder.To assess the accuracy of clinical examination by non-specialist orthopaedic surgeons of patients presenting to a diagnostic and treatment centre (DTC) for arthroscopic shoulder surgery.A retrospective review of notes of 130 consecutive shoulder arthroscopies performed at a DTC over a 10 month period. Preoperative clinical diagnosis was compared with operative arthroscopic findings. Additional information from preoperative imaging was compared with clinical examination and arthroscopic findings. Preoperative clinical examinations and consent were undertaken by clinical fellows, (SpR level) and non-upper limb consultant orthopaedic surgeons. Consultants specialising in upper limb surgery performed the operations.Six main groups were identified on the basis of clinical examination: impingement 76 cases (58%), instability 22 cases (17%), frozen shoulder 11 cases (8%), rotator cuff tear four cases (3%), non-specific pain eight cases (6%), and normal clinical examination nine cases (7%). Impingement and instability diagnosed clinically strongly correlated with the arthroscopic findings. Clinical diagnosis of frozen shoulder and rotator cuff tears had a weaker correlation with the arthroscopic findings. Of the nine cases of normal clinical examination, abnormality was found at arthroscopy in all cases.There have been very few studies comparing clinical examination of the shoulder with arthroscopic findings. This study emphasises the importance of good clinical examination skills in diagnosing common shoulder abnormalities. The addition of imaging, particularly ultrasound and magnetic resonance imaging further increases the likelihood of an accurate diagnosis. Shoulder examination should be taught with as much emphasis at both undergraduate and postgraduate level as other orthopaedic clinical examinations.Unstable isolated SLAP lesion: clinical presentation and outcome of arthroscopic fixation.The purpose of this study was to describe the clinical presentation and sensitivity of testing of unstable isolated SLAP (superior labrum anterior posterior) lesions and to evaluate the efficacy of arthroscopic treatment.Case series.A retrospective review was made of 44 unstable SLAP lesions in 41 patients (40 male, 1 female) who did not have other pathologic shoulder findings. The mean follow-up period was 33 months (range, 25 to 67 months) and the mean age at the time of surgery was 24 years (range, 17 to 43 years). Twenty-six patients had an injury on the dominant shoulder and 3 had bilateral shoulder involvement. Arthroscopic fixation was performed with the use of a biodegradable tack (Suretac; Acufex, Mansfield, MA) in 14 cases, and with a screw-type metallic suture anchor (mini-Revo; Linvatec, Largo, FL) in 30 cases.Pain (100%) and clicking (57%) were the most common symptoms. The compression-rotation test was positive in 84% of the patients before surgery. The average UCLA score at the last follow-up was 32.3 points; 22 cases were graded excellent, 16 good, and 6 poor. Based on the postoperative performance data collected from 33 athletes, 25 of them (76%) were able to return to their athletic activities. Among them, throwing athletes showed statistically better performance than did nonthrowing athletes (P = .011).Pain, followed by clicking, was the most common symptom, and the most common sign was a positive compression rotation test. Arthroscopic treatment of unstable isolated SLAP lesions resulted in good or excellent UCLA scores in 86% of the patients. Throwing athletes showed more satisfactory results than nonthrowing athletes.Type IV, case series with no, or historical, control group.Subscapularis tendon tears.Pathology of the subscapularis tendon is both infrequently identified and not commonly considered as a major source of shoulder pain and dysfunction. Subscapularis tendon pathology can present as isolated tears; partial-thickness tears; anterosuperior tears, also involving the supraspinatus tendon; complete rotator cuff avulsion; and rotator interval lesions, in which instability of the long head of the biceps tendon may dominate the clinical presentation. Although an accurate physical examination is paramount, modalities such as arthroscopy, magnetic resonance imaging, and ultrasound have advanced knowledge of the spectrum of abnormalities involving the subscapularis tendon. Nonsurgical management may be effective for most partial tears. Surgically, open repair is more frequent than use of arthroscopic techniques. Tears of the subscapularis tendon portend a different prognosis than do supraspinatus tendon tears, especially when the injury is acute and diagnosis is delayed.Partial-thickness rotator cuff tears.Partial-thickness tears of the rotator cuff have been diagnosed with increased frequency because of a heightened awareness of the condition by clinicians and improved diagnostic methods. Research into the causes, natural history, and optimal treatment of this condition lags behind that of full-thickness tears. However, despite the limitations in the existing literature, there has emerged a consensus among shoulder experts that partial-thickness rotator cuff tears should be aggressively treated in the active athlete because of the unfavorable natural history of these lesions and success of accepted surgical algorithms. This review will provide an overview of the theories regarding the origins of partial-thickness rotator cuff tears, discuss the relative accuracy of accepted diagnostic techniques, and summarize the indications and methods of operative repair with an emphasis on the results of various treatment approaches.The resisted supination external rotation test: a new test for the diagnosis of superior labral anterior posterior lesions.To evaluate a new clinical test, the resisted supination external rotation test, for the diagnosis of superior labral anterior posterior lesions of the shoulder.Cohort study (diagnosis); Level of evidence, 2.Forty athletes (average age, 23.9 years) with activity-related shoulder pain were enrolled in the study. The patients underwent 3 different tests designed specifically to detect superior labral anterior posterior lesions (the resisted supination external rotation test, the crank test, and the active compression test); the tests were performed in a random order on the affected shoulder. The results of the tests were compared with arthroscopic findings.Out of 40 athletes, 29 (72.5%) had superior labral anterior posterior tears. The resisted supination external rotation test had the highest sensitivity (82.8%), specificity (81.8%), positive predictive value (92.3%), negative predictive value (64.3%), and diagnostic accuracy (82.5%) of all tests performed.By re-creating the peel-back mechanism, the resisted supination external rotation test is more accurate than 2 other commonly used physical examination tests designed to diagnose superior labral anterior posterior tears in overhead-throwing athletes. By using this test in the context of a thorough clinical history and physical examination, lesions of the superior labrum can be more reliably diagnosed.The Kim test: a novel test for posteroinferior labral lesion of the shoulder--a comparison to the jerk test.Detection of a posteroinferior labral lesion by physical examination is often difficult.To introduce a novel diagnostic test for detecting a posteroinferior labral lesion of the shoulder.The Kim test can detect a posteroinferior labral lesion of the shoulder.Cohort study (diagnosis); Level of evidence, 1.In 172 painful shoulders, the Kim test was compared with the jerk test and was verified by arthroscopic examination. A sudden onset of posterior shoulder pain and click with or without clunk indicated a positive test result.Thirty-three shoulders had a positive Kim test result, in which 24 had a posteroinferior labral lesion and 9 had a normal posteroinferior labrum. Of 139 shoulders with a negative Kim test result, 6 had a posteroinferior labral tear and 133 had a normal posteroinferior labrum. The sensitivity of the Kim test was 80%, specificity was 94%, positive predictive value was 0.73, and negative predictive value was 0.96. The interexaminer reliability between 2 examiners was 0.91. The accuracy of the jerk test in detecting a posteroinferior labral lesion was the following: sensitivity, 73%; specificity, 98%; positive predictive value, 0.88; and negative predictive value, 0.95. The location of the posterior labral lesion was predominantly posterior in 19 shoulders and predominantly inferior in 11 shoulders. The Kim test was more sensitive in detecting a predominantly inferior labral lesion, whereas the jerk test was more sensitive in detecting a predominantly posterior labral lesion. The sensitivity in detecting a posteroinferior labral lesion increased to 97% when the 2 tests were combined.The Kim test is a reliable diagnostic test for detection of a posteroinferior labral lesion.Current concepts in the recognition and treatment of superior labral (SLAP) lesions.Pathology of the superior aspect of the glenoid labrum (SLAP lesion) poses a significant challenge to the rehabilitation specialist due to the complex nature and wide variety of etiological factors associated with these lesions. A thorough clinical evaluation and proper identification of the extent of labral injury is important to determine the most appropriate nonoperative and/or surgical management. Postoperative rehabilitation is based on the specific surgical procedure as well as the extent, location, and mechanism of labral pathology and associated lesions. Emphasis is placed on protecting the healing labrum, while gradually restoring range of motion, strength, and dynamic stability of the glenohumeral joint. The purpose of this paper is to provide an overview of the anatomy and pathomechanics of SLAP lesions and review specific clinical examination techniques used to identify these lesions, including 3 newly described tests. Furthermore, a review of the current surgical management and postoperative rehabilitation guidelines is provided.Shoulder impingement syndrome.Subacromial impingement syndrome is a common cause of shoulder pain. The purpose of this article is to review the clinical presentation, physical examination findings, and differential diagnosis of impingement syndrome. Using an evidence-based approach, we propose an algorithm for the management of subacromial impingement syndrome including indications for nonoperative management, advanced imaging, and operative management.The effect of rotator cuff tear size on shoulder strength and range of motion.Prospective cohort study.To determine the effect of rotator cuff tear size on shoulder strength and range of motion.Patients with rotator cuff pathology typically present with weakness and motion loss in various motions. The extent to which the presence of a rotator cuff tear and the size of the tear affect strength and range of motion is not well understood.Sixty-one patients scheduled for surgery, with a diagnosis of a rotator cuff tear and/or subacromial impingement, underwent examination for shoulder pain, function, range of motion, and strength. The extent of rotator cuff pathology was documented during subsequent surgery (presence of tear, tear size, tear thickness).There were 10 massive tears, 15 large tears, 13 medium tears, 12 small tears, and 11 rotator cuffs without a tear. Patients had marked weakness in abduction strength at 90 degrees and 10 degrees of abduction, in external rotation strength at 90 degrees, and in the "full can test" (all, P<.0001). Marked range of motion losses in shoulder flexion and external rotation at 0 degrees and 90 degrees abduction (all, P<.001) were also observed. Abduction strength deficit at 10 degrees was affected by rotator cuff tear size (P<.0001). Twenty of 25 patients with large or massive tears had deficits greater than 50%, compared with only 1 of 11 patients with no tear, 2 of 12 patients with a small tear, and 5 of 13 patients with a medium tear (P<.0001). Other strength and range of motion deficits or indices of pain and function were unaffected by tear size.Weakness of greater than 50% relative to the contralateral side in shoulder abduction at 10 degrees of abduction was indicative of a large or massive rotator cuff tear.Subacromial impingement syndrome: the effect of changing posture on shoulder range of movement.Random allocation of subjects into a placebo-controlled, crossover study.To investigate the effect of changing thoracic and scapular posture on shoulder flexion and scapular plane abduction range of motion in asymptomatic subjects, and in subjects with subacromial impingement syndrome.Changes in upper body posture and concomitant imbalance of the muscle system have been proposed as one of the etiological mechanisms leading to subacromial impingement syndrome. Although clinicians commonly assess posture and devise rehabilitation programs to correct posture, there is little evidence to support this practice.Selected postural, range of movement, and pain measurements were investigated in 60 asymptomatic subjects and 60 subjects with subacromial impingement syndrome, prior to and following thoracic and scapular taping intended to change their posture.Changing posture had an effect on all components of posture measured (P<.001) and these changes were associated with a significant increase (P<.001) in the range of motion in shoulder flexion and abduction in the plane of the scapula. Changing posture was not found to have a significant effect on the intensity of pain experienced by the symptomatic subjects, although the point in the range of shoulder elevation at which they experienced their pain was significantly higher (P<.001).The findings of this investigation suggest that changing 1 or more of the components of posture may have a positive effect on shoulder range of movement and the point at which pain is experienced.Interobserver variation in sonography of the painful shoulder.This study was conducted as a prospective assessment of interobserver variability in the sonographic evaluation of the rotator cuff.Three musculoskeletal radiologists who had different levels of scanning experience each performed shoulder sonography on 24 consecutive patients during 1 patient visit. The diagnostic criteria full-thickness rotator cuff tear, tendon calcification, tendinosis of the supraspinatus, subacromial fluid, subacromial synovial/bursal thickening, dynamic signs of impingement, and abnormality in the long head of biceps tendon were scored, with independent observers recording the data. Statistical analysis was performed using Cohen's kappa test, with significance assessed at p values of less than 0.05.There was good agreement (kappa >0.60, p <0.01) between the experienced operators for full-thickness rotator cuff tear, tendon calcification, dynamic signs of impingement, and abnormality of the long head of biceps tendon. There was no significant agreement between the experienced operators and the less experienced operator in several categories, including (and importantly) full-thickness rotator cuff tears (kappa=0.18-0.21).In experienced hands sonography of the rotator cuff is a reproducible diagnostic test, but agreement is poor when there is marked disparity between the operators' experience levels. Our findings suggest a need for a more clearly defined training curriculum for sonography of the shoulder in radiology training programs.Special physical examination tests for superior labrum anterior posterior shoulder tears are clinically limited and invalid: a diagnostic systematic review.The diagnosis of a superior labrum anterior posterior (SLAP) lesion through physical examination has been widely reported in the literature. Most of these studies report high sensitivities and specificities, and claim to be accurate, valid, and reliable. The purpose of this study was to critically evaluate these studies to determine if there was sufficient evidence to support the use of the SLAP physical examination tests as valid and reliable diagnostic test procedures.Strict epidemiologic methodology was used to obtain and collate all relevant articles. Sackett's guidelines were applied to all articles. Confidence intervals and likelihood ratios were determined.Fifteen of 29 relevant studies met the criteria for inclusion. Only one article met all of Sackett's critical appraisal criteria. Confidence intervals for both the positive and negative likelihood ratios contained the value 1.The current literature being used as a resource for teaching in medical schools and continuing education lacks the validity necessary to be useful. There are no good physical examination tests that exist for effectively diagnosing a SLAP lesion.Shoulder strength in asymptomatic individuals with intact compared with torn rotator cuffs.Normative data are essential to the evaluation of shoulder function. The purposes of this study were to establish a normative database of isometric shoulder strength measured in asymptomatic individuals verified to have intact rotator cuffs and to determine the effect of asymptomatic rotator cuff tears on shoulder strength.Two hundred and thirty-seven volunteers with no shoulder pain or history of shoulder injury were screened with ultrasonography bilaterally for rotator cuff tears and then underwent isometric strength measurements for abduction in the scapular plane and external rotation. Statistical analysis was performed to evaluate the effect of age, body habitus, hand dominance, and the presence of a rotator cuff tear on shoulder strength.Of the 237 volunteers, forty-one were found to have a torn rotator cuff in at least one shoulder. The prevalence of rotator cuff tears was 0% for the subjects between forty and forty-nine years old; 10%, between fifty and fifty-nine years old; 20%, between sixty and sixty-nine years old; and 40.7% for those seventy years old or older. Both abduction strength and external rotation strength in the male subjects showed an age-dependent decrease, whereas only abduction strength showed an age-dependent decrease in the female subjects. In multiple regression analysis, age and weight were the most important predictors of abduction strength and external rotation strength, respectively. In the shoulders with a large-to-massive full-thickness rotator cuff tear, abduction strength was significantly decreased (p = 0.007). Additionally, the ratio of abduction strength to external rotation strength was significantly decreased in the shoulders with a large-to-massive full-thickness tear compared with the shoulders with an intact rotator cuff (p < 0.001).There is a high prevalence of rotator cuff tears in elderly asymptomatic individuals. Asymptomatic shoulders with a large-to-massive full-thickness rotator cuff tear have significantly decreased abduction strength. When there is a substantial decrease in abduction strength in relation to external rotation strength, the presence of an asymptomatic full-thickness tear should be suspected in that shoulder. Previous studies establishing normative values for isometric shoulder strength may have been skewed by the presence of asymptomatic rotator cuff tears in elderly subgroups.Internal impingement of the shoulder.Internal impingement of the shoulder is a pathologic condition characterized by excessive or repetitive contact of the greater tuberosity of the humeral head with the posterosuperior aspect of the glenoid when the arm is abducted and externally rotated. This arm positioning leads to rotator cuff and glenoid labrum impingement by the bony structures of the glenohumeral joint. Although some degree of contact between these structures occurs under normal conditions, to date most of the orthopaedic literature has focused on internal impingement as a disease state that affects overhead athletes and is characterized by the development of articular-sided rotator cuff tears and posterosuperior labral lesions. The precise cause of these impingement lesions remains unclear. However, it is believed that varying degrees of glenohumeral instability, posterior capsular contracture, and scapular dyskinesis may play a role in the development of symptomatic internal impingement. The purpose of this article is to review the pathomechanics, clinical complaints, physical examination findings, and imaging findings that are associated with internal impingement. The results of treatment will be reviewed, and a diagnostic and therapeutic algorithm for the management of internal impingement is presented.Contribution of clinical tests to the diagnosis of rotator cuff disease: a systematic literature review.To evaluate the diagnostic performance of clinical tests for degenerative rotator cuff disease, based on a systematic literature review.We searched Medline, Embase, and Pascal Biomed until the first half of 2006 inclusive for articles that reported at least the sensitivity and specificity of clinical tests for rotator cuff disease. Predictive values and accuracy were recorded where available. The results were discussed and validated.We selected nine studies, of which three investigated tests for subacromial impingement syndrome and seven tests for rotator cuff tendinopathy. The Neer and Hawkins tests had good sensitivity but low specificity for subacromial impingement syndrome. For diagnosing tears of the supraspinatus or infraspinatus, the Jobe sign and the full can test showed similar performance characteristics to the Patte test and resisted external rotation with the elbow at the side flexed at 90 degrees . For diagnosing tendinopathies with or without tears, active unresisted external rotation for the infraspinatus and the lift off test for the subscapularis were specific but lacked sensitivity. In one study, limitation of the range of active unresisted internal rotation was sensitive and specific for subscapularis tendon disease. The palm up test performed poorly for diagnosing long head of biceps disease.Data on the diagnostic performance of clinical tests for rotator cuff tendon disease are fragmentary. However objective data exist to support the usefulness of some of these tests. Further studies are needed.The validity and accuracy of clinical tests used to detect labral pathology of the shoulder--a systematic review.Labral tears frequently require repair [Kim S, Ha K, Han K. Biceps Load test: a clinical test for superior labrum anterior and posterior lesions in shoulders with recurrent anterior dislocations. The American Journal of Sports Medicine 1999;27(3):300-3]. Physiotherapists need confidence in clinical tests used to detect labral pathology to accurately identify this condition. This review systematically evaluates the evidence for the accuracy of these tests with reference to study quality and key biases. Cochrane, Medline, Cinahl, AMED, DARE and HTA databases were searched to identify 15 studies evaluating 15 clinical tests for labral pathology against Magnetic Resonance Imaging MRI or surgery. Two independent reviewers assessed methodological quality using Quality Assessment of Diagnostic Accuracy Studies (QUADAS). Meta Disc calculated likelihood ratios (positive LR>10, providing convincing diagnostic evidence of ruling a condition in; negative LR<0.2 providing large to moderate evidence of ruling the condition out) and true positive rates (TPRs) against false positive rates (FPRs) in receiver operator characteristic (ROC) plots and summary receiver operator curves (SROCs). Probable overestimation of accuracy was caused by use of case control design, verification bias and use of a lesser reference standard. Six accurate tests; Biceps Load I (+LR: 29.09; -LR: 0.09) Biceps Load II (+LR: 26.32; -LR: 0.11), Internal Rotation Resistance (IRRT) (+LR: 24.77; -LR: 0.12), Crank (+LR: 13.59 and 6.46; -LR: 0.1 and 0.22), Kim (+LR: 12.62; -LR:0.21) and Jerk (+LR: 34.71; -LR: 0.27) tests were identified from high quality single studies in selected populations. Subgroup analysis identified varying results of accuracy in the Crank test and the Active Compression (AC) test when evaluated in more than one study. Further evaluation is needed before these tests can be used with confidence.Rotator cuff tendinopathy/subacromial impingement syndrome: is it time for a new method of assessment?Disorders of the shoulder are extremely common, with reports of prevalence ranging from 30% of people experiencing shoulder pain at some stage of their lives up to 50% of the population experiencing at least one episode of shoulder pain annually. In addition to the high incidence, shoulder dysfunction is often persistent and recurrent, with 54% of sufferers reporting ongoing symptoms after 3 years. To a large extent the substantial morbidity reflects (i) a current lack of understanding of the pathoaetiology, (ii) a lack of diagnostic accuracy in the assessment process, and (iii) inadequacies in current intervention techniques. Pathology of the rotator cuff and subacromial bursa is considered to be the principal cause of pain and symptoms arising from the shoulder. Generally these diagnostic labels relate more to a clinical hypothesis as to the underlying cause of the symptoms than to definitive evidence of the histological basis for the diagnosis or the correlation between structural failure and symptoms. Diagnosing rotator cuff tendinopathy or subacromial impingement syndrome currently involves performing a structured assessment that includes taking the patient's history in conjunction with performing clinical assessment procedures that generally involve tests used to implicate an isolated structure. Based on the response to the clinical tests, a diagnosis of rotator cuff tendinopathy or subacromial impingement syndrome is achieved. The clinical diagnosis is strengthened with the findings from supporting investigations such as blood tests, radiographs, ultrasound, magnetic resonance imaging (MRI), computed axial tomography (CT), radionucleotide isotope scan, single photon emission computed tomography, electromyography, nerve conduction and diagnostic analgesic injection. This process eventually results in the formation of a clinical hypothesis, and then, in conjunction with the patient, a management plan is decided upon and implemented. This paper focuses on the dilemmas associated with the current process, and an alternative method for the clinical examination of the shoulder for this group of patients is proposed.Intra- and interexaminer reliability of four manual shoulder maneuvers used to identify subacromial pain.Shoulder pain is a diagnostic challenge and the physical clinical examination of the shoulder is crucial. It is important that the diagnostic tests used are valid as well as reliable. The objective of the study was to assess intra- and interexaminer reliability for four manual shoulder maneuvers; the Neer impingement sign, the Hawkins-Kennedy impingement test, the Patte maneuver, the Jobe supraspinatus test. These maneuvers are frequently used in clinical practice to examine patients with shoulder complaints in which subacromial pain is highly suspected. Thirty-three participants with shoulder pain were included consecutively. Within a week from inclusion, the four maneuvers were performed by a physiotherapist. The procedure was standardized in order to increase reproducibility. After a week, the maneuvers were performed again by the same physical therapist (test-retest) and by another physical therapist (test for interexaminer reliability). All four maneuvers have an almost perfect agreement (Kappa coefficients 0.91-1.00), if performed with suggested standardizations. Neer impingement sign, Hawkins-Kennedy impingement test, Patte maneuver as well as Jobe supraspinatus test, are highly reproducible and therefore reliable to use in clinical practice to identify patients with subacromial pain with an impingement phenomenon, but the maneuvers are limited as structural discriminators.Interobserver reliability of physical examination of shoulder girdle.The object of this study was to assess interobserver reliability in 23 tests concerning physical examination of the shoulder girdle. A physical therapist and a physical therapist/manual therapist independently performed a physical examination of the shoulder girdle in 91 patients with shoulder complaints of varying severity and duration. The observers assessed 23 items in total: active and passive abductions, passive external rotation, hand in neck (HIN) test, hand in back (HIB) test, impingement test according to Neer, springing test of the first rib and joint play test of the acromioclavicular joint. The interobserver reliability was evaluated by means of a Cohen's Kappa, the weighted Kappa and the intraclass correlation (ICC). Criteria for acceptable reliability were: Kappa value>or=0.60, ICC>or=0.75 or an absolute agreement>or=80%. The results showed that Kappa values varied from 0.09 (springing test first rib, stiffness) to 0.66 (springing test first rib, pain), weighted Kappa varied from 0.35 (pain during HIB) to 0.73 (range of motion HIB) and ICC varied from 0.54 (abduction passive starting point painful arc) to 0.96 (active and passive ranges of motion in abduction). In total 11 (48%) items fulfilled the criteria of acceptable reliability. In conclusion, there appears to be a great deal of variation in the reliability of the tests used in the physical examination of the shoulder girdle. Over 50% of the tests did not meet the statistical criteria for acceptable reliability.Identifying SLAP lesions: a meta-analysis of clinical tests and exercise in clinical reasoning.To identify all published accounts of diagnostic accuracy for clinical tests of Superior Labral Antero-Posterior (SLAP) lesion of the shoulder, and provide an estimate of the pooled likelihood ratio for those tests that have been evaluated at least three times. A clinical reasoning exercise is presented to illustrate clinical useability of the findings.Systematic review and meta-analysis.An extensive review of international electronic databases was performed to identify all published works of diagnostic accuracy of any test proposed to be diagnostic for SLAP lesions of the shoulder. Statistical pooling of likelihood ratios was performed using a random-effects model to provide an estimate of the pooled positive likelihood ratio (PLR) for each test with at least three data points available.Twelve studies describing 14 tests were identified. Five tests had been evaluated at least 3 times in the published literature. Methodologic quality scoring was performed and data were extracted. The pooled PLR revealed that of the five tests studies, only Yergason's test demonstrates consistent evidence of significant diagnostic accuracy (PLR 2.29). Heterogeneity of effect sizes was present for the Crank test. The heterogeneity was substantially improved through removal of the effect from the study in which the test was initially described and validated. The fail-safe N statistic suggests that the findings for Yergason's test are robust to publication bias. None of the tests reviewed are very strong.Among the clinical tests for SLAP lesions that have been published to date, Yergason's test is the only one that shows a significant ability to influence clinical decision making, based on the results of the current analysis. Methodologic inadequacies in the reporting of the publications are common, and caution must be exercised when drawing inferences from the results of these studies.Tears of the subscapularis tendon in athletes--diagnosis and repair techniques.Isolated injury to the subscapularis tendon is an uncommon - but potentially debilitating - injury among athletes. The most frequent injury pattern seen in younger athletes is an acute, traumatic tendon avulsion. In the older athletic population, chronic degenerative tearing of the tendon may precede sports-related rupture, particularly following shoulder dislocation. This article reviews how to diagnose this injury in athletes, and describes both conservative and operative treatment options and their outcomes.Superior labral lesions anterior to posterior-evaluation and arthroscopic management.Lesions of the superior labrum are complex and difficult to both diagnose and treat effectively. The clinical diagnosis is challenging due to the nonspecific history and physical examination. MRI has substantially improved our ability to detect SLAP tears, although experience is necessary to distinguish pathologic findings from normal anatomic variants. Treatment is determined by patient age, functional demands, and the type of lesion identified.Most clinical tests cannot accurately diagnose rotator cuff pathology: a systematic review.Do clinical tests accurately diagnose rotator cuff pathology?A systematic review of investigations into the diagnostic accuracy of clinical tests for rotator cuff pathology.People with shoulder pain who underwent clinical testing in order to diagnose rotator cuff pathology.The diagnostic accuracy of clinical tests was determined using likelihood ratios.Thirteen studies met the inclusion criteria. The 13 studies evaluated 14 clinical tests in 89 separate evaluations of diagnostic accuracy. Only one evaluation, palpation for supraspinatus ruptures, resulted in significant positive and negative likelihood ratios. Eight of the 89 evaluations resulted in either significant positive or negative likelihood ratios. However, none of these eight positive or negative likelihood ratios were found in other studies. Of the 89 evaluations of clinical tests 71 (80%) did not result in either significant positive or negative likelihood ratio evaluations across different studies.Overall, most tests for rotator cuff pathology were inaccurate and cannot be recommended for clinical use. At best, suspicion of a rotator cuff tear may be heightened by a positive palpation, combined Hawkins/painful arc/infraspinatus test, Napoleon test, lift-off test, belly-press test, or drop-arm test, and it may be reduced by a negative palpation, empty can test or Hawkins-Kennedy test.Lack of uniformity in diagnostic labeling of shoulder pain: time for a different approach.Diagnostic labels for shoulder pain (e.g., frozen shoulder, impingement syndrome) are widely used in international research and clinical practice. However, about 10 years ago it was shown that the criteria to define those labels were not uniform. Since an ongoing lack of uniformity seriously hampers communication and does not serve patients, we decided to evaluate the uniformity in definitions. Therefore, we compared the selection criteria of different randomised controlled trials (RCTs). This comparison revealed some corresponding criteria, but no uniform definition could be derived for any of the diagnostic labels. Besides the lack of uniformity, the currently used labels have only a fair to moderate interobserver reproducibility and in systematic reviews none of the separate trials using a diagnostic label show a large benefit of treatment. This, altogether, seems sufficient reason to reconsider their use. Therefore, we strongly suggest to abolish the use of these labels and direct future research towards undivided populations with "general" shoulder pain. Possible subgroups with a better prognosis and/or treatment result, based on common characteristics that are easily and validly reproducible, can then be identified within these populations.Screening the athlete's shoulder for impingement symptoms: a clinical reasoning algorithm for early detection of shoulder pathology.Chronic shoulder pain and dysfunction are common complaints among overhead athletes seeking care from physical medicine and rehabilitation. Impingement is a frequently described pathological condition in the overhead athlete. Impingement symptoms may be the result of rotator cuff pathology, shoulder instability, scapular dyskinesis or muscle dysfunction, biceps pathology, SLAP lesions and chronic stiffness of the posterior capsule. At present, numerous different shoulder tests have been described in literature and discussed with respect to their individual diagnostic accuracy. However, in view of the number of shoulder tests, it is often a challenge for the clinician to select the appropriate tests for diagnosing the underlying pathology. The purpose of this paper is to present and discuss a clinical algorithm which may be used in the early detection of the underlying causes of impingement symptoms. In this algorithm, a specific chronology and selection of diagnostic tests may offer the clinician a guideline in his physical examination of the athlete with shoulder pain.Diagnostic accuracy of clinical tests for superior labral anterior posterior lesions: a systematic review.Systematic literature review.To conduct a systematic review of case series and clinical trials that investigate the diagnostic accuracy of clinical tests for superior labral anterior posterior (SLAP) lesions.Primary contact practitioners are often presented with shoulder problems and use a battery of clinical tests to reach a diagnosis. Early detection of SLAP pathology may lead to more optimal interventions and better outcomes for patients.The OVID search interface was utilized with MEDLINE, AHMED, CINAHL, and SPORTDiscus databases searched from 1996-2006. Studies were retrieved that included patients with shoulder pain who underwent at least 1 clinical shoulder test for SLAP lesions. For an article to be included in this review, the results of the clinical tests needed to be compared with findings on arthroscopy. Quality of the manuscripts included in this review were rated using the QUADAS appraisal tool, so comparisons could be made across studies.Seventeen published manuscripts fit the inclusion/exclusion criteria and were used for this review. Eight studies were found to be of high quality. Within these 8 studies, 1 group of authors reported high diagnostic accuracy values for the crank test: sensitivity, 91% (95% confidence interval [CI], 76%-97%); specificity, 93% (95% CI, 79%-88%); positive likelihood ratio, 13.6 (95% CI, 3.6-52.1); and negative likelihood ratio, 0.1 (95% CI, 0.0-0.3). One study on the resisted supination external rotation test also scored high on the QUADAS and reported diagnostic accuracy values of 83% (95% CI, 66-92), 82% (95% CI, 52-95), 4.6 (95% CI, 1.3-16.1), and 0.20 (95% CI, 0.1-0.5), respectively. Of significance is the fact that the majority of papers reporting highly accurate clinical diagnostic tests were of low quality with the results not supported by other authors.It appears that no single test is sensitive or specific enough to determine the presence of a SLAP lesion accurately. Further research is required to determine whether subgrouping of patients by mechanism of injury or the type of SLAP lesion may improve diagnostic accuracy. Determining the diagnostic accuracy of a combination of 2 or more tests is also needed.The validity of the lag signs in diagnosing full-thickness tears of the rotator cuff: a preliminary investigation.To investigate whether the lag signs were valid tools in diagnosing full-thickness tears of the rotator cuff.A same-subject, correlation, double-blinded design was used. The results of the external rotation lag sign, drop sign, and internal rotation lag sign were compared with the criterion standard of diagnostic ultrasound to establish their accuracy.A regional orthopedic hospital.Consecutive subjects (N=37), 21 women and 16 men, with shoulder pain referred to a consultant orthopedic surgeon specializing in shoulder conditions were recruited for this investigation.Not applicable.Sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative likelihood ratios of the lag signs when using ultrasound as the reference test.The specificities of the drop sign and internal rotation lag sign were 77% and 84%, respectively, which, together with low positive likelihood ratios 3.2 (95% confidence interval [CI], 1.5-6.7) and 6.2 (95% CI, 1.9-12.0), indicate that a positive result was poor at recognizing the presence of full-thickness tears. The drop sign had a sensitivity of 73% with a negative likelihood ratio of .34 (95% CI, 0.2-0.8), suggesting that a negative test was fair at ruling out the presence of full-thickness tears. The sensitivity of the internal rotation lag sign (100%) supported by the negative likelihood ratio of 0 (95% CI, 0.0-2.5) suggests that a negative test will effectively rule out the presence of full-thickness tears of the subscapularis. A positive external rotation lag sign is the clinical test most likely to indicate that full-thickness tears of the supraspinatus and infraspinatus are present (specificity, 94%). However, the external rotation lag sign did demonstrate a low sensitivity score of 46% and negative likelihood ratio of .57 (95% CI, 0.4-0.9), which means that a negative test will not rule out the presence of full-thickness tears.The findings of this investigation suggest that a clinical diagnosis of a full-thickness tear of the rotator cuff cannot be conclusively reached using one or more of the lag signs.A new SLAP test: the supine flexion resistance test.This study describes a new test to detect SLAP lesions. The sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values with respect to the diagnosis of a SLAP lesion were determined in comparison to Speed's test and the O'Brien test.One hundred fifty patients presenting for arthroscopic surgery with persisting pain or functional disability of the shoulder underwent a complete shoulder examination. All patients underwent Speed's test, the O'Brien test, and the new supine flexion resistance test. The clinical results of the tests were correlated with the presence of a SLAP lesion by direct arthroscopic visualization.The supine flexion resistance test had a sensitivity of 80% and a specificity of 69%, whereas Speed's test and the O'Brien test had sensitivities of 60% and 94%, respectively, and specificities of 38% and 28%, respectively. Regarding isolated SLAP lesions, the supine flexion resistance test was highly sensitive, with a sensitivity of 92% (58% for Speed's test and 75% for the O'Brien test). For isolated tears of the supraspinatus, the specificity of the supine flexion resistance test was 75% (14% for Speed's test and 17% for the O'Brien test).Compared with the O'Brien test and Speed's test, the supine flexion resistance test proves to be more specific, with a specificity of 69% for the whole study population (28% for the O'Brien test and 38% for Speed's test) and with a specificity of 75% for the group of patients with isolated supraspinatus lesions (17% for the O'Brien test and 14% for Speed's test). The new test is a useful and effective test for detecting type II SLAP lesions. The high specificity enables the elimination of false-positive results of other clinical tests that are more sensitive but not specific.Level II, development of diagnostic criteria with consecutive patients and universally applied gold standard.A 'one-stop clinic' for the diagnosis and management of rotator cuff pathology: Getting the right diagnosis first time.We have introduced a one-stop clinic for the diagnosis and management of rotator cuff tears (RCTs). The aim of the study was to determine the effect of the one-stop clinic on the interval and delay in management for patients with suspected rotator cuff pathology.Seventy-four patients were reviewed retrospectively; 39 had an ultrasound of the shoulder before (group 1), and 35 patients after (group 2) the new protocol was introduced. Patients in group 2 had a shoulder ultrasound scan (USS) on the day of their clinic appointment or beforehand based upon the General Practitioners (GP) letter. Indications included patients over the age of 30, or patients with a history of trauma or a painful shoulder.Twenty-four patients were diagnosed with RCTs on USS with an overall sensitivity of 93.75%, specificity 100% and accuracy of 91% for full thickness tears. Clinical detection alone had an overall sensitivity of 80%, a specificity of 91% and accuracy of 87%. Mean time from GP referral to definitive management plan was 6.49 months (SD 2.74) in group 1, compared with 4.63 months (SD 1.43) in group 2 with an overall reduction in half the number of clinic appointments. This was statistically significant (p < 0.001).Ultrasound scan of the shoulder is an accurate and reliable method of detecting full thickness RCTs. The one-stop clinic significantly shortened the interval between GP referral and definitive management.Accuracy of physical examination in subacromial impingement syndrome.Shoulder pain is a common complaint, frequently caused by subacromial impingement syndrome (SIS). There are a number of physical examination (PE) manoeuvres that explore the subacromial space. MRI provides an accurate anatomic image of the subacromial space, being the current gold standard in the diagnosis of SIS. The aim of this study is to evaluate the accuracy of the PE in the diagnosis of SIS and/or subacromial-subdeltoid bursitis (SSB) confirmed by MRI.Consecutive outpatients with an episode of shoulder pain were prospectively included in the study. They were examined by a rheumatologist and, within 3 days, an MRI was done. Sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, and accuracy of PE manoeuvres were calculated using a 2 x 2 table.Fourteen males and 16 females were included. All the tests exhibited acceptable sensitivity. As a result Yocum manoeuvre was considered the most sensitive and most accurate for SIS. With regard to SSB, the Gerber test was the most sensitive. The majority of the PE manoeuvres showed low specificity.Most PE manoeuvres identify reasonably well subacromial impingement of the shoulder, although, in general, they have low specificity. The Yocum test has the best sensitivity and precision. Our data suggest that imaging techniques should be recommended to better define shoulder lesions.Effect of the Scapula Reposition Test on shoulder impingement symptoms and elevation strength in overhead athletes.Two group, repeated measures design.To determine whether manually repositioning the scapula using the Scapula Reposition Test (SRT) reduces pain and increases shoulder elevation strength in athletes with and without positive signs of shoulder impingement.Symptom alteration tests may be useful in determining a subset of those with shoulder pathology who may benefit from interventions aimed at improving scapular motion abnormalities.One hundred forty-two college athletes underwent testing for clinical signs of shoulder impingement. Tests provoking symptoms were repeated with the scapula manually repositioned into greater retraction and posterior tilt. A numeric rating scale was used to measure symptom intensity under both conditions. Isometric shoulder elevation strength was measured using a mounted dynamometer with the scapula in its natural position and with manual repositioning. A paired t test was used to compare the strength between positions. The frequency of a significant increase in strength with scapular repositioning, defined as the minimal detectable change (90% confidence interval), was also assessed.Of the 98 athletes with a positive impingement test, 46 had reduced pain with scapular repositioning. Although repositioning produced an increase in strength in both the impingement (P=.001) and non-impingement groups (P=.012), a significant increase in strength was found with repositioning in only 26% of athletes with, and 29% of athletes without positive signs for shoulder impingement.The SRT is a simple clinical test that may potentially be useful in an impairment based classification approach to shoulder problems.A new test of resistance in the diagnosis of postero-superior rotator cuff tears.The aim of this study was to assess the diagnostic accuracy of a new clinical test for the diagnosis of subacromial impingement and full thickness postero-superior rotator cuff tears. One hundred and twenty patients who underwent arthroscopic treatment for acromioplasty or cuff repair were previously submitted to a new test of resistance. The test is performed in the standing position with the involved arm in 90 degrees abduction, 20 degrees -30 degrees anteposition and in external rotation (as for full-can test). Thus, the patient was invited to follow the way of a spiral drawn on a drawing sheet for 20 turns; 1 turn = from the centre to the end of the spiral and vice versa (spiral width = 20 cm). The test was considered positive when the patient was not able to conclude it due to strength decrease or to shoulder pain. Sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values as well as diagnostic accuracy were calculated for our test of resistance. The test resulted scarcely reliable as detector of subacromial impingement and not very reliable as detector of small tear. When the test is positive there is a high probability that a subacromial disease exists; instead, when it is negative there is a high probability that the patient has not a large or massive cuff tear. The resistance test (Gum-Turn test) adds to our armamentarium of physical examination signs in patients with painful shoulder and furnishes further information on possible dimensions of tendinous tear.Physical examination and magnetic resonance imaging in the diagnosis of superior labrum anterior-posterior lesions of the shoulder: a sensitivity analysis.The overall purpose of our study was to examine the sensitivity of physical examination, magnetic resonance imaging (MRI), and magnetic resonance (MR) arthrogram for the identification of arthroscopically confirmed SLAP lesions of the shoulder.An analysis of 51 consecutive patients with arthroscopically confirmed SLAP lesions and no history of shoulder dislocation was performed. Before undergoing surgery, all patients underwent a standardized physical examination and had either an MRI and/or MR arthrogram performed. Sensitivity analysis was then performed on the results of both the physical examination maneuvers and the radiologic imaging compared to the arthroscopic findings at surgery.The sensitivity of O'Brien's (active compression) test was 90%, whereas the Mayo (dynamic) shear was 80% and Jobe's relocation test was 76%. The sensitivity of a physical examination with any 1 of these 3 SLAP provocative tests being positive was 100%. Neer's sign (41%) and Hawkin's impingement tests (31%) each had low sensitivity for SLAP lesions. The sensitivity of MRI for SLAP lesions was 67% when interpreted by the performing surgeon, 53% when read by a radiologist. When the MR arthrograms were analyzed alone, the sensitivity was 72% (surgeon) and 50% (radiologist), respectively.All 3 physical examination maneuvers traditionally considered provocative for SLAP pathology (O'Brien's, Mayo shear, and Jobe's relocation) were sensitive for the diagnosis of SLAP lesions. MRI and MR arthrogram imaging had lower sensitivity than these physical examination tests in diagnosing SLAP lesions. Patient history, demographics, and the surgeon's physical examination should remain central to the diagnosis of SLAP lesions.Level II, development of diagnostic criteria on basis of consecutive patients with universally applied gold standard.The evaluation of various physical examinations for the diagnosis of type II superior labrum anterior and posterior lesion.Many types of physical examinations have been used to diagnose superior labrum anterior and posterior lesions; no decisive clinical test is available for confirming the diagnosis.A selection from 10 well-established physical tests, alone or in combination, can be used to differentiate lesions with biceps anchor detachment from those with an intact biceps anchor with arthroscopic correlation.Case control study (diagnosis); Level of evidence, 3.Among 297 patients who underwent shoulder arthroscopy between January 2004 and July 2005, 146 patients were enrolled in the study as a type II superior labrum anterior and posterior lesion group and an age-matched control group. Sensitivity, specificity, and predictive values of each test and all possible combinations of 2 and 3 tests were analyzed. The same procedures were repeated in patients younger than and older than 40 years.The sensitivities of the Whipple, O'Brien, apprehension, and compression-rotation tests and the specificities of the Yergason, biceps load II, and Kibler tests were relatively high. No single physical examination was found to be simultaneously highly sensitive and specific for the diagnosis of a type II superior labrum anterior and posterior lesion. When 2 of the 3 relatively sensitive tests (O'Brien, apprehension, or compression-rotation test) were combined with 1 of the 3 relatively specific tests (Speed, Yergason, or biceps load II test), sensitivity and specificity reached approximately 70% and 95%, respectively. Similar trends were noted in the younger and older patient groups and in the isolated type II superior labrum anterior and posterior lesion group.The data suggest that some combinations of 2 relatively sensitive clinical tests and 1 relatively specific clinical test increase the diagnostic efficacy of superior labrum anterior and posterior lesions. Requiring 1 of the 3 chosen tests to be positive will result in a sensitivity of about 75%, whereas requiring all 3 to be positive will result in a specificity of about 90%.Reliability and diagnostic accuracy of history and physical examination for diagnosing glenoid labral tears.Glenoid labral tears provide a diagnostic challenge.Combinations of items in the patient history and physical examination will provide stronger diagnostic accuracy to suggest the presence or absence of glenoid labral tear than will individual items.Cohort study (diagnosis); Level of evidence, 1.History and examination findings in patients with shoulder pain (N = 55) were compared with arthroscopic findings to determine diagnostic accuracy and intertester reliability.The intertester reliability of the crank, anterior slide, and active compression tests was 0.20 to 0.24. A combined history of popping or catching and positive crank or anterior slide results yielded specificities of 0.91 and 1.00 and positive likelihood ratios of 3.0 and infinity, respectively. A positive anterior slide result combined with either a positive active compression or crank result yielded specificities of 0.91 and positive likelihood ratio of 2.75 and 3.75, respectively. Requiring only a single positive finding in the combination of popping or catching and the anterior slide or crank yielded sensitivities of 0.82 and 0.89 and negative likelihood ratios of 0.31 and 0.33, respectively.The diagnostic accuracy of individual tests in previous studies is quite variable, which may be explained in part by the modest reliability of these tests. The combination of popping or catching with a positive crank or anterior slide result or a positive anterior slide result with a positive active compression or crank test result suggests the presence of a labral tear. The combined absence of popping or catching and a negative anterior slide or crank result suggests the absence of a labral tear.Physical examination tests of the shoulder: a systematic review with meta-analysis of individual tests.To compile and critique research on the diagnostic accuracy of individual orthopaedic physical examination tests in a manner that would allow clinicians to judge whether these tests are valuable to their practice.A computer-assisted literature search of MEDLINE, CINAHL, and SPORTDiscus databases (1966 to October 2006) using keywords related to diagnostic accuracy of physical examination tests of the shoulder. The Quality Assessment of Diagnostic Accuracy Studies (QUADAS) tool was used to critique the quality of each paper. Meta-analysis through meta-regression of the diagnostic odds ratio (DOR) was performed on the Neer test for impingement, the Hawkins-Kennedy test for impingement, and the Speed test for superior labral pathology.Forty-five studies were critiqued with only half demonstrating acceptable high quality and only two having adequate sample size. For impingement, the meta-analysis revealed that the pooled sensitivity and specificity for the Neer test was 79% and 53%, respectively, and for the Hawkins-Kennedy test was 79% and 59%, respectively. For superior labral (SLAP) tears, the summary sensitivity and specificity of the Speed test was 32% and 61%, respectively. Regarding orthopaedic special tests (OSTs) where meta-analysis was not possible either due to lack of sufficient studies or heterogeneity between studies, the list that demonstrates both high sensitivity and high specificity is short: hornblowers's sign and the external rotation lag sign for tears of the rotator cuff, biceps load II for superior labral anterior to posterior (SLAP) lesions, and apprehension, relocation and anterior release for anterior instability. Even these tests have been under-studied or are from lower quality studies or both. No tests for impingement or acromioclavicular (AC) joint pathology demonstrated significant diagnostic accuracy.Based on pooled data, the diagnostic accuracy of the Neer test for impingement, the Hawkins-Kennedy test for impingement and the Speed test for labral pathology is limited. There is a great need for large, prospective, well-designed studies that examine the diagnostic accuracy of the numerous physical examination tests of the shoulder. Currently, almost without exception, there is a lack of clarity with regard to whether common OSTs used in clinical examination are useful in differentially diagnosing pathologies of the shoulder.Ultrasonographic findings of the shoulder in patients with rheumatoid arthritis and comparison with physical examination.The objectives of this study were: 1) to identify the ultrasonographic (US) abnormalities and 2) to compare the findings of physical examination with US findings in rheumatoid arthritis (RA) patients with shoulder pain. We studied 30 RA patients. Physical examination was performed systemically as follows: 1) area of tenderness; 2) range of passive and active shoulder motion; 3) impingement tests; 4) maneuvers for determining the location of the tendon lesions. US investigations included the biceps, the supraspinatus, infraspinatus, and subscapularis tendons; the subacromial-subdeltoid bursa; and the glenohumeral and acromioclavicular joints. Thirty RA patients with 35 painful and 25 non-painful shoulders were examined. The range of motion affected the most by shoulder pain was abduction. The most frequent US finding of shoulder joint was effusion in the long head of the biceps tendon. Among the rotator cuff tendons, subscapularis was the most frequently involved. Tendon tear was also common among non-painful shoulders. Physical examination used for the diagnosis of shoulder pain had low sensitivity and specificity for detecting abnormalities in the rheumatoid shoulder joint. In conclusion, US abnormalities showed frequent tendon tears in our RA patients. Physical examination had low sensitivity and specificity for detecting rotator cuff tear in the rheumatoid shoulder joint.Shoulder: what the orthopaedic doctor needs to know.Diagnosing shoulder pathology accurately requires both clinical expertise and the ability to interpret and correlate radiographic studies. Variational anatomy of the shoulder combined with the complexity of physical examination makes this difficult. Physical examination of the shoulder often leaves the surgeon with more than one working diagnosis. Imaging studies of the shoulder are more valuable if used to confirm a working diagnosis as opposed to reading the study in a vacuum. Clinical correlation should also be considered for any and all findings on an imaging study. Collaboration of the surgeon and the radiologist is essential in reducing the number of over-reported findings that are clinically insignificant. The surgeon should directly communicate with the radiologist as to his or her working diagnosis and the goal of the study. In this way the surgeon and radiologist become superior diagnosticians.Temporal variations in a modified Neer impingement test can confound clinical interpretation.High variability in the time required for patients to have substantial pain relief after Neer-type subacromial impingement tests might help explain conflicting data regarding their effectiveness in guiding treatment and predicting surgical outcomes. To focus on quantifying temporal variability associated with a modified (local anesthetic and corticosteroid) impingement test, we hypothesized that substantial pain relief (greater than 75% reduction) can occur beyond the 10-minute interval many clinicians use for determining results of this test. Fourteen females and 12 males (mean age, 55.6 years) who received subacromial injections for Stage II impingement completed 10-cm visual analog scales for pain at 5, 10, 20, 30, and 40 minutes postinjection. There were 11 patients (42%) who attained at least 75% relief by 10 minutes compared with nine (35%) additional patients who subsequently attained 75% relief after 10 minutes. On average, 75% reduction in pain did not occur until after 30 minutes postinjection. Data analysis also revealed two groups: (1) rapid responders with greater than 50% pain relief by 10 minutes; and (2) delayed responders with greater than 50% pain relief after 10 minutes. Assessing pain at 10 minutes for a Neer-type impingement test can fail to accurately determine a positive test in a substantial percentage of patients.MR shoulder arthrography in patients younger than 40 years of age: frequency of rotator cuff tear versus labroligamentous pathology.The purpose of this study was to compare the frequency of rotator cuff pathology versus labroligamentous pathology in patients younger than 40 years and to determine whether routine MR arthrography is justified in all patients in this age group, regardless of the clinical symptoms. The MR arthrography was carried out on 332 patients 40 years of age and younger. Two hundred and forty-three patients had clinical history of instability and possible labroligamentous pathology. Eighty-nine patients had no history or physical signs of instability and were referred for reasons other than instability, such as assessment for rotator cuff tear. In the 243 patients younger than 40 years with clinical history of potential labral pathology, 39% (95/243) showed a labral tear and 2.1% (5/243) had a full-thickness rotator cuff tendon tear. In the 89 patients with no history suggesting labral pathology, 19% (17/89) showed an unsuspected labral tear and 4.5% (4/89) had a full-thickness rotator cuff tear. These findings suggest that, regardless of the clinical indication for referral, patients aged 40 and less referred for shoulder MRI should be imaged using MR arthrography because of the significant risk that symptoms are related to unsuspected labral pathology.Diagnostic accuracy of shoulder ultrasound performed by a single operator.Both diagnostic ultrasound and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) are used for investigation of the presence and severity of rotator cuff lesions. There is no consensus as to which is the more accurate and cost-effective study. We sought to examine the sensitivity of ultrasound, when used by one experienced radiologist with modern equipment. We compared the ultrasound and surgical results obtained from 68 patients. Ultrasound showed a sensitivity of 89% and specificity of 100% (Positive Predictive Value 100%) for full-thickness tears, and a sensitivity of 79% and specificity of 94% (Positive Predictive Value 87%) for partial-thickness tears. We found that shoulder ultrasound, in the hands of an experienced radiologist with the use of modern high-resolution equipment, is highly sensitive in differentiating complete tears and partial-thickness tears. Our results are similar to the best published results for MRI and given that ultrasound is significantly cheaper and more available, ultrasound by an experienced radiologist should be considered as a primary diagnostic tool for imaging the rotator cuff.The passive compression test: a new clinical test for superior labral tears of the shoulder.Even though there are several physical tests available for superior labrum anterior posterior lesions, there have been very few reports on their accuracy, and none can be regarded as completely predictive for the presence of a superior labrum anterior posterior lesion in the shoulder joint.This new clinical test is a useful and accurate technique for detecting superior labral tears in the shoulder joint.Cohort study (diagnosis); Level of evidence, 2.This test was conducted independently by 2 physicians before any other diagnostic evaluation. In all cases, the glenohumeral joint was investigated first, and the appropriate treatments were performed on the lesion. A protocol was established to evaluate the sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values of this new clinical test. The reproducibility of this test was evaluated with a kappa coefficient.Sixty-one patients (61 shoulders) were examined with the passive compression test, and all underwent arthroscopic surgery. In 31 patients with a positive passive compression test result, 27 had a superior labrum anterior posterior lesion, and in 30 patients with a negative passive compression test result, 6 had a superior labrum anterior posterior lesion. The sensitivity of the test was 81.8%, and the specificity was 85.7%. The positive predictive value was 87.1%, and the negative predictive value was 80.0%. The kappa coefficient was 0.771 between the 2 independent examiners (P< .01).The passive compression test is a useful and accurate technique for predicting superior labral tears of the shoulder joint.Incidence of os acromiale in patients with shoulder pain.A prospective case series was undertaken to determine the incidence of os acromiale in patients presenting to an orthopedic clinic with shoulder pain during a 6-month period. Ninety-three shoulders in 88 consecutive patients were evaluated by history, physical examination, and radiographs. Radiographs included anteroposterior, scapular Y, and axillary views in all patients. Based on history and physical examination, no patient was given a primary diagnosis of os acromiale. However, when the plain films were specifically reviewed for this entity, it was present in 6 (6.82%) of the 88 patients. It was seen on the axillary view in each case. Five (83.3%) of the 6 patients had been given a diagnosis of either impingement or rotator cuff tear based on physical examination. Os acromiale is an infrequent but not rare entity that must be kept in mind when evaluating patients with shoulder pain, as failure to recognize an os acromiale may negatively influence treatment results. An axillary view should be obtained when evaluating patients with shoulder pain.Clinical assessment of superior glenoid labral lesions: a systematic review.Superior labral anterior posterior (SLAP) lesions of the glenoid have proven difficult to diagnose clinically. SLAP-lesion-specific physical examination tests have been developed to improve clinical acumen. Initial reported performance of these tests has not been reproduced by independent investigation. We hypothesized SLAP-specific physical examination tests could not provide a definitive diagnosis of a SLAP lesion. We further intended to elucidate factors responsible for the variable performance of SLAP-specific tests. A review of the literature through Medline and Embase database searches was conducted. All studies with level of evidence of III or better involved in the reporting of diagnostic accuracy of SLAP-specific physical examination tests were included and reviewed. Each instance of independent evaluation of a SLAP-specific examination showed poorer examination performance than in the originating study. Considerable variability existed between independent evaluations of a given SLAP-specific examination as well. We concluded SLAP-specific physical examination results cannot be used as the sole basis of a diagnosis of a SLAP lesion. Differences in patient populations between studies and the accompanying differences in SLAP lesion prevalence and comorbid conditions played the greatest role in test result variance.Anterior and posterior instability of the long head of the biceps tendon in rotator cuff tears: a new classification based on arthroscopic observations.The purpose of this study was to evaluate arthroscopically the frequency and type of instability of the long head of the biceps (LHB) tendon in patients undergoing rotator cuff repair.In 200 consecutive patients undergoing arthroscopic rotator cuff repair, LHB instability was assessed statically and dynamically in the anteroposterior direction. In addition, macroscopic lesions of the LHB, as well as lesions of the adjacent rotator cuff tendons, were documented.LHB instability (subluxation or dislocation) was found in 45% of patients, with isolated anterior instability in 16%, isolated posterior instability in 19%, and combined anteroposterior instability in 10%. Whereas LHB subluxations were observed in both directions, dislocations were only seen in anterior LHB instability. Anterior instability was more associated with a subscapularis lesion, whereas posterior instability was more associated with a supraspinatus tear. Lesions of the LHB tendon were strongly associated with LHB instability and the size of the rotator cuff tear.In 200 patients with rotator cuff tears LHB instability could be observed arthroscopically in 45%, with 16% being anterior, 19% being posterior, and 10% being anteroposterior. LHB instability was associated with LHB lesions, with 15% of the LHB tendons showing a normal appearance when unstable versus 70% when stable. Preoperative O'Brien and Speed tests did not correlate with intraoperative observed LHB pathology. The size of the rotator cuff tear could be correlated with the grade of LHB lesion, becoming more significant with augmenting tear size. On the basis of these observations, we created a new arthroscopic classification of LHB instability with respect to the direction and extent of LHB instability, lesions of the LHB, and status of the adjacent rotator cuff tendons.Level IV, diagnostic study with poor reference standard.Indications for rotator cuff repair: a systematic review.Despite the popularity of surgical repair of rotator cuff tears, literature regarding the indications for and timing of surgery are sparse. We performed a systematic review of the literature to investigate factors influencing the decision to surgically repair symptomatic, full-thickness rotator cuff tears. Specifically, how do demographic variables, duration of symptoms, timing of surgery, physical examination findings, and size of tear affect treatment outcome and indications for surgery? We reviewed the best available evidence, which offers some guidelines for surgical decision making. Variables suggest earlier surgical intervention may be needed in the setting of weakness and substantial functional disability. With regard to demographic variables, the evidence is unclear regarding their association with treatment outcome. However, older chronological age does not seem to portend a worse outcome. Pending worker's compensation claims does seem to negatively affect treatment results. Further research is required to define the indications for surgery for full thickness rotator cuff tears. However, the design and conduct of an ethical study to obtain Level I evidence on this issue will be a major challenge.Partial-thickness rotator cuff tears.Partial-thickness rotator cuff tears are not a single entity; rather, they represent a spectrum of disease states. Although often asymptomatic, they can be significantly disabling. Overhead throwing athletes with partial-thickness rotator cuff tears differ with respect to etiology, goals, and treatment from older, nonathlete patients with degenerative tears. Pathogenesis of degenerative partial-thickness tears is multifactorial, with evidence of intrinsic and extrinsic factors playing key roles. Diagnosis of partial-thickness rotator cuff tears should be based on the patient's symptoms together with magnetic resonance imaging studies. Conservative treatment is successful in most patients. Surgery generally is considered for patients with symptoms of sufficient duration and intensity. The role of acromioplasty has not been clearly delineated, but it should be considered when there is evidence of extrinsic causation for the partial-thickness rotator cuff tear.The bear-hug test: a new and sensitive test for diagnosing a subscapularis tear.It was our intent to devise a new clinical test that would more accurately diagnose subscapularis tears than the current clinical tests. This new test is called the bear-hug test. The purpose of this study was to assess the bear-hug test and compare it with the current tests of subscapularis function (lift-off, belly-press, and Napoleon tests).Between January 2004 and March 2004, 68 consecutive patients scheduled for an arthroscopic procedure were evaluated preoperatively; the preoperative clinical examination findings were then correlated with arthroscopic findings. Lift-off, belly-press, Napoleon, and bear-hug tests were included in the examination. Furthermore, for the belly-press and bear-hug tests, the strength was precisely quantified by means of an electronic digital tensiometer (Kern HBC). Diagnostic arthroscopy was the reference that determined the actual pathologic lesions.Subscapularis tears occurred with a prevalence rate of 29.4%. Of the subscapularis tears, 40% were not predicted by preoperative assessment by use of all of the tests. The bear-hug test was found to be the most sensitive test (60%) of all of those studied (belly-press test, 40%; Napoleon test, 25%; and lift-off test, 17.6%). In contrast, all 4 tests had a high specificity (lift-off test, 100%; Napoleon test, 97.9%; belly-press test, 97.9%; and bear-hug test, 91.7%). No statistically significant difference was found between the area under the receiver operating characteristic curve of the bear-hug test and that of the belly-press test in diagnosing a torn subscapularis. However, the areas under the receiver operating characteristic curve for both the bear-hug test and the belly-press test were significantly greater than those for the lift-off and Napoleon tests (P < .05). Positive bear-hug and belly-press tests suggest a tear of at least 30% of the subscapularis, whereas a positive Napoleon test indicates that greater than 50% of the subscapularis is torn. Furthermore, a positive lift-off test is not found until at least 75% of the subscapularis is torn.The bear-hug test optimizes the chance of detecting a tear of the upper part of the subscapularis tendon. Moreover, because the bear-hug test represents the most sensitive test, it can be considered to be the most likely clinical test to alert the surgeon to a possible subscapularis tear. Performing all of the subscapularis tests is useful in predicting the size of the tear.Level I, diagnostic study: testing of previously developed criteria in a series of consecutive patients with arthroscopy used as the criterion standard.Scapular involvement in impingement: signs and symptoms.Normal scapular motion is closely integrated with arm motion to provide efficient scapulohumeral rhythm in shoulder function. This rhythm is often disrupted in patients with symptoms and signs of shoulder impingement. A large percentage of patients with shoulder impingement have scapular dyskinesis and alterations in the normal resting position of the scapula or in dynamic scapular motion. Scapular dyskinesis usually manifests as a loss of control in the motions of scapular external rotation and the translation of scapular retraction. This loss of control results in alteration in timing and magnitude of acromial upward rotation, excessive antetilting of the glenoid, and loss of maximal rotator cuff muscle activation capability. These pathophysiologic and pathomechanical alterations cause or increase the dysfunction associated with impingement. Scapular dyskinesis may have proximal or distal causative factors. Proximal factors are mainly associated with muscle factors, and can usually be treated with rehabilitation. Distal factors are mainly caused by internal derangements of joints and frequently require surgical treatment followed by appropriate rehabilitation. Physical examination techniques that specifically evaluate scapular dyskinesis can identify the causative factors and guide treatment and rehabilitation strategies.Interpreting positive signs of the supraspinatus test in screening for torn rotator cuff.The purpose of this study was to investigate the validity of the supraspinatus test as a screening test for detecting torn rotator cuff and to determine what its valuable positive signs were. Both the empty-can test and full-can test were performed on 200 shoulders diagnosed by magnetic resonance imaging (MRI)-and in some cases, surgical findings-to have full-thickness or partial-thickness torn rotator cuff s, or no tear in the rotator cuff . During the maneuver, the presence of pain or weakness or both pain and weakness were recorded as positive signs, and the distribution of these signs were analyzed according to the degree of tear. The predictive values were calculated in 2 ways by considering (1) only full-thickness tears as tears and (2) both full- and partial-thickness tears as tears. The 2 tests and the 2 ways of considering partial-thickness tears were compared. Pain and weakness were severity-dependent, and the empty-can test had a higher incidence of pain. The sensitivities of the 2 supraspinatus tests in all positive signs were higher when including partial-thickness tears in the tear group ; however, their specificities were higher when excluding partial-thickness tears. Both pain and weakness were interpretive for the supraspinatus test, and both tests were sensitive to full- and partial- thickness tears and specific for full-thickness tears.Reliability of function-related tests in patients with shoulder pathologies.Nonexperimental.To investigate the intertester and intratester reliability of a battery of function-related tests in patients with shoulder pathologies and associated reduced range of motion.A battery of function-related tests has the potential to complement assessment of functional limitation in patients who have shoulder pathologies.Three function-related tests (hand to neck, hand to scapula, and hand to opposite scapula) were conducted on 46 patients with shoulder pathologies, and 46 age- and gender-matched control subjects. The tests were performed by 2 independent physiotherapists to test intertester reliability. Intratester reliability was examined by investigating the reproducibility of the tests performed twice, with 3 to 5 days between tests, by the same physiotherapist. Comparison of the scores on the function-related tests between patients and controls was evaluated. A correlation matrix was calculated to test the level of association among the tests.Intratester and intertester reliability on the 3 tests (weighted K) varied from 0.83 to 0.90. The patient's test performances were decreased in comparison to the control group. The correlation matrix demonstrated a level of associations among the 3 tests varying from r = 0.64 to r = 0.66.The results of this study indicate that function-related tests are reliable and could be used in clinical practice to document reduced function of the shoulder. The level of association among the tests indicates that each test measured different aspects of shoulder function.Clinical inquiries. What is the best way to diagnose a suspected rotator cuff tear?The evaluation of a suspected rotator cuff tear should start with a history and a clinical exam of the shoulder (strength of recommendation [SOR]: B, based on a systematic review of cohort studies). Three clinical test results in particular--supraspinatus weakness, weakness of external rotation, and impingement--or 2 positive tests for a patient older than 60 years were highly predictive of rotator cuff tear (SOR: B, based on individual prospective study). Either magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) or ultrasound can confirm a possible full-thickness tear (SOR: B, based on a systematic review of cohort studies). If a patient has an implantable device prohibiting MRI imaging, conventional arthrography is an alternative (SOR: A, individual randomized controlled trial). Suspected partial-thickness tears are best verified with an ultrasound (SOR: B, based on a systematic review of cohort studies).Evaluation of apparent and absolute supraspinatus strength in patients with shoulder injury using the scapular retraction test.Physical examination of patients with shoulder injury not involving actual rotator cuff tears frequently demonstrates decreased rotator cuff strength on manual muscle testing. This decrease has been attributed to supraspinatus muscle weakness, but it may be owing to alterations in scapular position.The position of stabilized scapular retraction, by minimizing proximal kinetic chain factors and providing a stable base of muscle origin, positively influences demonstrated supraspinatus strength.Controlled laboratory study.Supraspinatus strength was tested in 20 injured patients and 10 healthy controls in both the empty-can arm position and a position of scapular retraction using a handheld dynamometer. Pain in both maneuvers was measured by use of a visual analog scale.Paired t tests indicated the scapular retraction position resulted in statistically significantly (P = .001) higher supraspinatus strength values within both groups. There was no significant difference between the 2 positions in visual analog scale scores.This study shows that demonstrated apparent supraspinatus weakness on clinical examination in symptomatic patients may be dependent on scapular position. The weakness may be owing to other factors besides supraspinatus muscle weakness, such as a lack of a stable base in the kinetic chain or scapula.The clinical examination that addresses scapular posture and includes scapular retraction will allow more accurate determination of absolute supraspinatus muscle strength and allow efficacious rehabilitation protocols to address the source of the demonstrated weakness.The rotator cuff functional index.Despite improvements in the clinical assessment of rotator cuff injuries, shortcomings exist in diagnosing rotator cuff tears.To formulate a clinical rotator cuff functional index for predicting rotator cuff tears based on handheld dynamometer measurements for shoulder strength testing and to assess its ability to diagnose a rotator cuff tear.Cohort study (diagnosis); Level of evidence, 2.Preoperative handheld dynamometer measurements, including supraspinatus, external rotation, internal rotation, adduction, and lift-off force, were compared in 100 patients with full-thickness rotator cuff tears (> 1.0 cm) and 100 patients with no rotator cuff injury (confirmed by arthroscopy). Using multiple logistic regression analysis, the rotator cuff functional index and index for rotator cuff tear size were formulated in which 100 represented excellent rotator cuff function and less than 0 indicated a full-thickness supraspinatus tear. Each patient's index was calculated to determine its clinical value in predicting a rotator cuff tear; the Pearson correlation coefficient was established for the rotator cuff functional index for rotator cuff size.Two handheld dynamometer measurements predicted a rotator cuff tear (P < .001, r = 0.53), with rotator cuff functional index = 1.27 * supraspinatus (N) - 0.72 * adduction (N) - 11.6, but not tear size (r = 0.38). In predicting a rotator cuff tear (rotator cuff functional index < 0 = rotator cuff tear; rotator cuff functional index > 0 = no tear), the rotator cuff functional index had 83% sensitivity, 79% specificity, 80% positive predictive value, 82% negative predictive value, likelihood ratio of 4.0 for a positive test result and 0.2 for a negative test result and an accuracy of 81%.The 2 most useful tests for determining a rotator cuff tear with a handheld dynamometer were supraspinatus force and adduction force (as negative control). A functional index based on these measurements was able to rule out a rotator cuff tear and predict the presence but not the size of the tear.Shoulder impingement syndrome: relationships between clinical, functional, and radiologic findings.Although there has been much research about imaging methods for shoulder impingement syndrome, the clinical information and upper limb level of disability have been generally ignored. The purpose of this study was to detect the relationships between clinical, functional, and radiologic variables in patients with shoulder impingement syndrome.A cross-sectional, clinical, and radiologic study was planned and 59 shoulders of 58 consecutive patients waiting for physical therapy because of a clinically suspected shoulder impingement syndrome were included into this study. Comprehensive clinical examination, radiography, shoulder ultrasonography, and magnetic resonance imaging were performed in the same month.Despite the high sensitivities of ultrasonography for diagnosing rotator cuff tears (98.1%) and biceps pathologies (100%), magnetic resonance imaging was superior to ultrasonography in many important shoulder structures such as a glenoid labral tear and subacromial bursal effusion/hypertrophy (P < 0.01). These structures were the determinants of the shoulder's disability measured by disabilities of the arm, shoulder, and hand questionnaire.Ultrasonography and magnetic resonance imaging had comparable high accuracy for identifying the biceps pathologies and rotator cuff tears. The basic clinical tests had modest accuracy in both disorders. The choice of which imaging test to perform should be based on the patient's clinical information (regarding lesion of glenoid labrum, joint capsule, muscle, and bone), cost, and imaging experience of the radiology department.An evaluation of the provocative tests for superior labral anterior posterior lesions.Although our understanding of superior labral anterior posterior lesions has grown, the physical diagnosis remains imperfect.Cohort study (diagnostic); Level of evidence, 2.To determine the most effective provocative maneuver with which to diagnose superior labral anterior posterior lesions.A series of 132 consecutive patients scheduled to undergo diagnostic shoulder arthroscopy were examined preoperatively over a 6-month period, and the final diagnosis in each case was made arthroscopically. The following assessments were included: active compression (O'Brien), anterior slide, pain provocation, crank, Jobe relocation, Hawkins, Neer, Speed, and Yergason tests.The most sensitive diagnostic tools for type II superior labral lesions were the active compression, Hawkins, Speed, Neer, and Jobe relocation tests. When type I and type II lesions were combined, the results were similar. However, none of the sensitive tests were specific for either type I or type II lesions.The authors' results contradict the current literature regarding provocative testing for both stable and unstable superior labral lesions. There is no single maneuver that can accurately diagnose superior labral anterior posterior lesions; arthroscopy remains the standard by which to diagnose such lesions.Are pain location and physical examinations useful in locating a tear site of the rotator cuff?Pain is the most common symptom of patients with rotator cuff tendinopathy, but little is known about the relationship between the site of pain and the site of cuff pathologic lesions. Also, accuracies of physical examinations used to locate a tear by assessing the muscle strength seem to be affected by the threshold for muscle weakness, but no studies have been reported regarding the efficacies of physical examinations in reference to their threshold.Pain location is useful in locating a tear site. Efficacies of physical examinations to evaluate the function of the cuff muscles depend on the threshold for muscle weakness.Case series; Level of evidence, 4.The authors retrospectively reviewed the clinical charts of 160 shoulders of 149 patients (mean age, 53 years) with either rotator cuff tears (140 shoulders) or cuff tendinitis (20 shoulders). The location of pain was recorded on a standardized form with 6 different areas. The diagnostic accuracies of the following tests were assessed with various thresholds for muscle weakness: supraspinatus test, the external rotation strength test, and the lift-off test.Lateral and anterior portions of the shoulder were the most common sites of pain regardless of existence of tear or tear location. The supraspinatus test was most accurate when it was assessed to have positive results with the muscle strength less than manual muscle testing grade 5, whereas the lift-off test was most accurate with a threshold less than grade 3. The external rotation strength test was most accurate with a threshold of less than grade 4+.The authors conclude that pain location is not useful in locating the site of a tear, whereas the physical examinations aiming to locate the tear site are clinically useful when assessed to have positive results with appropriate threshold for muscle weakness.Shoulder pain: diagnosis and management in primary care.The belly-off sign: a new clinical diagnostic sign for subscapularis lesions.We describe a new clinical sign for subscapularis lesions that we call the belly-off sign and compare its diagnostic value with standard subscapularis tests (the lift-off test, internal rotation lag sign, and belly-press test/Napoleon sign) in cases of different types of subscapularis lesions. The belly-off sign represents the inability of the patient to maintain the palm of the hand attached to the abdomen with the arm passively brought into flexion and internal rotation.Case series.This descriptive and explorative study included 60 patients (mean age, 55.3 years) with clinical, surgical, and/or magnetic resonance imaging-confirmed evidence of isolated or combined lesions of the subscapularis musculotendinous unit. In all patients, a complete physical shoulder examination was performed and the results were compared with the intraoperative and magnetic resonance imaging findings.The belly-off sign appeared to be more reliable than any other diagnostic test or sign in detecting isolated partial tears of the subscapularis tendon (group I), combined partial subscapularis and complete supraspinatus tendon tears (group II), and postoperative subscapularis insufficiency with mild atrophy of the upper aspect of the subscapularis muscle (group VII). In cases of complete/near complete subscapularis tears with or without supraspinatus and infraspinatus tendon tears (groups IV, V, and VI), the belly-off sign appeared to be as reliable as the belly-press test, internal rotation lag sign, and lift-off test. For assessing partial subscapularis tendon tears and insufficient external rotators (group III), the belly-off sign was less reliable than any other diagnostic test or sign.The belly-off sign represents a promising new clinical diagnostic sign for subscapularis lesions. In particular, subtle lesions of the upper subscapularis tendon and postoperative subscapularis insufficiencies can be detected by the belly-off sign in cases of intact external rotators. In cases of an advanced lack of external rotators, the belly-off sign becomes negative and loses its diagnostic value. We therefore conclude that the belly-off sign is attributable to an unbalanced transverse force couple with overwhelming of the external rotators of the shoulder.Level IV, case series with no, or historical, control group.Correlation between clinical diagnosis and arthroscopic findings of the shoulder.To assess the accuracy of clinical examination by non-specialist orthopaedic surgeons of patients presenting to a diagnostic and treatment centre (DTC) for arthroscopic shoulder surgery.A retrospective review of notes of 130 consecutive shoulder arthroscopies performed at a DTC over a 10 month period. Preoperative clinical diagnosis was compared with operative arthroscopic findings. Additional information from preoperative imaging was compared with clinical examination and arthroscopic findings. Preoperative clinical examinations and consent were undertaken by clinical fellows, (SpR level) and non-upper limb consultant orthopaedic surgeons. Consultants specialising in upper limb surgery performed the operations.Six main groups were identified on the basis of clinical examination: impingement 76 cases (58%), instability 22 cases (17%), frozen shoulder 11 cases (8%), rotator cuff tear four cases (3%), non-specific pain eight cases (6%), and normal clinical examination nine cases (7%). Impingement and instability diagnosed clinically strongly correlated with the arthroscopic findings. Clinical diagnosis of frozen shoulder and rotator cuff tears had a weaker correlation with the arthroscopic findings. Of the nine cases of normal clinical examination, abnormality was found at arthroscopy in all cases.There have been very few studies comparing clinical examination of the shoulder with arthroscopic findings. This study emphasises the importance of good clinical examination skills in diagnosing common shoulder abnormalities. The addition of imaging, particularly ultrasound and magnetic resonance imaging further increases the likelihood of an accurate diagnosis. Shoulder examination should be taught with as much emphasis at both undergraduate and postgraduate level as other orthopaedic clinical examinations.Unstable isolated SLAP lesion: clinical presentation and outcome of arthroscopic fixation.The purpose of this study was to describe the clinical presentation and sensitivity of testing of unstable isolated SLAP (superior labrum anterior posterior) lesions and to evaluate the efficacy of arthroscopic treatment.Case series.A retrospective review was made of 44 unstable SLAP lesions in 41 patients (40 male, 1 female) who did not have other pathologic shoulder findings. The mean follow-up period was 33 months (range, 25 to 67 months) and the mean age at the time of surgery was 24 years (range, 17 to 43 years). Twenty-six patients had an injury on the dominant shoulder and 3 had bilateral shoulder involvement. Arthroscopic fixation was performed with the use of a biodegradable tack (Suretac; Acufex, Mansfield, MA) in 14 cases, and with a screw-type metallic suture anchor (mini-Revo; Linvatec, Largo, FL) in 30 cases.Pain (100%) and clicking (57%) were the most common symptoms. The compression-rotation test was positive in 84% of the patients before surgery. The average UCLA score at the last follow-up was 32.3 points; 22 cases were graded excellent, 16 good, and 6 poor. Based on the postoperative performance data collected from 33 athletes, 25 of them (76%) were able to return to their athletic activities. Among them, throwing athletes showed statistically better performance than did nonthrowing athletes (P = .011).Pain, followed by clicking, was the most common symptom, and the most common sign was a positive compression rotation test. Arthroscopic treatment of unstable isolated SLAP lesions resulted in good or excellent UCLA scores in 86% of the patients. Throwing athletes showed more satisfactory results than nonthrowing athletes.Type IV, case series with no, or historical, control group.Subscapularis tendon tears.Pathology of the subscapularis tendon is both infrequently identified and not commonly considered as a major source of shoulder pain and dysfunction. Subscapularis tendon pathology can present as isolated tears; partial-thickness tears; anterosuperior tears, also involving the supraspinatus tendon; complete rotator cuff avulsion; and rotator interval lesions, in which instability of the long head of the biceps tendon may dominate the clinical presentation. Although an accurate physical examination is paramount, modalities such as arthroscopy, magnetic resonance imaging, and ultrasound have advanced knowledge of the spectrum of abnormalities involving the subscapularis tendon. Nonsurgical management may be effective for most partial tears. Surgically, open repair is more frequent than use of arthroscopic techniques. Tears of the subscapularis tendon portend a different prognosis than do supraspinatus tendon tears, especially when the injury is acute and diagnosis is delayed.Partial-thickness rotator cuff tears.Partial-thickness tears of the rotator cuff have been diagnosed with increased frequency because of a heightened awareness of the condition by clinicians and improved diagnostic methods. Research into the causes, natural history, and optimal treatment of this condition lags behind that of full-thickness tears. However, despite the limitations in the existing literature, there has emerged a consensus among shoulder experts that partial-thickness rotator cuff tears should be aggressively treated in the active athlete because of the unfavorable natural history of these lesions and success of accepted surgical algorithms. This review will provide an overview of the theories regarding the origins of partial-thickness rotator cuff tears, discuss the relative accuracy of accepted diagnostic techniques, and summarize the indications and methods of operative repair with an emphasis on the results of various treatment approaches.The resisted supination external rotation test: a new test for the diagnosis of superior labral anterior posterior lesions.To evaluate a new clinical test, the resisted supination external rotation test, for the diagnosis of superior labral anterior posterior lesions of the shoulder.Cohort study (diagnosis); Level of evidence, 2.Forty athletes (average age, 23.9 years) with activity-related shoulder pain were enrolled in the study. The patients underwent 3 different tests designed specifically to detect superior labral anterior posterior lesions (the resisted supination external rotation test, the crank test, and the active compression test); the tests were performed in a random order on the affected shoulder. The results of the tests were compared with arthroscopic findings.Out of 40 athletes, 29 (72.5%) had superior labral anterior posterior tears. The resisted supination external rotation test had the highest sensitivity (82.8%), specificity (81.8%), positive predictive value (92.3%), negative predictive value (64.3%), and diagnostic accuracy (82.5%) of all tests performed.By re-creating the peel-back mechanism, the resisted supination external rotation test is more accurate than 2 other commonly used physical examination tests designed to diagnose superior labral anterior posterior tears in overhead-throwing athletes. By using this test in the context of a thorough clinical history and physical examination, lesions of the superior labrum can be more reliably diagnosed.The Kim test: a novel test for posteroinferior labral lesion of the shoulder--a comparison to the jerk test.Detection of a posteroinferior labral lesion by physical examination is often difficult.To introduce a novel diagnostic test for detecting a posteroinferior labral lesion of the shoulder.The Kim test can detect a posteroinferior labral lesion of the shoulder.Cohort study (diagnosis); Level of evidence, 1.In 172 painful shoulders, the Kim test was compared with the jerk test and was verified by arthroscopic examination. A sudden onset of posterior shoulder pain and click with or without clunk indicated a positive test result.Thirty-three shoulders had a positive Kim test result, in which 24 had a posteroinferior labral lesion and 9 had a normal posteroinferior labrum. Of 139 shoulders with a negative Kim test result, 6 had a posteroinferior labral tear and 133 had a normal posteroinferior labrum. The sensitivity of the Kim test was 80%, specificity was 94%, positive predictive value was 0.73, and negative predictive value was 0.96. The interexaminer reliability between 2 examiners was 0.91. The accuracy of the jerk test in detecting a posteroinferior labral lesion was the following: sensitivity, 73%; specificity, 98%; positive predictive value, 0.88; and negative predictive value, 0.95. The location of the posterior labral lesion was predominantly posterior in 19 shoulders and predominantly inferior in 11 shoulders. The Kim test was more sensitive in detecting a predominantly inferior labral lesion, whereas the jerk test was more sensitive in detecting a predominantly posterior labral lesion. The sensitivity in detecting a posteroinferior labral lesion increased to 97% when the 2 tests were combined.The Kim test is a reliable diagnostic test for detection of a posteroinferior labral lesion.Current concepts in the recognition and treatment of superior labral (SLAP) lesions.Pathology of the superior aspect of the glenoid labrum (SLAP lesion) poses a significant challenge to the rehabilitation specialist due to the complex nature and wide variety of etiological factors associated with these lesions. A thorough clinical evaluation and proper identification of the extent of labral injury is important to determine the most appropriate nonoperative and/or surgical management. Postoperative rehabilitation is based on the specific surgical procedure as well as the extent, location, and mechanism of labral pathology and associated lesions. Emphasis is placed on protecting the healing labrum, while gradually restoring range of motion, strength, and dynamic stability of the glenohumeral joint. The purpose of this paper is to provide an overview of the anatomy and pathomechanics of SLAP lesions and review specific clinical examination techniques used to identify these lesions, including 3 newly described tests. Furthermore, a review of the current surgical management and postoperative rehabilitation guidelines is provided.Shoulder impingement syndrome.Subacromial impingement syndrome is a common cause of shoulder pain. The purpose of this article is to review the clinical presentation, physical examination findings, and differential diagnosis of impingement syndrome. Using an evidence-based approach, we propose an algorithm for the management of subacromial impingement syndrome including indications for nonoperative management, advanced imaging, and operative management.The effect of rotator cuff tear size on shoulder strength and range of motion.Prospective cohort study.To determine the effect of rotator cuff tear size on shoulder strength and range of motion.Patients with rotator cuff pathology typically present with weakness and motion loss in various motions. The extent to which the presence of a rotator cuff tear and the size of the tear affect strength and range of motion is not well understood.Sixty-one patients scheduled for surgery, with a diagnosis of a rotator cuff tear and/or subacromial impingement, underwent examination for shoulder pain, function, range of motion, and strength. The extent of rotator cuff pathology was documented during subsequent surgery (presence of tear, tear size, tear thickness).There were 10 massive tears, 15 large tears, 13 medium tears, 12 small tears, and 11 rotator cuffs without a tear. Patients had marked weakness in abduction strength at 90 degrees and 10 degrees of abduction, in external rotation strength at 90 degrees, and in the "full can test" (all, P<.0001). Marked range of motion losses in shoulder flexion and external rotation at 0 degrees and 90 degrees abduction (all, P<.001) were also observed. Abduction strength deficit at 10 degrees was affected by rotator cuff tear size (P<.0001). Twenty of 25 patients with large or massive tears had deficits greater than 50%, compared with only 1 of 11 patients with no tear, 2 of 12 patients with a small tear, and 5 of 13 patients with a medium tear (P<.0001). Other strength and range of motion deficits or indices of pain and function were unaffected by tear size.Weakness of greater than 50% relative to the contralateral side in shoulder abduction at 10 degrees of abduction was indicative of a large or massive rotator cuff tear.Subacromial impingement syndrome: the effect of changing posture on shoulder range of movement.Random allocation of subjects into a placebo-controlled, crossover study.To investigate the effect of changing thoracic and scapular posture on shoulder flexion and scapular plane abduction range of motion in asymptomatic subjects, and in subjects with subacromial impingement syndrome.Changes in upper body posture and concomitant imbalance of the muscle system have been proposed as one of the etiological mechanisms leading to subacromial impingement syndrome. Although clinicians commonly assess posture and devise rehabilitation programs to correct posture, there is little evidence to support this practice.Selected postural, range of movement, and pain measurements were investigated in 60 asymptomatic subjects and 60 subjects with subacromial impingement syndrome, prior to and following thoracic and scapular taping intended to change their posture.Changing posture had an effect on all components of posture measured (P<.001) and these changes were associated with a significant increase (P<.001) in the range of motion in shoulder flexion and abduction in the plane of the scapula. Changing posture was not found to have a significant effect on the intensity of pain experienced by the symptomatic subjects, although the point in the range of shoulder elevation at which they experienced their pain was significantly higher (P<.001).The findings of this investigation suggest that changing 1 or more of the components of posture may have a positive effect on shoulder range of movement and the point at which pain is experienced.Interobserver variation in sonography of the painful shoulder.This study was conducted as a prospective assessment of interobserver variability in the sonographic evaluation of the rotator cuff.Three musculoskeletal radiologists who had different levels of scanning experience each performed shoulder sonography on 24 consecutive patients during 1 patient visit. The diagnostic criteria full-thickness rotator cuff tear, tendon calcification, tendinosis of the supraspinatus, subacromial fluid, subacromial synovial/bursal thickening, dynamic signs of impingement, and abnormality in the long head of biceps tendon were scored, with independent observers recording the data. Statistical analysis was performed using Cohen's kappa test, with significance assessed at p values of less than 0.05.There was good agreement (kappa >0.60, p <0.01) between the experienced operators for full-thickness rotator cuff tear, tendon calcification, dynamic signs of impingement, and abnormality of the long head of biceps tendon. There was no significant agreement between the experienced operators and the less experienced operator in several categories, including (and importantly) full-thickness rotator cuff tears (kappa=0.18-0.21).In experienced hands sonography of the rotator cuff is a reproducible diagnostic test, but agreement is poor when there is marked disparity between the operators' experience levels. Our findings suggest a need for a more clearly defined training curriculum for sonography of the shoulder in radiology training programs.